ONSOLVE, LLC PRIVACY NOTICE
Read French Canadian privacy policy and terms of use
Read Mexican Spanish privacy policy and terms of use
Why do we collect information?
Who do we share information with?
How do we use cookies?
California Do-Not-Track
Your Rights
What information do we collect?
Security precautions
OnSolve, LLC Privacy Notice For California Residents
Changes to Privacy Policy
OnSolve, LLC Terms of Use
For All Services
Recipient Responsibilities (applicable only to Recipients)
CityWatch® and TelAlert® Additional Terms
Mobile Applications Terms of Use
Initiator Responsibilities (applicable only to Initiators)
CodeRED Weather Warning®, Weather Warning and FirstCall® Weather Additional Terms
MyDailyCall® Additional Terms
Social Media Terms of Use
­­­­­ONSOLVE, LLC PRIVACY NOTICE
ONSOLVE, LLC (“OnSolve”) is firmly committed to your privacy. This Privacy Notice states our privacy practices when you visit our website or use any of our products, apps or services (collectively, the “Services”). Our mission in implementing this Privacy Notice is to protect your information and use it only to provide you with the highest quality Services available. The privacy and security of your information is of paramount importance to us. We do not sell, lease, rent, or barter ANY of your personal information to any third parties without your consent other than as provided in this Notice. We value the trust you place in OnSolve. We are committed to providing a website with a secure environment and unparalleled customer service. This Privacy Notice describes the information we collect and how we use such information. Additional terms regarding your use of our Services are contained in the applicable agreement between OnSolve (or its affiliate) and you. As an agent processing personal information on behalf of our customers, OnSolve does not own or control the personal information that it processes on behalf of its customers and does not have a direct relationship with all individuals whose personal information may be processed in connection with the provision of our Services. In these circumstances, OnSolve’s customers are responsible for providing appropriate notice to the relevant individuals and obtaining any requisite consent.
Why do we collect information?
In general, we collect information to help us in our marketing and promotional efforts, to analyze user behavior, and to customize and improve our Services. This information is used to assist OnSolve in serving you when visiting any of our websites or using any of our Services. Our goal is to provide you with a personalized service which includes continually looking for ways to improve our Services and enhance your experience on our websites.
What information do we collect?
The type of information we collect may be different depending on whether you are signing up to receive notifications, using our Services, communicating to our customer support team, or simply visiting our website. During any one of these processes, we collect contact information, which includes your email address, physical address, phone numbers and/or wireless device information. This information will be used to provide the Services to you. By simply visiting our website (without filling out any forms), we will not collect data that does personally identifies you, but data about your activities (e.g., the pages you viewed, the date and time of your visit, and location information from your IP address or GPS location) is collected. We may use this information to improve our Services, obtain market research information, or better understand how our Services are used generally. We do not intentionally collect personal information from anyone we know to be under eighteen (18) years of age. If you provide us with your information, you represent and warrant that: (i) you are eighteen (18) years of age or older; or, (ii) if you are providing information for a child under eighteen (18) years of age for the purpose of receiving notifications, you are the parent or legal guardian of such child; you are over eighteen (18) years of age; and that you are legally authorized to provide information for such child to be contacted through the Services.
Who do we share information with?
Information may be shared with our affiliates and service providers as needed for business purposes which include delivery of our Services, account administration, customer service, transaction processing, processing and delivery of account statements, and research and analysis. Customers we have a contractual relationship with may view your standard personal information through use of our Services. Through these contractual relationships, we require customers and service providers to maintain a level of privacy protection comparable to our own practices. We may share aggregated statistics of user behavior (e.g., customers, traffic patterns, etc.) with our partners. The aggregated information will not identify any individual personally or contain any personally identifiable information. Our policy is to notify individuals who use our Services of requests for their personal information prior to disclosure unless we are prohibited by law from doing so or in exceptional circumstances, such as emergencies.
Security precautions
We have stringent security measures in place to protect against the loss, misuse, and alteration of information under our control. We use secure technology, privacy protection controls, and restrictions on employee access in order to safeguard your information; however, the very nature of the Internet makes it impossible to guarantee the security of transmitted data.
How do we use cookies?
Like many other sites on the Internet, our website uses cookies and similar technologies such as web beacons, tags and JavaScript alone or in conjunction with cookies to compile information about the usage of our websites and interaction with emails from us. If you do not want this site to place a cookie on your browser and track your activity, you may leave the site or you may browse the site using
privacy mode in your web browser
. To learn how to use privacy mode, refer to the links below depending on the browser you use.
InPrivate mode in Microsoft Internet Explorer
Incognito mode in Google Chrome
Private browsing mode in Mozilla FireFox
Private browsing mode in Apple Safari
ONSOLVE, LLC PRIVACY NOTICE FOR CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS
Effective Date: December 31, 2019 This Privacy Notice for California Residents supplements the information contained in the general
Privacy Notice
of OnSolve, LLC ("OnSolve, " "we" or "our") and applies solely to all visitors to our website and users of any of our products, apps or services (collectively, the "Services") who reside in the State of California ("consumers" or "you"). We adopt this Privacy Notice to comply with the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 ("CCPA") and any terms defined in the CCPA have the same meaning when used in this Privacy Notice.
Information We Collect
Our Services collect information that identifies, relates to, describes, references, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or device ("personal information"). In particular, our Services have collected the following categories of personal information from OnSolve visitors and users within the last twelve (12) months:
Category
Examples
Collected
A. Identifiers.
A real name, alias, postal address, unique personal identifier, employee identifier, online identifier, Internet Protocol address, email address, account name, or other similar identifiers.
YES
B. Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)).
A name, signature, address, personal telephone number, business telephone number. Some personal information included in this category may overlap with other categories.
YES
C. Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law.
Age (40 years or older), race, color, ancestry, national origin, citizenship, religion or creed, marital status, medical condition, physical or mental disability, sex (including gender, gender identity, gender expression, pregnancy or childbirth and related medical conditions), sexual orientation, veteran or military status, genetic information (including familial genetic information).
NO
D. Commercial information.
Records of personal property, products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
NO
E. Biometric information.
Genetic, physiological, behavioral, and biological characteristics, or activity patterns used to extract a template or other identifier or identifying information, such as, fingerprints, faceprints, and voiceprints, iris or retina scans, keystroke, gait, or other physical patterns, and sleep, health, or exercise data.
NO
F. Internet or other similar network activity.
Browsing history, search history, information on a consumer's interaction with a website, application, or advertisement.
YES
G. Geolocation data.
Physical location or movements.
YES
H. Sensory data.
Audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or similar information.
NO
I. Professional or employment-related information.
Current or past job history or performance evaluations.
NO
J. Non-public education information (per the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g, 34 C.F.R. Part 99)).
Education records directly related to a student maintained by an educational institution or party acting on its behalf, such as class lists, student schedules, student identification codes or assignments.
YES
K. Inferences drawn from other personal information.
Profile reflecting a person's preferences, characteristics, psychological trends, predispositions, behavior, attitudes, intelligence, abilities, and aptitudes.
NO
Personal information does not include:
Publicly available information from government records.
Deidentified or aggregated consumer information.
Information excluded from the CCPA's scope, such as:
Health or medical information covered by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) and the California Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (CMIA) or clinical trial data;
Personal information covered by certain sector-specific privacy laws, including the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FRCA), the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (GLBA) or California Financial Information Privacy Act (FIPA), and the Driver's Privacy Protection Act of 1994.
OnSolve obtains the categories of personal information listed above from the following categories of sources:
Directly from you.
For example, when you complete our forms and when you register for and use our Services.
Indirectly from you.
For example, from observing your actions on our website
Directly from our customers.
For example, our customers provide personal information about consumers in order to receive the benefit of our services.
Use of Personal Information
We may use or disclose the personal information we collect for one or more of the following purposes:
To fulfill or meet the reason you provided the information. For example, if you share your name and contact information to request a price quote or ask a question about our Services, we will use that personal information to respond to your inquiry. If you provide your personal information to subscribe to our Services, we will use that information to process your payment and facilitate delivery of the Services. We may also save your information to facilitate new product orders or process refunds.
To provide, support, personalize, and develop our Services.
To create, maintain, customize, and secure your account with us.
To process your requests, purchases, transactions, and payments and prevent transactional fraud.
To provide you with support and to respond to your inquiries, including to investigate and address your concerns and monitor and improve our responses.
To personalize your experience of our Services and to deliver content and product and service offerings relevant to your interests, including targeted offers and ads through our website, third-party sites, and via email or text message (with your consent, where required by law).
To help maintain the safety, security, and integrity of our Services, databases and other technology assets, and business.
For testing, research, analysis, and product development, including to develop and improve our Services.
To respond to law enforcement requests and as required by applicable law, court order, or governmental regulations.
As described to you when collecting your personal information or as otherwise set forth in the CCPA.
To evaluate or conduct a merger, divestiture, restructuring, reorganization, dissolution, or other sale or transfer of some or all of OnSolve's assets, whether as a going concern or as part of bankruptcy, liquidation, or similar proceeding, in which personal information held by OnSolve about users of our Services is among the assets transferred.
OnSolve will not collect additional categories of personal information or use the personal information we collected for materially different, unrelated, or incompatible purposes without providing you notice.
Sharing Personal Information
OnSolve may disclose your personal information to a third party for a business purpose. When we disclose personal information for a business purpose, we enter into a contract that describes the purpose and requires the recipient to both keep that personal information confidential and not use it for any purpose except performing the contract.
Disclosures of Personal Information for a Business Purpose
In the preceding twelve (12) months, OnSolve has disclosed personal information to its service providers for the following business purposes: delivery of our Services, account administration, customer service, transaction processing, processing and delivery of account statements, and research and analysis.
Sales of Personal Information
In the preceding twelve (12) months, OnSolve has not sold personal information.
Your Rights and Choices
The CCPA provides consumers (California residents) with specific rights regarding their personal information. This section describes your CCPA rights and explains how to exercise those rights.
Access to Specific Information and Data Portability Rights
You have the right to request that OnSolve disclose certain information to you about our collection and use of your personal information over the past 12 months. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request (see Exercising Access, Data Portability, and Deletion Rights), we will disclose to you:
The categories of personal information we collected about you.
The categories of sources for the personal information we collected about you.
Our business or commercial purpose for collecting or selling that personal information.
The categories of third parties with whom we share that personal information.
The specific pieces of personal information we collected about you (also called a data portability request).
If we sold or disclosed your personal information for a business purpose, two separate lists disclosing:
sales, identifying the personal information categories that each category of recipient purchased; and
disclosures for a business purpose, identifying the personal information categories that each category of recipient obtained.
Deletion Request Rights
You have the right to request that OnSolve delete any of your personal information that we collected from you and retained, subject to certain exceptions. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request (see Exercising Access, Data Portability, and Deletion Rights), we will delete (and direct our service providers to delete) your personal information from our records, unless an exception applies. We may deny your deletion request if retaining the information is necessary for us or our service provider(s) to:
1. Complete the transaction for which we collected the personal information, provide a good or service that you requested, take actions reasonably anticipated within the context of our ongoing business relationship with you, or otherwise perform our contract with you.
2. Detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, or prosecute those responsible for such activities.
3. Debug products to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality.
4. Exercise free speech, ensure the right of another consumer to exercise their free speech rights, or exercise another right provided for by law.
5. Comply with the California Electronic Communications Privacy Act (Cal. Penal Code § 1546
seq.
).
6. Engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, historical, or statistical research in the public interest that adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws, when the information's deletion may likely render impossible or seriously impair the research's achievement, if you previously provided informed consent.
7. Enable solely internal uses that are reasonably aligned with consumer expectations based on your relationship with us.
8. Comply with a legal obligation.
9. Make other internal and lawful uses of that information that are compatible with the context in which you provided it.
Exercising Access, Data Portability, and Deletion Rights
To exercise the access, data portability, and deletion rights described above, please submit a verifiable consumer request to us by either:
Calling us at 1-866-939-0911
Visiting our website at
onsolve.com
.
Emailing us at privacysupport@onsolve.com.
Only you, or someone legally authorized to act on your behalf, may make a verifiable consumer request related to your personal information. You may also make a verifiable consumer request on behalf of your minor child. You may only make a verifiable consumer request for access or data portability twice within a 12-month period. The verifiable consumer request must:
Provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected personal information or an authorized representative.
Describe your request with sufficient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate, and respond to it.
We cannot respond to your request or provide you with personal information if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm the personal information relates to you. Making a verifiable consumer request does not require you to create an account with us. However, we do consider requests made through your password protected account sufficiently verified when the request relates to personal information associated with that specific account. We will only use personal information provided in a verifiable consumer request to verify the requestor's identity or authority to make the request.
Response Timing and Format
We endeavor to respond to a verifiable consumer request within forty-five (45) days of its receipt. If we require more time, we will inform you of the reason and extension period in writing. If you have an account with us, we will deliver our written response to that account. If you do not have an account with us, we will deliver our written response by mail or electronically, at your option. Any disclosures we provide will only cover the 12-month period preceding the verifiable consumer request's receipt. The response we provide will also explain the reasons we cannot comply with a request, if applicable. For data portability requests, we will select a format to provide your personal information that is readily useable and should allow you to transmit the information from one entity to another entity without hindrance. We do not charge a fee to process or respond to your verifiable consumer request unless it is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded. If we determine that the request warrants a fee, we will tell you why we made that decision and provide you with a cost estimate before completing your request.
Non-Discrimination
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your CCPA rights. Unless permitted by the CCPA, we will not:
Deny you goods or services.
Charge you different prices or rates for goods or services, including through granting discounts or other benefits, or imposing penalties.
Provide you a different level or quality of goods or services.
Suggest that you may receive a different price or rate for goods or services or a different level or quality of goods or services.
However, we may offer you certain financial incentives permitted by the CCPA that can result in different prices, rates, or quality levels. Any CCPA-permitted financial incentive we offer will reasonably relate to your personal information's value and contain written terms that describe the program's material aspects. Participation in a financial incentive program requires your prior opt in consent, which you may revoke at any time.
Changes to Our Privacy Notice
OnSolve reserves the right to amend this Privacy Notice at our discretion and at any time. When we make changes to this Privacy Notice, we will post the updated Privacy Notice on our website and update the Privacy Notice's effective date. Your continued use of our Services following the posting of changes constitutes your acceptance of such changes.
Contact Information
If you have any questions or comments about this Privacy Notice, the ways in which OnSolve collects and uses your information as described herein and in OnSolve’s general
PrivacyPolicy
, your choices and rights regarding such use, or wish to exercise your rights under California law, please do not hesitate to contact us at:
Phone
: 1-866-939-0911
Website
:
www.onsolve.com
Email
:
legalrequests@onsolve.com
Postal Address
: OnSolve, LLC Attn. OnSolve Legal Team 780 W. Granada Blvd. Ormond Beach FL 32174
California Do-Not-Track
OnSolve does not track its customers over time and across third-party websites to provide targeted advertising and therefore does not respond to Do-Not-Track (DNT) signals.
ACCOUNTABILITY FOR ONWARD TRANSFER
Except as permitted or required by applicable law, if OnSolve transfers personal information provided by its Customers to a third party outside the European Economic Area (EEA), and in countries which are not subject to an adequacy decision by the European Commission and which may not provide for the same level of data protection as the EEA, we will ensure that the recipient of your Personal Data offers an adequate level of protection by entering into standard contractual clauses for the transfer of data as approved by the European Commission (Art. 46 GDPR) or we will ask you for your prior consent to such international data transfers. OnSolve reserves the right to transfer personal information in the event it sells or transfers all or a portion of its business or assets (including in the event of a reorganization, dissolution or liquidation).
CHOICE
The Service is not intended to transmit sensitive data, or personal health information, or financial-related information (including nonpublic information collected by financial institutions subject to regulations specific to the conduct of financial services) or other personal information sensitive in nature. We offer individuals the opportunity through a website we host to choose whether OnSolve may disclose their personal information to third parties (in addition to your local provider for use of the Services). Unless you elect to allow us to share your information, OnSolve will not use personal information for purposes beyond the scope for which the information was originally collected or subsequently authorized by the individual and we will not retain personal information for longer than necessary or as otherwise set forth in the applicable customer agreement. Individuals may contact OnSolve as indicated below regarding the use or disclosure of their personal information. If we process your Personal Data for the purpose of sending you marketing communications, you may manage your receipt of marketing and non-transactional communications from us by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link located on the bottom of our marketing emails, by replying or texting ‘STOP’ if you receive SMS communications or by turning off push notifications on our apps on your device. Additionally, you may unsubscribe by contacting OnSolve using the information in the “Contacting us” section, below. Please note that opting out of marketing communications does not opt you out of receiving important business communications related to your current relationship with us, such as communications about your subscriptions or event registrations, service announcements or security information.
DATA INTEGRITY
OnSolve depends on applicable customers and users of our Services to update and correct personal information, to the extent necessary, for the purposes for which the information was collected or subsequently authorized by the relevant individuals. With respect to personal information OnSolve may obtain directly from individuals through its Website, OnSolve takes reasonable steps to ensure that the personal information we process is (i) relevant for the purposes for which it was collected, (ii) reliable for its intended use, and (iii) accurate, complete and current. Individuals may contact OnSolve as indicated below to request that OnSolve update, correct or request deletion of their personal information. Individuals who seek access or who seek to correct, amend, or delete personal information that OnSolve maintains on behalf of a Customer in connection with the provision of its Services should make such requests directly to the appropriate customer. If an individual is unable to contact the appropriate customer, or does not obtain a response from the customer, OnSolve will provide reasonable assistance in forwarding the individual’s request to the customer. OnSolve may limit or deny access to personal information where providing such access is unreasonably burdensome or expensive under the circumstances, or as otherwise permitted by applicable law. Individuals may request access to their personal information by contacting OnSolve as indicated below.
Your Rights
You have certain rights relating to your Personal Data, subject to local data protection laws. Depending on the applicable laws and, in particular, if you are located in the EEA, these rights may include the right:
To access your Personal Data held by us (right to access);
To rectify inaccurate Personal Data and, taking into account the purpose of processing the Personal Data, ensure it is complete (right to rectification);
To erase/delete your Personal Data, to the extent permitted by applicable data protection laws (right to erasure; right to be forgotten);
To restrict our processing of your Personal Data, to the extent permitted by law (right to restriction of processing);
To transfer your Personal Data to another controller, to the extent possible (right to data portability);
To object to any processing of your Personal Data carried out on the basis of our legitimate interests (right to object). Where we process your Personal Data for direct marketing purposes or share it with third parties for their own direct marketing purposes, you can exercise your right to object at any time to such processing without having to provide any specific reason for such objection;
Not to be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling, which produces legal effects (“Automated Decision-Making”). Automated Decision-Making currently does not take place on our websites; and
To the extent we base the collection, processing and sharing of your Personal Data on your consent, to withdraw your consent at any time, without affecting the lawfulness of the processing based on such consent before its withdrawal.
If you are a resident of California, under the age of 18 and have registered for an account with us, you may ask us to remove content or information that you have posted to our websites. Please note that your request does not ensure complete or comprehensive removal of the content or information, because, for example, some of your content may have been reposted by another visitor to our websites. To exercise your rights, please contact us by submitting a request to
privacysupport@onsolve.com
. We respond to all legitimate requests within one month and we will contact you if we need additional information in order to honor your request. If your data has been submitted to us by an OnSolve customer for purposes of providing our services to that Customer and you wish to exercise any rights you may have under applicable data protection laws, please contact that customer directly. If you submit a request directly to us, please provide to us the name of the customer who submitted your data to us so that we are able to refer your request to that customer.
Changes to Privacy Notice
OnSolve will periodically review and update this Privacy Notice from time to time. OnSolve welcomes your comments regarding this Privacy Notice or the Services we provide. If you have any questions, please contact OnSolve by telephone, e-mail, or postal mail.
OnSolve Privacy Notice Contact Information:
OnSolve, LLC
Attn. OnSolve Legal Team
legalrequests@onsolve.com
1-866-939-0911 780 W. Granada Blvd. Ormond Beach FL 32174 We reserve the right to change or update this Privacy Policy.
OnSolve, LLC Terms of Use
For All Services
ONSOLVE, LLC, ("OnSolve"), welcomes you to its Website. Please review the following Terms of Use ("Terms") as well as OnSolve’s Privacy Policy (“Privacy Policy”) concerning your use of our website and all OnSolve products and services (collectively, the “Services”). By accessing, using or downloading any materials from the website or our Services, you agree to follow and be bound by these Terms and the Privacy Policy. If you do not agree with these Terms, please do not use this website or our Services. Please note that if you are a customer of OnSolve, these Terms are subject to the terms of any executed end user license agreement between the Customer and OnSolve. When using any of our Services, you will be governed by these Terms, the Privacy Policy, as well as any additional terms or guidelines applicable to the specific Services you use, which shall be posted from time to time below or in such Services. All additional terms or guidelines applicable to the specific Services, along with the Privacy Policy, shall be incorporated into these Terms.
Links and Third Party Publications.
This website may contain links to websites controlled by parties other than OnSolve. OnSolve is not responsible for and does not endorse or accept any responsibility for the contents or use of these third party websites. OnSolve is providing these links to you only as a convenience, and the inclusion of any link does not imply endorsement by OnSolve of the linked website. It is your responsibility to take precautions to ensure that whatever you select for your use is free of viruses or other items of a destructive nature. OnSolve has not co-authored, ratified, endorsed or adopted the information contained in any publications referenced on this website or any statistics published by third parties by publishing them on this website.
Software Use Restrictions
Any software that may be made available to download from this website or through the Services (“Software”) is the copyrighted work of OnSolve and/or Third-Party Providers. Use of the Software is governed by the terms of the end user license agreement that accompanies or is included with the Software (“License Agreement”). An end user agrees to the License Agreement terms by installing, copying or using the Software. The Software is made available for downloading solely for use by end users according to the License Agreement. Without limiting the foregoing, the copying or reproduction of the Software to any other server or location for further reproduction or redistribution is expressly prohibited. Any reproduction or redistribution of the Software not in accordance with the License Agreement is expressly prohibited by law, and may result in severe civil and criminal penalties. Violators will be prosecuted to the maximum extent possible. THE SOFTWARE IS WARRANTED, IF AT ALL, ONLY ACCORDING TO THE TERMS OF THE LICENSE AGREEMENT; ALL OTHER WARRANTIES ARE DISCLAIMED AS SET FORTH HEREIN.
Intellectual Property Rights
All materials provided on this website or in our Services, including but not limited to information, documents, products, logos, graphics, sounds, images, software and services (“Materials”), are provided either by OnSolve or by their respective third party manufacturers, authors, developers and vendors (“Third-Party Providers”) and are the copyrighted work of OnSolve and/or its Third-Party Providers. Except as stated herein, none of the Materials may be copied, reproduced, distributed, republished, downloaded, displayed, posted or transmitted in any form or by any means, including but not limited to electronic, mechanical, photocopying, recording or other means, without the prior express written permission of OnSolve or the Third-Party Provider. Also, you may not “mirror” any Materials without prior express written permission from OnSolve. Except where expressly provided otherwise by OnSolve, nothing on this website shall be construed to confer any license under any of OnSolve or any Third-Party Provider’s intellectual property rights, whether by estoppels, implication, or otherwise. You acknowledge sole responsibility for obtaining any such licenses. See the “Legal Contact Information” below if you have any questions about obtaining such licenses. Materials provided by Third-Party Providers have not been independently reviewed, tested, certified, or authenticated in whole or in part by OnSolve. OnSolve does not provide, sell, license or lease any of the Materials other than those specifically identified as being provided by OnSolve. OnSolve hereby grants you permission to display, distribute and download OnSolve Materials on this website provided that: (1) both the copyright notice identified below and this permission notice appear in the Materials; (2) the use of such Materials is solely for personal, non-commercial and informational use and will not be copied or posted on any networked computer, broadcast in any media or used for commercial gain; and (3) the Materials are not modified in any way. This permission terminates automatically without notice if you breach any of these terms or conditions. Upon termination, you will immediately destroy any downloaded or printed Materials. Any unauthorized use of any Materials contained on this website may violate copyright laws, trademark laws, the laws of privacy and publicity, and communications regulations and statutes. Elements of this website and our Services are protected by trade dress and other laws and may not be copied or imitated in whole or in part. No logo, graphic, sound or image from the website or our Services may be copied or retransmitted unless expressly permitted by OnSolve. OnSolve®, MIR3®, MIR3 IN®, MIR3 Intelligent Notification®, CodeRED®, CodeRED Weather Warning®, SmartNotice®, TelAlert®, Universal ANI®, Validata®, MyDailyCall®, CityWatch®, Code-ED®, One Call Now®, Send Word Now®, SWN Direct®, Alert Tracer®, WeatherBlast®, Message Builder®, Every Message Counts® and their associated logos and/or other OnSolve Services referenced herein are trademarks of OnSolve and may be registered in certain jurisdictions. All other product names, company names, marks, logos and symbols may be the trademarks of their respective owners.
Restricted Rights Legend
Any Software that is downloaded from this website or through the Services for or on behalf of the United States of America, its agencies and/or instrumentalities (“U.S. Government”), is provided with Restricted Rights. Use, duplication or disclosure by the U.S. Government is subject to restrictions as set forth in subparagraph (c)(1)(ii) of the Rights in Technical Data and Computer Software clause at DFARS 252.227-7013 or subparagraphs (c)(1) and (2) of the Commercial Computer Software – Restricted Rights at 48 CFR 52.227-19, as applicable.
Submissions
Except where expressly provided otherwise by OnSolve, all comments, feedback, information or materials submitted to OnSolve through or in association with this website and our Services (“Submissions”) shall be considered non-confidential and OnSolve property. By providing such Submissions to OnSolve, you agree to assign to OnSolve, at no charge, all worldwide rights, title and interest in copyrights and other intellectual property rights to the Submissions. OnSolve shall be free to use and/or disseminate such Submissions on an unrestricted basis for any purpose. You acknowledge that you are responsible for the Submissions that you provide, and that you, not OnSolve, have full responsibility for the Submissions, including their legality, reliability, appropriateness, originality and copyright.
Use
You represent and warrant that you will use this website and the Services only to evaluate the technology or in accordance with any end-user license agreements and solely for lawful purposes in accordance with the terms specified herein. You hereby certify you are authorized or otherwise have consent from all of the parties who will receive notifications in the Services. Further, you have determined the phone numbers to be notified exclude emergency numbers and other numbers that may not be called using an automated system under applicable law, and that cell phone numbers will only be called when the owner of the cell phone has granted permission to do so. By way of example, and not as limitation, you agree to: comply with all federal, state and local laws, including but not limited to, the Fair Debt Collection Practices Act, Federal Trade Commission (“FTC”), the Federal Communications Commission (“FCC”), the Telephone Consumer Protection Act, or any other federal or state regulatory authority, and that you will not, or allow any third party to: (i) engage in any illegal, unethical, deceptive or misleading practices in connection with the use of the Services, including but not limited to, creating a false identity or forged email, phone or message header or otherwise attempt to mislead others as to the identity of the sender or the origin of the message; (ii) use the Services in connection with any junk email, junk phone messages, spamming or any unsolicited messages (commercial or otherwise); (iii) violate any privacy laws, our Privacy Policy, your privacy policy or the privacy policies of any other third party; (iv) do anything that would justify a complaint to the FTC or FCC; (v) provide, or knowingly allow any third parties to provide, content or other material to be transmitted in connection with or through the Services which: (a) is defamatory, libelous, obscene, or pornographic; (b) transmit any material that contains viruses, worms, cancel bots or any other harmful code or computer programs; or (c) that otherwise violates any law, statute, ordinance or regulation, (including without limitation the laws and regulations governing export control). The Services may not be used for telemarketing or solicitation or any kind. You will defend, indemnify and hold harmless OnSolve and the Releasees from and against any and all claims arising out of or incurred as a result of any acts, omissions, and/or breaches of you or any third party you allow to use the Services. In the event OnSolve provides you with a demo of the Services, OnSolve shall have the right at any time and for any reason, with or without cause, to terminate your access to the demo.
Limitations
EXCEPT WHERE OTHERWISE EXPRESSLY PROVIDED BY ONSOLVE: YOU UNDERSTAND AND AGREE THAT ONSOLVE, ALONG WITH ITS OFFICERS, MEMBERS, EMPLOYEES, AGENTS, AFFILIATES, PARENTS, SUCCESSORS AND ASSIGNS (THE “RELEASEES”) DISCLAIM ANY AND ALL LIABILITY, WHATSOEVER, WHETHER RAISED BY A THIRD PARTY OR OTHERWISE, FOR ANY AND ALL REASONS, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO PERSONAL INJURY, DEATH OR LOSS, INFRINGEMENT, INVASION OF PRIVACY, PROPERTY DAMAGE, AND INTERRUPTION TO BUSINESS WHICH MAY RESULT FROM THE USE OR ANY ERRORS OR OMISSIONS OF THE SERVICES, OR FROM THE FAILURE TO UPDATE OR PROVIDE ANY INFORMATION THROUGH THE SERVICES. YOU AGREE, TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, TO RELEASE, WAIVE, DISCHARGE, COVENENANT NOT TO SUE, AND HOLD HARMLESS ANY AND ALL RELEASEES FROM ANY AND ALL LIABILITY, LOSS, DAMAGE OR COST OF EVERY KIND OR NATURE WHATSOEVER, WHETHER KNOWN OR UNKNOWN, AND FROM ANY AND ALL PRESENT AND FUTURE CLAIMS, DEMANDS, CAUSES OF ACTION, AND LAWSUITS, IN LAW OR EQUITY, BY YOU OR BY ANY OTHER PERSON OR PERSONS CLAIMING THROUGH YOU, FOR ANY LOSS, INFRINGEMENT OR INVASION OF THE RIGHT OF PRIVACY CAUSED OR CLAIMED TO HAVE BEEN CAUSED, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, BY YOUR USE OF THIS WEBSITE OR BY THE DISCLOSURE OF YOUR INFORMATION. YOU FURTHER AGREE TO INDEMNIFY EACH RELEASEE FROM AND AGAINST ANY LOSSES, DAMAGES, LIABILITIES, COSTS OR EXPENSES (INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION REASONABLE ATTORNEYS’ FEES AND OTHER LEGAL EXPENSES) OF ANY KIND ARISING FROM OR ATTRIBUTABLE TO (A) ANY BREACH OF THE TERMS BY YOU OR (B) ANY THIRD-PARTY CLAIM AGAINST A RELEASEE RELATING TO YOUR USE OF THIS WEBSITE OR THE SERVICES. ONSOLVE SHALL NOT BE LIABLE FOR ANY DAMAGES SUFFERED AS A RESULT OF USING, MODIFYING, CONTRIBUTING, COPYING, DISTRIBUTING OR DOWNLOADING THE MATERIALS. TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, IN NO EVENT SHALL ANY RELEASEE BE LIABLE FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES WHATSOEVER (INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO LOST PROFITS, LOSS OF PRIVACY, LOSS OF CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION, OR BUSINESS INTERRUPTION) FROM OR DUE TO THE USE, MISUSE OR INABILITY TO USE THE SERVICES, HOWEVER IT ARISES, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, NEGLIGENCE OR OTHER TORTIOUS ACTION, EVEN IF THE RELEASEES HAVE BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. YOU EXPRESSLY AGREE THAT THE USE OF THE SERVICES IS AT YOUR SOLE RISK AND THAT THE SERVICES ARE PROVIDED SOLELY ON AN “AS IS,” “AS AVAILABLE,” AND “WITH ALL FAULTS” BASIS. ONSOLVE AND ONSOLVE’S CUSTOMERS SHALL NOT BE LIABLE TO YOU FOR ANY DAMAGES WHETHER BASED IN CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER LEGAL THEORY BEYOND A REFUND OF SUBSCRIBER FEES (IF ANY). YOU HAVE SOLE RESPONSIBILITY FOR THE ADEQUATE PROTECTION AND BACKUP OF DATA AND/OR EQUIPMENT USED IN CONNECTION WITH THE WEBSITE AND SERVICES AND YOU WILL NOT MAKE A CLAIM AGAINST ONSOLVE FOR LOST DATA, RE-RUN TIME, INACCURATE OUTPUT, WORK DELAYS OR LOST PROFITS RESULTING FROM THE USE OF THE MATERIALS.
Disclaimer:
EXCEPT WHERE OTHERWISE EXPRESSLY PROVIDED BY ONSOLVE: TO THE EXTENT ALLOWABLE BY LAW, ONSOLVE EXPRESSLY DISCLAIMS ANY AND ALL WARRANTIES, DUTIES AND CONDITIONS OF ANY KIND, WHETHER EXPRESS, IMPLIED OR STATUTORY, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION ANY WARRANTIES, DUTIES OR CONDITIONS OF GOOD FAITH, REASONABLE CARE, MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, AVAILABILITY, ACCURACY, TITLE AND NON-INFRINGEMENT. ONSOLVE MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS, WARRANTIES, GUARANTIES OR CONDITIONS AS TO THE QUALITY, SUITABILITY, TRUTH, ACCURACY OR COMPLETENESS OF ANY OF THE MATERIALS CONTAINED ON THE WEBSITE.
Local Laws: Export Control
OnSolve controls and operates this website and its Services from its headquarters in various locations in the United States of America and makes no representation that the Materials are appropriate or available for use in other locations. If you use this website or the Services from other locations, you are responsible for compliance with applicable local laws including but not limited to the export and import regulations of other countries. Unless otherwise explicitly stated, all marketing or promotional materials found on this website are solely directed to individuals, companies or other entities located in the United States of America. You acknowledge and agree that Materials are subject to the U.S. Export Administration Laws and Regulations. Diversion of such Materials contrary to U.S. law is prohibited. You agree that none of the Materials, nor any direct product there from, is being or will be acquired for, shipped, transferred, or re-exported, directly or indirectly, to proscribed or embargoed countries or their nationals, nor be used for nuclear activities, chemical biological weapons or missile projects unless authorized by the U.S. Government. Proscribed countries are set forth in the U.S. Export Administration Regulations. Countries subject to U.S. embargo are: Cuba, Iran, Iraq, Libya, North Korea, Syria and the Sudan. This list is subject to change without further notice from OnSolve, and you must comply with the list, as it exists in fact. You certify that you are not on the U.S. Department of Commerce’s Denied Persons List or affiliated lists or on the U.S. Department of Treasury’s Specially Designated Nationals List. You agree to comply strictly with all U.S. export laws and assume sole responsibility for obtaining licenses to export or re-export as may be required.
General
You agree that any dispute arising under these Terms or the Privacy Policy shall be submitted to binding arbitration according to the rules and regulations of, and administered by, the American Arbitration Association, and that any award granted pursuant to such arbitration may be rendered to final judgment. If any dispute arises hereunder, the prevailing party shall be entitled to all costs and attorney’s fees from the losing party for enforcement of any right included in these Terms or Privacy Policy, whether in Arbitration, a Court of first jurisdiction and all Courts of Appeal. These Terms and the Privacy Policy shall be governed under the laws of Florida, without regards to conflict of law principles, and the venue for any disputes hereunder shall be in Ormond Beach, Volusia County, Florida, or the federal courts encompassing such venue. In the event any provision of these Terms or the Privacy Policy is determined by an arbitrator or court of competent jurisdiction to be void, the remaining provisions shall remain binding on the parties hereto with the same effect as though the void provision(s) had been limited or deleted, as applicable. Certain obligations set forth herein represent independent covenants by which you may be bound and shall remain bound regardless of any breach of these Terms and the Privacy Policy and shall survive termination of these Terms or your use of the Services. OnSolve may assign these Terms in its sole discretion. You are not permitted to assign these Terms without the prior, written consent of OnSolve. The failure by OnSolve to exercise or enforce any right or provision of these Terms shall not constitute a waiver of such right or provision. The section headings in these Terms are provided solely for the convenience of the reader and do not modify these. You understand and agree that OnSolve may send you communications, announcements, newsletters, service announcements and other administrative messages. These messages are separate from any messages sent by OnSolve’s customers. All notices or requests, demands and other communications hereunder shall be in writing, and shall be deemed delivered to the appropriate party upon: (a) personal delivery, if delivered by hand during ordinary business hours; (b) the day of delivery if sent by U.S. Mail, postage pre-paid; (c) the day of signed receipt if sent by certified mail, postage pre-paid, or other nationally recognized carrier, return receipt or signature provided and addressed to the OnSolve as follows: ONSOLVE, LLC, 780 W. Granada Boulevard, Ormond Beach, FL 32174 OnSolve reserves the right to modify any portion of these Terms or the Privacy Policy at any time by posting the revised Terms
here
. Your continued use of any of the Services following any such posting constitutes your acceptance of the revised Terms and Privacy Policy. Any rights not expressly granted herein are reserved by OnSolve.
Initiator Responsibilities (applicable only to Initiators)
Only authorized Initiators are permitted of issuing notifications through the Services, pursuant to OnSolve’s end-user licensing agreement. Initiator access to the Services is password protected, and Initiators are responsible for maintaining the security of their password at all times. All Initiators agree to contact OnSolve immediately upon receipt of any information or knowledge that an Initiator’s account or password has been compromised. OnSolve will assume that all use of the Services under an Initiator’s account is done with the Initiator’s consent and knowledge and each Initiator shall be responsible for any unauthorized access using its password caused through no fault of OnSolve. All Initiators agree to provide true, accurate and complete information for any Recipient (as hereinafter defined) information which is entered into the Services, and to maintain the accuracy of such information, and that the provision of such information does not invade on the privacy of any Recipient.
All Initiators acknowledge and agree that, by entering any contact information into any of the Services, the Recipient who owns such contact information has expressly authorized the Initiator to enter such information into the Services to receive pre-recorded messages from OnSolve and the customer with which such Initiator is associated via an automated dialer.
Initiators further agree that the Services are to be used solely as a notification tool and not as a life-saving or property-saving device. Initiators are not agents of OnSolve nor authorized to bind OnSolve to any obligations. All Initiators agree that they shall not indicate that OnSolve has endorsed the content of any notification sent through any of the Services.
Recipient Responsibilities (applicable only to Recipients)
A Recipient is any individual person capable of receiving notifications. Recipients include any telephone number, text address, email address, or address which has been registered into any of the Services. All Recipients who receive text notifications are subject to terms required by OnSolve’s texting provider, available
here;
such terms provide more information on texting options. Recipients understand and agree that they shall be connected to one or more of OnSolve’s customers. If a Recipient is added to the Service via opt-in or commercially available data sources, and is registered for geo-location notifications, the Recipient will be associated with any OnSolve customer that has access to the Recipient’s geo-located area. Each Recipient further understands and agrees that Initiators and OnSolve have the ability to modify and/or remove Recipient information from the Services. Such removal is at the sole discretion of the Initiator and OnSolve.
Recipients acknowledge and agree that, by registering with any of the Services, they consent to be contacted, using an automated dialer and a pre-recorded message, by OnSolve and OnSolve’s customers.
Recipients may request to stop receiving messages through the Services by removing their number through the registration page used to sign up for the Service, by contacting the phone number listed in such message, by contacting their local customer, by opting out on this website or by contacting OnSolve at 866-939-0911. Each Recipient understands and agrees that removing the Recipient through the registration page may not remove the Recipient from all of OnSolve’s databases if such Recipient’s information is available through a commercially available database, or later re-entered into the Service through a customer database. In certain instances, Recipients may be able to receive messages through the Services in languages which the Recipient selects. Messages will only be translated if designated for translation by OnSolve’s customer. Each Recipient understands and agrees that all messages will be input in English and translated by a third-party, and that the translations are provided “AS-IS” and “WITH ALL FAULTS.” Translation may be discontinued at any time. Each Recipient understands and agrees that the Services are subscription based-services which are only available if purchased by a customer or through one of OnSolve’s apps. Accordingly, your access to notifications sent through the Services may be terminated at any time, for any reason. EACH RECIPIENT ACKNOWLEDGES THAT ONSOLVE’S CUSTOMERS ARE PROVIDING THE SERVICES AS A PUBLIC AND/OR EMPLOYMENT RELATED SERVICE AND FOR NO COMPENSATION FROM RECIPIENT.
RECIPIENT ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE
CUSTOMER MAY, IN ITS SOLE DISCRETION, TERMINATE THE SERVICES AT ANY TIME. RECIPIENT ALSO ACKNOWLEDGES THAT TECHNICAL PROBLEMS OR HUMAN ERROR MAY RESULT IN A FAILURE OF THE SERVICES AT ANY TIME
. IN CONSIDERATION OF THESE FACTORS, RECIPIENT HEREBY WAIVES, RELEASES, AND HOLDS HARMLESS THE CUSTOMER, ONSOLVE, AND THEIR RESPECTIVE PARENTS AND SUBSIDIARIES, FROM ANY CLAIM ARISING FROM A FAILURE, FOR ANY REASON, TO PROVIDE THE SERVICES AND RECIPIENT FURTHER AGREES TO WAIVE, RELEASE, AND HOLD HARMLESS AGAINST ANY CLAIM FOR DIRECT, INCIDENTAL, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES ARISING FROM ANY ACT OR OMISSION OF ONSOLVE, ONSOLVE’S CUSTOMERS, OR THEIR RESPECTIVE PARENTS AND SUBSIDIARIES, EMPLOYEES, SERVICE PROVIDERS, VOLUNTEERS OR INITIATORS, IN CONNECTION WITH THE CUSTOMER’S PARTICIPATION IN THE SERVICES. Each Recipient understands and agrees that OnSolve does not have control over telephone service, cellular service and internet service providers which may be necessary for sending messages through the Services, and accordingly, not all calls, texts and other notifications may come through when an Initiator sends a message through the Services, and that such failure shall not be deemed to be the responsibility of OnSolve, any OnSolve customer or the Initiator sending such message. Each Recipient further understands and agrees that the receipt of messages through the Service may cause the Recipient to incur phone, text, and data charges, and that OnSolve is in no way responsible for such charges. In general, telephone, text, email or mobile communications are subject to numerous variables, and as such the dissemination of high volumes of high-speed automated notifications typically cannot reach 100% of all desired recipients. By agreeing to these Terms the Recipient acknowledges that transmission of information via telephone, text, email or mobile app is reliant upon conditions beyond OnSolve and OnSolve’s customers; OnSolve and OnSolve’s customers do not warrant that the issuance of a notification will result in a successful connection or in a delivered warning message to the Recipient. Recipients further agree that the Services are to be used solely as a notification tool and not as a life-saving or property-saving device. For Recipients, these Terms, including but not limited to any additional terms for the specific Services and the Privacy Policy, constitutes the entire agreement between you and OnSolve with respect to the Services and supersedes and replaces all prior or contemporaneous understandings or agreements, written or oral, regarding such subject matter. Any waiver of any provision of these Terms or Privacy Policy will be effective only if in writing and signed by OnSolve. Recipient data that OnSolve collects from you is kept in OnSolve custody unless: 1) OnSolve has notified you on a public registration page that your information shall be transferred an OnSolve customer; 2) you have elected to make your information public when signing up for the Services; 3) you are providing your information on a private registration page directly to an OnSolve customer; or 4) we have been provided with your information from a third party or one of OnSolve’s customers. In the event your information is being transferred to an OnSolve customer or you have elected to make your information public, OnSolve will have no control over the disclosure of your information. In these instances, your information may be subject to public records requests and transferred for any purpose without OnSolve’s knowledge. ONSOLVE SHALL HAVE NO LIABILITY TO YOU AS A RESULT OF A CUSTOMER’S TRANSFER OF YOUR INFORMATION. Any information which is not transferred to a customer as described above, and which is kept in OnSolve custody, is kept confidential and OnSolve will take reasonable and appropriate steps to protect the information that you share with us from unauthorized access or disclosure.
OnSolve does not sell, rent or lease information to third parties unless marked public or transferred to a customer, as described above.
CodeRED Weather Warning®, Weather Warning and FirstCall® Weather Additional Terms
As a CodeRED Weather Warning®, Weather Warning or FirstCall® Weather (collectively, the “Weather Services”) Recipient, you agree that you shall not directly or indirectly transmit, broadcast, redistribute, forward or deliver the Weather Services or any part of the data, information, images or other products which constitute the Weather Services to any other person or entity, in any format, or by any means. Official Watches, Warnings, Advisories and Bulletins communicated to Recipients are authored by the National Weather Service (“NWS”) or related government agencies. The authoring agency is solely responsible for the content and accuracy of the information contained in the Weather Services. IN NO WAY WILL ONSOLVE OR ANY OF ONSOLVE’S CUSTOMERS BE HELD LIABLE FOR INCOMPLETE OR INACCURATE INFORMATION CONTAINED IN ANY OF THE RETRANSMITTED INFORMATION. THE WEATHER SERVICES AND THEIR AFFILIATED SERVICES ARE FOR INFORMATIONAL PURPOSES ONLY - USE IS AT YOUR OWN RISK! RECIPIENTS AND THIRD PARTIES ARE SOLEY RESPONSIBLE FOR ACTIONS OR OMMISSIONS RESULTING IN THE LOSS OF LIFE OR PROPERTY.
CityWatch® and TelAlert® Additional Terms
CityWatch® and TelAlert® notifications are sent by hardware maintained by a customer or other third party. OnSolve and OnSolve’s customers shall have no liability for the failure of a Recipient to receive notifications from a CityWatch® or TelAlert® customer by reason of a hardware failure, including but not limited to third party failures or acts of God that affect customer hardware.
MyDailyCall® Additional Terms
MyDailyCall® Recipients must have a touchtone telephone with touchtone service and no call blocking services. At time of the automated call, the Recipient must be able to press the specified digits to acknowledge receipt of the MyDailyCall®. In the event the Recipient does not press the specified digits, Recipient’s alternate phone number (if any) will be dialed. In the event there is no alternate phone number, or the specified digits are not pressed on the alternate phone number, the customer will be notified. An Initiator associated with such customer will then determine whether to call Recipient’s emergency contact or request immediate emergency services for the Recipient. Recipient must notify the customer twenty four (24) hours in advance if they will not be available to receive the scheduled calls. RECIPIENT FULLY UNDERSTANDS AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT EMPLOYEES AND AGENTS OF THE
CUSTOMER
MAY BE REQUIRED TO MAKE FORCIBLE ENTRY, OR REQUEST THE AUTHORITIES TO MAKE FORCIBLE ENTRY, TO RECIPIENT’S RESIDENCE IF RECIPIENT FAILS TO RESPOND TO A MYDAILYCALL®. RECIPIENT AGREES TO HOLD HARMLESS THE CUSTOMER, ANY AUTHORITIES, AND THEIR RESPECTIVE EMPLOYEES, AGENTS AND INITIATORS
SHOULD FORCIBLE ENTRY BE REQUIRED
IF OTHER REASONABLE MEASURES TO DETERMINE RECIPIENT’S STATUS HAVE BEEN EXHAUSTED OR ARE UNAVAILABLE.
MyDailyCall® Recipients acknowledge that OnSolve may transfer their Recipient information to the customer to which they subscribed in order to conduct safety checks on the Recipient, and that the MyDailyCall® service is intended to be used as part of a comprehensive strategy, which includes periodic live visits to Recipients as well as the use of common sense.
Mobile Applications Terms of Use
All of OnSolve’s Mobile Applications (each an “App” and collectively, the “Apps”) may only be used by individuals aged 13 years or older. In the event you are older than 13, but are not legally considered an adult, you are requested to have your parent or legal guardian review these Mobile Applications Terms of Use with you to make sure you understand your agreements under the Terms. All Apps and all graphics, services, logos, sounds, images, software, and intellectual property therein (the “App Materials”) are owned and provided by OnSolve or its affiliates, authors, developers and vendors, and may not be copied, reproduced, distributed, republished, transmitted, downloaded, photocopied, recorded or otherwise transferred or duplicated without the express permission of OnSolve. Using any App does not give you the right to use any of the App Materials, trade names, trademarks, service marks, logos or other brand features except in association with your personal use of the App in accordance with the Terms. All Apps are designed for informational, non-commercial purposes only; the Apps are not life-saving devices, and cannot be relied upon in the event of an emergency. You further understand and agree that the alerts sent through the Apps are sent by third parties who are in no way related to OnSolve, that OnSolve does not verify the accuracy of the information contained in the alerts, and that OnSolve is in no way responsible for the content of such alerts.
Social Media Terms of Use
Social media engagement makes OnSolve a better company by allowing us to engage in conversation with customers, Initiators, Recipients and other members of the community, as well as offer them valuable information and resources. OnSolve reserves the right to moderate comments in accordance with OnSolve policies. All social media comments and messages exchanged with OnSolve are public record. OnSolve operates 24 hours a day, 7 days a week and 365 days a year. Our designated response times for comments on any social media site are between Monday through Friday, 9 a.m. and 5 p.m. United States Eastern Time Zone, excluding holidays. OnSolve is not responsible for any content posted by visitors, including posts made by employees or individuals who are not authorized administrators of our sites. Content posted by visitors does not necessarily represent the views or positions of OnSolve. OnSolve expects all conversation on our social media sites to follow the rules of polite discourse. We ask all commenters to respect the thoughts, ideas and beliefs of each other and our team members. It is important that all participants treat each other with respect. Comments will be monitored and may be subject to removal for any reason in OnSolve’s sole discretion. OnSolve may also remove comments if they meet any of the following qualities: advocating illegal activities; threats of physical harm; language that is obscene or abusive; discriminatory language on the basis of race, gender, ethnicity, nationality, sexual orientation, disability, age, religion, gender identity or expression; or promoting products or services. Comments that are clearly spam or stray from the designated topic may also be subject to removal. OnSolve may also remove comments that contain Services requests, so that these may be responded to on a one-on-one basis in lieu of a public response. OnSolve respects the intellectual property of others, and we ask visitors of our social media sites to do the same. For any content you post on OnSolve social media sites, you authorize that it is your own original work or that you have all the rights to any third party content contained in such post. Visitors to our social media sites grant non-exclusive, irrevocable, royalty-free license to the rest of the world for their submissions to OnSolve, whether on a social media site or otherwise, and any such submissions may be used, re-used, re-printed, or transmitted in any format and on any media, by OnSolve. If you believe your work has been copied in a way that constitutes IP infringement, please contact us.
See All Resources
See All Blog Articles
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.onsolve.com/politique-de-confidentialite-donsolve-llc/:
Skip to content
ÉNONCÉ DE CONFIDENTIALITÉ ONSOLVE, LLC
ONSOLVE, LLC (« OnSolve ») est fermement déterminé à protéger votre vie privée. Cet Énoncé de confidentialité détaille nos politiques en matière de protection de la vie privée quand vous naviguez sur notre site internet ou que vous utilisez n’importe lequel de nos produits, applications ou services (appelés collectivement les « Services »). Notre mission lors du déploiement de cet Énoncé de confidentialité est de protéger vos informations confidentielles et de ne les utiliser que pour vous offrir les services de la plus grande qualité possible. Nous accordons la plus grande importance à la protection et à la sécurité de vos informations confidentielles. AUCUNE partie de vos informations confidentielles ne sera vendue, louée ou échangée à une tierce partie sans votre consentement, à l’exception de celui inclus dans cet Énoncé. Nous accordons une grande importance à la confiance que vous accordez à OnSolve. Nous sommes déterminés à vous offrir un site internet doté d’un environnement sécuritaire et d’un service à la clientèle incomparable.
Cet Énoncé de confidentialité décrit l’information que nous colligeons et la manière dont nous l’utilisons. Les conditions additionnelles qui s’appliquent à l’utilisation de nos services sont décrites dans l’accord pertinent intervenu entre OnSolve (ou sa filiale) et vous. À titre d’agent qui traite des données confidentielles au nom de ses clients, OnSolve ne possède pas et ne contrôle pas les données confidentielles qu’il traite au nom de ses clients et n’a pas de relation directe avec tous les individus dont les données confidentielles pourront être traitées en lien avec nos Services. Compte tenu de ces circonstances, les clients d’OnSolve sont tenu d’informer adéquatement les individus concernés et d’obtenir les consentements nécessaires.
Pourquoi colligeons-nous de l’information?
En général, nous colligeons de l’information en appui à nos initiatives de marketing et de promotion, pour analyser le comportement des utilisateurs, et pour personnaliser et améliorer nos Services. Cette information est utilisée pour aider OnSolve à vous servir quand vous visitez un de nos sites internet ou utilisez n’importe lequel de nos Services. Notre objectif est de vous offrir un service personnalisé, notamment en recherchant constamment à améliorer nos Services et en rehaussant votre expérience sur nos sites internet.
Quelles informations colligeons-nous?
Le type d’information que nous colligeons pourra varier selon que vous vous inscrivez pour recevoir des notifications, que vous utilisez nos Services, que vous communiquez avec le service à la clientèle ou que vous visitez simplement notre site internet. Au moment de ces différentes activités, nous colligeons vos coordonnées, ce qui inclut votre adresse de courriel, votre adresse postale, vos numéros de téléphone et/ou les informations de votre appareil sans fil. Cette information sera utilisée pour vous offrir nos Services.
Si vous ne faites que visiter notre site internet (sans remplir de formulaire), nous ne colligerons aucune donnée permettant de vous identifier personnellement, mais des données concernant vos activités (par exemple, les pages vues, la date et l’heure de votre visite, l’emplacement fourni par votre adresse IP ou votre GPS) sont colligées. Nous pourrons utiliser ces informations pour améliorer nos Services, obtenir des données à des fins d’étude de marché, ou pour mieux comprendre comment nos Services sont généralement utilisés.
Nous ne colligeons intentionnellement aucune information personnelle d’individus dont nous savons qu’ils sont âgés de moins de dix-huit (18) ans. Si vous nous fournissez vos informations, vous confirmez et certifiez que : (i) vous avez au moins dix-huit (18) ans; (ii) ou, si vous fournissez les informations d’un enfant de moins dix-huit (18) ans afin de recevoir des notifications, que vous êtes le parent ou le tuteur légal de cet enfant; que vous avez plus de dix-huit (18) ans; et que vous avez l’autorité juridique de fournir des informations pour que cet enfant soit contacté par le biais de nos Services.
Avec qui partageons-nous ces informations?
Les informations pourront être partagées, au besoin, avec nos affiliés et nos fournisseurs de services à des fins d’affaires, notamment pour notre offre de Services, pour la gestion des comptes, pour le service à la clientèle, pour le traitement des transactions, pour le traitement et la livraison des extraits de comptes, et la recherche et l’analyse. Les clients avec qui nous entretenons une relation contractuelle peuvent prendre connaissance de leurs informations confidentielles par le biais de nos Services. Par le biais de ces relations contractuelles, nous demandons à nos clients et à nos fournisseurs de services d’assurer un niveau de protection des informations confidentielles comparables à nos propres pratiques.
Nous pourrons partager des statistiques cumulatives concernant le comportement des usagers (par ex. les clients, les habitudes de navigation, etc.) avec nos partenaires. Ces informations cumulatives n’identifieront aucun individu personnellement et ne contiendront aucune information personnelle identifiable.
Notre politique est d’informer les individus qui utilisent nos Services de toute requête pour obtenir leurs informations confidentielles avant de les dévoiler, à moins que cela nous soit interdit par la loi ou lors de circonstances exceptionnelles, comme lors d’urgences.
Précautions de sécurité
Nous avons mis en place des mesures de sécurité strictes pour prévenir la perte, le mauvais usage et l’altération des informations que nous contrôlons. Nous utilisons une technologie sécuritaire, des contrôles de protection de la vie privée et des restrictions sur l’accès des employés pour protéger vos informations; toutefois, de par la nature même d’internet, il est impossible de garantir la sécurité des données transmises.
Comment utilisons-nous les témoins?
Comme plusieurs autres sites internet, notre site Web utilise des témoins et des technologies similaires comme des pixels espions, des balises et JavaScript, seuls ou en combinaison avec des témoins, pour compiler de l’information concernant l’utilisation de nos sites internet et l’interaction avec les courriels que nous vous envoyons. Si vous ne souhaitez pas que ce site installe un témoin dans votre navigateur et suive votre activité, vous pouvez quitter le site ou le visiter en utilisant
le mode vie privée de votre navigateur
. Pour savoir comment utiliser le mode vie privée, veuillez vous référer aux liens ci-dessous, en fonction du navigateur que vous utilisez.
Mode En privé de Microsoft Internet Explorer
Mode Incognito de Google Chrome
Mode Navigation privée de Mozilla FireFox
Mode Navigation privée d’Apple Safari
Alerte de suivi pour la Californie
OnSolve ne suit pas ses clients dans le temps et sur les sites internet de tierces parties pour fournir des publicités ciblées et ne répond donc pas aux signaux d’alerte.
RESPONSABILITÉ DU TRANSFERT ULTÉRIEUR
Sauf si cela est permis ou exigé par la loi applicable, si OnSolve transfert des informations confidentielles fournies par ses Clients à une tierce partie à l’extérieur de l’Espace économique européen, et dans des pays qui ne sont pas assujettis à une décision d’adéquation de la Commission européenne, et qui ne sont possiblement pas en mesure d’offrir le même niveau de protection des données que l’Espace économique européen, nous nous assurerons que le récipiendaire de vos informations confidentielles offrira un niveau adéquat de protection en concluant un accord normal de transfert de données tel qu’approuvé par la Commission européenne (Art. 46 du RGPD) ou nous vous demanderons votre permission avant tout transfert international de données du genre. OnSolve se réserve le droit de transférer des informations confidentielles dans l’éventualité où elle vend ou transfert la totalité ou une portion ses activités ou de ses avoirs (y compris dans l’éventualité d’une réorganisation, d’une dissolution ou d’une liquidation).
CHOIX
Le Service n’a pas comme objectif de transférer des données sensibles, ou des informations de santé personnelles, ou des informations financières (y compris des informations non publiques colligées par des institutions financières assujetties aux règlements spécifiques à la conduite de services financiers) ou d’autres informations personnelles sensibles.
Nous offrons aux individus l’opportunité, par le biais d’un site internet que nous hébergeons, de décider si OnSolve pourra divulguer leurs informations confidentielles à des tierces parties (en plus de votre fournisseur local pour l’utilisation des Services). À moins que vous ne choisissiez de nous permettre de partager votre information, OnSolve n’utilisera pas d’informations confidentielles à des fins dépassant le but pour lequel les informations ont été colligées à l’origine, ou subséquemment autorisé par l’individu, et ne détiendra aucune information confidentielle plus longtemps que nécessaire, ou tel que stipulé dans l’accord applicable avec le client. Les individus peuvent communiquer avec OnSolve tel que décrit ci-dessous concernant l’utilisation ou la divulgation de leurs informations confidentielles.
Si nous traitons vos informations confidentielles dans le but de vous envoyer des communications de marketing, vous pouvez gérer votre réception des communications de marketing et non transactionnelles provenant de nous en cliquant le lien « se désabonner » au bas des courriels de marketing, en répondant ou en textant « STOP » si vous recevez un texto ou en éteignant les notifications poussées de nos applications sur votre appareil. De plus, vous pouvez vous désabonner en communiquant avec OnSolve à l’aide de l’information contenue dans la section « Communiquez avec nous », ci-dessous. Veuillez noter qu’un désabonnement de nos communications de marketing ne vous désabonne pas de la réception de communications d’affaires importantes concernant votre relation actuelle avec nous, notamment des communications concernant vos abonnements ou vos inscriptions à des événements, des annonces touchant les services, ou des informations de sécurité.
INTÉGRITÉ DES DONNÉES
OnSolve dépend des clients et utilisateurs applicables de nos Services pour mettre à jour et corriger les informations confidentielles, lorsque cela est nécessaire, aux fins desquelles l’information a été colligée ou subséquemment autorisée par les individus appropriés.
Concernant les informations confidentielles qu’OnSolve pourra obtenir des individus par le biais de son site internet, OnSolve prend des mesures raisonnables pour assurer les informations confidentielles que nous traitons sont (i) pertinentes aux fins auxquelles elles ont été colligées, (ii) fiables pour leur utilisation prévue, et (iii) précises, complètes et actualisées. Les individus peuvent communiquer avec OnSolve tel qu’indiqué ci-dessous pour demander qu’OnSolve mette à jour ou corrige leurs informations confidentielles, ou pour demander qu’elles soient effacées. Les individus qui demandent un accès ou qui demandent une correction, une modification ou la destruction des informations confidentielles qu’OnSolve détient au nom d’un Client en lien avec ses Services devraient adresser de telles requêtes au client approprié. Si un individu est incapable de communiquer avec le client approprié, ou qu’il n’obtient pas de réponse du client, OnSolve offrira une aide raisonnable pour transmettre la requête de l’individu au client.
OnSolve pourra limiter ou refuser l’accès à des informations confidentielles si un tel accès présente un fardeau déraisonnable ou dispendieux selon les circonstances, ou tel que cela est permis par la loi applicable. Les individus pourront demander un accès à leurs informations confidentielles en communiquant avec OnSolve tel que décrit ci-dessous.
Vos droits
Vous détenez certains droits concernant vos informations confidentielles, en vertu des lois locales sur la protection des données. Dépendant des lois applicables et, plus précisément, si vous êtes sur le territoire de l’Espace économique européen, ces droits peuvent inclure le droit :
De consulter les informations confidentielles que nous détenons (droit d’accès)
De rectifier des informations confidentielles inexactes et, en tenant compte de l’objectif du traitement des informations confidentielles, de vérifier qu’elles sont complètes (droit de rectification)
D’effacer/détruire vos informations confidentielles, dans la mesure permise par les lois applicables de protection des données (droit d’effacer; droit d’être oublié)
De limiter notre traitement de vos informations confidentielles, dans la mesure permise par la loi (droit de limiter le traitement)
De transférer vos informations confidentielles à un autre contrôleur, dans la mesure où cela est possible (droit de portabilité des données)
De vous opposer à tout traitement de vos informations confidentielles effectué en vertu de nos intérêts légitimes (droit d’opposition) Lorsque nous traitons vos informations confidentielles à des fins de marketing direct ou que nous les partageons avec des tierces parties à leurs propres fins de marketing direct, vous pouvez faire valoir votre droit d’opposition à un tel traitement à tout moment sans devoir fournir de raison spécifique à votre opposition.
De ne pas être assujetti à une décision basée uniquement sur un processus automatisé, y compris le profilage, qui a des conséquences juridiques (« Prise de décision automatisée ») La prise de décision automatisée ne se produit actuellement pas sur nos sites internet; et
Dans la mesure où nous effectuons la collecte et le partage de vos informations confidentielles en vertu de votre consentement, de retirer ce consentement à tout moment, sans impact sur la légalité du traitement effectué en vertu du consentement avant son retrait.
Si vous êtes un résidant de la Californie, que vous avez moins de 18 ans et que vous avez créé un compte avec nous, vous pouvez nous demander de retirer le contenu ou l’information que vous avez mise en ligne sur nos sites internet. Veuillez noter que votre requête ne garantit pas un retrait complet ou total du contenu et des informations, puisque, par exemple, une partie de votre contenu pourra avec été remis en ligne par un visiteur de nos sites internet.
Pour faire valoir vos droits, veuillez communiquer avec nous en soumettant une requête à
privacysupport@onsolve.com
. Nous répondons à toutes les requêtes légitimes du genre en moins d’un mois et nous communiquerons avec vous si nous avons besoin de plus d’informations pour respecter votre demande.
Si vos données nous ont été remises par un client d’OnSolve afin de fournir nos services à ce Client et que vous désirez exercer tous les droits que vous détenez en vertu des lois applicables de protection des données, veuillez communiquer avec le client directement. Si vous nous soumettez directement une requête, veuillez nous fournir le nom du client qui nous a remis vos données afin que nous puissions transférer votre requête à ce client.
Changements à l’Énoncé de confidentialité
OnSolve révisera et mettra périodiquement à jour cet Énoncé de confidentialité, de temps à autre.
OnSolve apprécie vos commentaires concernant cet Énoncé de confidentialité et les Services que nous offrons. Si vous avez des questions, veuillez communiquer avec OnSolve par téléphone, courriel, ou courrier postal.
Coordonnées
OnSolve, LLC
OnSolve Legal Team
legalrequests@onsolve.com
1-866-939-0911
780 W. Granada Blvd. Ormond Beach FL 32174
ONSOLVE, LLC
a/s : avocat général
780 W. Granada Boulevard, Ormond Beach, Florida 32174 1-866-939-0911
legalrequests@onsolve.com
Nous nous réservons le droit de modifier ou de mettre à jour cet Énoncé de confidentialité.
Conditions d’utilisation OnSolve, LLC
Pour tous les services
ONSOLVE, LLC, (« OnSolve ») vous accueille sur son site internet. Veuillez prendre connaissance des Conditions d’utilisation suivantes (« Conditions ») ainsi que de l’Énoncé de confidentialité d’OnSolve (« Énoncé ») concernant votre utilisation de notre site internet et de tous les produits et services d’OnSolve (collectivement, les « Services »). En faisant appel, en utilisant ou en téléchargeant tout contenu du site internet ou nos Services, vous acceptez de respecter et d’être contraint par ces Conditions et l’Énoncé de confidentialité. Si vous n’êtes pas en accord avec ces Conditions, veuillez ne pas utiliser ce site internet ou nos Services. Veuillez noter que si vous êtes un client d’OnSolve, ces Conditions sont assujetties aux conditions de tout contrat de licence d’utilisateur final intervenu entre le client et OnSolve. Lorsque vous utilisez un de nos Services, vous serez encadré par ces Conditions, l’Énoncé de confidentialité, et toutes autres conditions ou lignes directrices additionnelles applicables aux Services spécifiques que vous utilisez, qui seront affichées ci-dessous de temps à autre ou dans les Services concernés. Toutes autres conditions ou lignes directrices applicables aux Services spécifiques, en plus de l’Énoncé de confidentialité, seront intégrées à ces Conditions.
Liens et publications par une tierce partie
Ce site internet peut contenir des liens vers des sites internet contrôlés par des entités autres que OnSolve. OnSolve n’est pas responsable, n’endosse pas et n’accepte aucune responsabilité pour les contenus ou l’utilisation des sites internet de ces tierces parties. OnSolve vous propose ces liens uniquement pour vous rendre service, et l’inclusion de tout lien n’inclut pas un endossement par OnSolve du site internet lié. Vous êtes responsable de prendre les précautions nécessaires pour vous assurer que ce que vous choisissez d’utiliser est libre de virus ou d’autres items potentiellement destructeurs. OnSolve n’a pas co-créé, ratifié, endossé ou adopté l’information contenue dans toute publication évoquée sur ce site internet ou toutes statistiques publiées par une tierce partie en les publiant sur ce site internet.
Restrictions à l’utilisation du logiciel
Tout logiciel disponible pour téléchargement depuis ce site internet ou par le biais des Services (« Logiciel ») est l’œuvre protégée par droit d’auteur d’OnSolve et/ou de prestataires tiers. L’utilisation du Logiciel est régie par les conditions du contrat de licence d’utilisateur final qui accompagne ou qui est inclus avec le Logiciel (« Contrat de licence »). Un utilisateur final accepte les conditions du Contrat de licence en installant, en copiant ou en utilisant le Logiciel. Ce Logiciel est disponible pour téléchargement uniquement pour l’utilisation des utilisateurs finaux en respect avec le Contrat de licence. Sans limiter ce qui précède, la copie ou la reproduction du Logiciel vers tout autre serveur ou emplacement pour reproduction ou redistribution est formellement interdite. Toute reproduction ou redistribution du Logiciel ne respectant pas la Condition de licence est formellement interdite par la loi, et peut engendrer de graves pénalités civiles et criminelles. Les contrevenants seront poursuivis dans toute la mesure possible. CE LOGICIEL EST GARANTI, S’IL L’EST, SEULEMENT EN RESPECT AVEC LES CONDITIONS DU CONTRAT DE LICENCE; TOUTES LES AUTRES GARANTIES SONT DÉCRITES TEL QUE PRÉSENTÉES DANS CE DOCUMENT.
Droits de propriété intellectuelle
Tout le matériel fourni sur ce site internet ou dans nos Services, y compris mais sans se limiter à l’information, aux documents, aux produits, aux logos, aux graphiques, aux sons, aux images, aux logiciels et aux services (« Matériel ») sont offerts par OnSolve ou par leurs fabricants, auteurs, développeurs et vendeurs tiers respectifs (« Prestataires tiers ») et sont la propriété intellectuelle d’OnSolve et/ou de ses Prestataires tiers. Excepté tel que présenté dans ce document, aucun Matériel ne peut être copié, reproduit, distribué, republié, téléchargé, présenté, affiché ou transmis sous quelque format et de quelque façon que ce soit, y compris mais sans s’y limiter aux méthodes électroniques, mécaniques, de photocopie, d’enregistrement et autres, sans le consentement préalable explicite écrit d’OnSolve ou du Prestataire tiers. De plus, vous ne pouvez pas produire une « image miroir » de tout Matériel sans le consentement préalable explicite écrit d’OnSolve. Sauf là où l’inverse est expressément stipulé par OnSolve, rien de ce qui se trouve sur ce site internet ne sera interprété comme octroyant toute licence en vertu des droits de propriété intellectuelle d’OnSolve ou de tout Prestataire tiers, que ce soit par estoppels, implication, ou autrement. Vous acceptez la seule responsabilité d’obtenir de telles licences. Consultez les « Coordonnées du service juridique » ci-dessous si vous avez des questions concernant l’obtention de ces licences. Le contenu fourni par des Prestataires tiers n’a pas été indépendamment révisé, testé, certifié ou authentifié, en tout ou en partie, par OnSolve. OnSolve ne fournit pas, ne vend pas, ne licence pas et ne loue pas ce Matériel à part celui identifié spécifiquement comme étant fourni par OnSolve. OnSolve vous octroie ici la permission de présenter, distribuer ou télécharger le Matériel d’OnSolve sur ce site internet, pourvu que : (1) l’avis de droit d’auteur identifié ci-dessous et cette permission soient inclus dans le Matériel; (2) l’utilisation de ce Matériel soit uniquement à des fins personnelles, non commerciales et informatives, et qu’il ne soit pas copié ou affiché sur un ordinateur en réseau, diffusé par tout média ou utilisé à des fins commerciales; et (3) que le Matériel ne soit modifié d’aucune manière. Cette permission prend automatiquement fin, sans préavis, si vous contrevenez à n’importe laquelle de ces conditions. Au moment de la résiliation, vous devez immédiatement détruire tout Matériel téléchargé ou imprimé. Toute utilisation non autorisée du Matériel contenu sur ce site internet peut contrevenir aux lois sur la propriété intellectuelle, aux lois sur la marque, aux lois sur la confidentialité et la publicité, et aux règlements et statuts de communication.
Des éléments de ce site internet et de nos Services sont protégés par les lois sur la présentation commerciale et autres, et ne peuvent pas être copiés ou imités en totalité ou en partie. Aucun logo, graphique, son ou image du site internet ne peut être copié ou retransmis sans la permission explicite d’OnSolve. OnSolve®, MIR3®, MIR3 IN®, MIR3 Intelligent Notification®, CodeRED®, CodeRED Weather Warning®, SmartNotice®, TelAlert®, Universal ANI®, Validata®, MyDailyCall®, CityWatch®, Code-ED®, One Call Now®, Send Word Now®, SWN Direct®, Alert Tracer®, WeatherBlast®, Message Builder®, Every Message Counts® et leurs logos associés et/ou les Services d’OnSolve mentionnés dans ce document sont des marques de commerce d’OnSolve et peuvent être enregistrées dans certaines juridictions. Tous les autres noms de produits, noms de compagnies, marques, logos et symboles sont potentiellement la propriété intellectuelle de leurs propriétaires respectifs.
Légende des droits restreints
Tout logiciel téléchargé à partir de ce site internet ou par le biais des Services pour ou au nom des États-Unis d’Amérique, ses agences et/ou ses instruments (« Gouvernement américain ») est offert avec des droits restreints. L’utilisation, la reproduction ou le dévoilement par le Gouvernement américain sont assujettis aux restrictions stipulées dans le sous-paragraphe (c)(1)(ii) de la clause Rights in Technical Data and Computer Software au DFARS 252.227-7013 ou les sous-paragraphes (c)(1) et (2) du Commercial Computer Software – Restricted Rights au 48 CFR 52.227-19, tel qu’applicable.
Soumissions
Sauf là où cela est expressément stipulé autrement par OnSolve, tous les commentaires, rétroactions, informations et matériels fournis à OnSolve par ou en association avec ce site internet et nos services (« Soumissions ») seront considérés non confidentiels et comme étant la propriété d’OnSolve. En fournissant de telles Soumissions à OnSolve, vous acceptez de confier à OnSolve, gratuitement, tous les droits, titres et intérêts mondiaux concernant les droits d’auteur et autres droits de propriété intellectuelle concernant les Soumissions. OnSolve aura la liberté d’utiliser et/ou de disséminer de telles Soumissions sans aucune restriction, à quelque fin que ce soit. Vous reconnaissez que vous êtes responsable des Soumissions que vous fournissez et que vous, et non pas OnSolve, avez la pleine responsabilité des Soumissions, y compris leur légalité, leur fiabilité, leur originalité, leur caractère approprié et leurs droits d’auteur.
Utilisation
Vous déclarez et garantissez que vous utiliserez ce site internet et les Services uniquement pour évaluer la technologie ou en respect avec tout Contrat de licence de l’utilisateur final et uniquement à des fins légales en respect avec les conditions spécifiées dans ce document. Vous garantissez par la présente que vous êtes autorisé ou détenez la permission de toutes les parties qui recevront des notifications dans les Services. De plus, vous avez déterminé que les numéros de téléphone qui seront contactés excluent les numéros d’urgence et autres numéros qui ne doivent pas être appelés avec un système automatisé selon la loi applicable, et que les téléphones cellulaires seront appelés seulement si cela a été autorisé par le propriétaire du téléphone. À titre d’exemple, et non de limitation, vous acceptez de : respecter toutes les lois fédérales, d’État et locales, y compris mais sans s’y limiter : la Fair Debt Collection Practices Act, la Federal Trade Commission (« FTC »), la Federal Communications Commission (« FCC »), le Telephone Consumer Protection Act, ou toute autre agence réglementaire fédérale ou d’État, et que vous ne commettrez pas les gestes suivants, et ne permettrez pas à une tierce partie de : (i) adopter des pratiques illégales, non éthiques ou trompeuses en lien avec l’utilisation des Services, y compris mais sans s’y limiter, en créant une fausse identité ou un courriel, un appel téléphonique ou un titre de courriel contrefait ou en tentant de toute autre manière de leurrer les autres quant à l’identité de l’expéditeur ou le lieu d’origine du message; (ii) utiliser les Services en lien avec des pourriels, des messages téléphoniques de masse, du pollupostage et tout message non sollicité (commercial ou autre); (iii) contrevenir aux lois de protection de la vie privée, notre Énoncé de confidentialité, votre Énoncé de confidentialité ou les Énoncés de confidentialité de toute tierce partie; (iv) poser quelque geste qui mériterait une plainte à la FTC ou la FCC; (v) fournir, ou permettre en toute connaissance de cause à une tierce partie de fournir, du contenu ou d’autre matériel en lien avec ou par le biais des Services qui : (a) est diffamatoire, obscène ou pornographique; (b) transmettre tout matériel contenant des virus, des vers, des robots d’annulation ou tout autre code ou programme informatique nuisible; ou (c) qui contrevient autrement à toute loi, statut, décret ou règles (y compris mais sans s’y limiter les lois et règles qui encadrent le contrôle des exportations). Les Services ne doivent pas être utilisés à quelque fin que ce soit de télémarketing ou de sollicitation. Vous défendrez, indemniserez et tiendrez indemne et à couvert OnSolve et les Renonciataires de toute et contre toute réclamation découlant ou résultant de tout geste, omissions et/ou brèches dont vous serez responsable ou toute tierce partie que vous avez autorisée à utiliser les Services. Dans le cas où OnSolve vous fournit une démonstration des Services, OnSolve aura le droit, à tout moment et pour toute raison, avec ou sans cause, de mettre fin à votre accès à cette démonstration.
Limites
SAUF LÀ OÙ CELA EST EXPRESSÉMENT STIPULÉ PAR ONSOLVE :
VOUS COMPRENEZ ET ACCEPTEZ QU’ONSOLVE, EN PLUS DE SES DIRIGEANTS, MEMBRES, EMPLOYÉS, AGENTS, FILIALES, PARENTS, SUCCESSEURS ET ASSIGNÉS (LES « RENONCIATAIRES ») REJETTENT TOUTE RESPONSABILITÉ, QUELLE QU’ELLE SOIT, QU’ELLE SOIT INVOQUÉE PAR UNE TIERCE PARTIE OU AUTREMENT, POUR TOUTE RAISON, Y COMPRIS MAIS SANS S’Y LIMITER UNE BLESSURE PERSONNELLE, UN DÉCÈS OU UNE PERTE, UNE VIOLATION, UNE ATTEINTE À LA VIE PRIVÉE, DES DOMMAGES À LA PROPRIÉTÉ ET UNE INTERRUPTION DES AFFAIRES QUI PUISSENT DÉCOULER DE L’UTILISATION OU DE TOUTE ERREUR OU OMISSION DES SERVICES, OU DU MANQUEMENT À METTRE À JOUR OU À FOURNIR TOUTE INFORMATION PAR LE BIAIS DES SERVICES.
VOUS ACCEPTEZ, SELON LA PORTÉE MAXIMALE DES LOIS APPLICABLES, DE LIBÉRER, DE RENONCER, D’EXONÉRER, DE NE PAS POURSUIVRE, ET DE TENIR INDEMNE ET À COUVERT TOUS LES RENONCIATAIRES DE TOUTE RESPONSABILITÉ, PERTE, DOMMAGES OU COÛTS DE TOUTE SORTE OU NATURE, CONNUE OU INCONNUE, ET DE TOUTES REVENDICATIONS, DEMANDES, CAUSES D’ACTION ET POURSUITES ACTUELLES ET FUTURES, EN DROIT OU EN ÉQUITÉ, PAR VOUS OU PAR TOUTE AUTRE PERSONNE SE RÉCLAMANT DE VOUS, POUR TOUTE PERTE, ATTEINTE OU INVASION DE LA VIE PRIVÉE CAUSÉE OU PRÉTENDUMENT CAUSÉE, DIRECTEMENT OU INDIRECTEMENT, PAR VOTRE UTILISATION DE CE SITE INTERNET OU PAR LA DIVULGATION DE VOTRE INFORMATION. VOUS ACCEPTEZ DE PLUS D’INDEMNISER TOUT RENONCIATAIRE DE ET CONTRE TOUTE PERTES, DOMMAGES, RESPONSABILITÉS, COÛTS OU DÉPENSES (Y COMPRIS MAIS SANS S’Y LIMITER DES HONORAIRES D’AVOCATS RAISONNABLES ET AUTRES DÉPENSES JURIDIQUES) DE TOUTE SORTE DÉCOULANT DE OU ATTRIBUABLE À (A) TOUTE BRÈCHE DES CONDITIONS QUE VOUS AURIEZ COMMISE OU (B) TOUTE REVENDICATION DE TIERCE PARTIE CONTRE UN RENONCIATAIRE CONCERNANT VOTRE UTILISATION DE CE SITE INTERNET OU DES SERVICES.
ONSOLVE NE SERA PAS RESPONSABLE DE TOUT DOMMAGE DÉCOULANT DE L’UTILISATION, DE LA MODIFICATION, D’UNE CONTRIBUTION, DE LA COPIE, DE LA DISTRIBUTION OU DU TÉLÉCHARGEMENT DU MATÉRIEL. DANS LA PORTÉE MAXIMALE DE LA LOI APPLICABLE, D’AUCUNE MANIÈRE UN RENONCIATAIRE NE SERA-T-IL RESPONSABLE DE TOUT DOMMAGE DIRECT, INDIRECT, ACCESSOIRES, SPÉCIAUX, PUNITIFS OU IMMATÉRIELS (Y COMPRIS MAIS SANS S’Y LIMITER AUX PROFITS PERDUS, À LA PERTE DE VIE PRIVÉE, À LA PERTE D’INFORMATION CONFIDENTIELLE OU L’INTERRUPTION D’AFFAIRES) DUE OU DÉCOULANT DE L’UTILISATION, DE LA MAUVAISE UTILISATION OU DE L’INCAPACITÉ D’UTILISER LES SERVICES, QUELLES QUE SOIENT LES CIRCONSTANCES, QUE CE SOIT EN RESPECT AVEC UNE ACTION CONTRACTUELLE, PAR NÉGLIGENCE, PAR UN ACTE DÉLICTUEUX, MÊME SI LES RENONCIATAIRES ONT ÉTÉ AVISÉS DE L’ÉVENTUALITÉ DE TELS DOMMAGES. VOUS CONVENEZ EXPRESSÉMENT QUE VOUS UTILISEZ LES SERVICES À VOS PROPRES RISQUES ET QUE LES SERVICES SONT OFFERTS UNIQUEMENT SUR UNE BASE « TELS QUELS », « TELS QUE DISPONIBLES » ET « AVEC TOUS LES DÉFAUTS ». ONSOLVE ET LES CLIENTS D’ONSOLVE NE VOUS SERONT PAS RESPONSABLES DE TOUT DOMMAGE QUE CE SOIT UNE ACTION CONTRACTUELLE, UN ACTE DÉLICTUEL OU TOUTE AUTRE THÉORIE JURIDIQUE AU-DELÀ D’UN REMBOURSEMENT DES FRAIS D’ABONNEMENT (S’ILS EXISTENT). VOUS ÊTES LE SEUL RESPONSABLE DE LA PROTECTION ADÉQUATE ET DES COPIES DE SÉCURITÉ DES DONNÉES ET/OU DE L’ÉQUIPEMENT UTILISÉ EN LIEN AVEC LE SITE INTERNET ET LES SERVICES ET VOUS N’ADRESSEREZ AUCUNE RÉCLAMATION À ONSOLVE POUR DES DONNÉES PERDUES, DES PÉRIODES DE RÉ-EXÉCUTION, DES VALEURS DE SORTIE INEXACTES, DES RETARDS DE TRAVAIL OU DES PROFITS PERDUS EN LIEN AVEC L’UTILISATION DES SERVICES.
Clause de non responsabilité
SAUF LÀ OÙ CELA EST EXPRESSÉMENT STIPULÉ PAR ONSOLVE :
DANS LA MESURE PERMISE PAR LA LOI, ONSOLVE DÉCLINE EXPRESSÉMENT TOUTE GARANTIE, RESPONSABILITÉS ET CONDITIONS DE TOUTE SORTE, QU’ELLES SOIENT EXPLICITES, IMPLICITES OU STATUTAIRES, Y COMPRIS MAIS SANS S’Y LIMITER TOUTE GARANTIE, DEVOIR OU CONDITION DE BONNE FOI, DE SOINS RAISONNABLES, DE VALEUR COMMERCIALE, DE PERTINENCE À UNE FIN PARTICULIÈRE, DE DISPONIBILITÉ, DE PRÉCISION, DE TITRE ET D’ABSENCE DE CONTRE-FAÇON. ONSOLVE N’OFFRE AUCUNE REPRÉSENTATION, GARANTIE OU CONDITION QUANT À LA QUALITÉ, LA PERTINENCE, LA VÉRACITÉ, LA PRÉCISION OU L’ENTIERTÉ DE TOUT MATÉRIEL CONTENU SUR LE SITE INTERNET.
Lois locales : contrôle des exportations
OnSolve contrôle et gère ce site internet et ses Services depuis ses sièges sociaux en différents endroits aux États-Unis et ne prétend pas que ce Matériel est approprié ou disponible à d’autres endroits. Si vous utilisez ce site internet ou les Services depuis d’autres endroits, vous êtes responsable du respect des lois locales applicables, y compris mais sans s’y limiter aux règles d’importation et d’exportation d’autres pays. Sauf si le contraire est spécifié explicitement, tout le matériel promotionnel ou de marketing trouvé sur ce site internet est destiné uniquement aux individus, compagnies et autres entités situés aux États-Unis. Vous reconnaissez et acceptez que le Matériel est assujetti aux lois et règles américaines d’administration et d’exportation. Le détournement de ce Matériel en contravention avec la loi américaine est interdit. Vous acceptez qu’aucun Matériel ou produit direct de celui-ci n’est acquis ou ne sera acquis, transporté, transféré ou ré-exporté, directement ou indirectement, vers des pays interdits ou sous embargo ou leurs citoyens, et qu’il ne sera pas utilisé pour des activités nucléaires, d’armes chimiques biologiques ou de projets de missiles sauf si cela est autorisé par le Gouvernement américain. Les pays interdits sont mentionnés dans le règles de la U.S. Export Administration. Les pays faisant l’objet d’un embargo sont : Cuba, l’Iran, l’Irak, la Libye, la Corée du Nord, la Syrie et le Soudan. Cette liste peut changer sans préavis de la part d’OnSolve, et vous devez respecter la liste, telle qu’elle existe dans les faits. Vous certifiez que vous n’apparaissez pas sur la liste Denied Persons du département d’État américain ou sur des listes affiliées ou sur la liste Specially Designated Nationals du département américain du Trésor. Vous acceptez de vous conformer strictement à toutes les lois américaines sur l’exportation et acceptez la seule responsabilité de l’obtention des permis d’exportation ou de ré-exportation requis.
Général
Vous acceptez que tout différend en vertu de ces Conditions ou de l’Énoncé de confidentialité sera soumis à un arbitrage contraignant en vertu des règles et règlements de, et gérés par, l’American Arbitration Association, et que toute indemnité découlant d’un tel arbitrage pourra faire l’objet d’un jugement final. En cas de différend lié au présent document, la partie victorieuse aura droit à un remboursement de tous les frais et honoraires d’avocats de la part de la partie déboutée pour le respect de tout droit compris dans ces Conditions ou Énoncé de confidentialité, que ce soit en Arbitrage, devant un tribunal de première instance ou un tribunal d’appel. Ces Conditions et l’Énoncé de confidentialité sont gérés en vertu des lois de la Floride, sans égard aux dispositions sur les conflits des lois, et le lieu de tout différend lié au présent document sera la ville d’Ormond Beach, comté de Volusa, Floride, ou les tribunaux fédéraux responsables de ces lieux. Dans l’éventualité où une provision de ces Conditions ou de cet Énoncé de confidentialité serait déterminée nulle par un arbitre ou un tribunal ayant une juridiction compétente, les provisions restantes demeureront contraignantes pour les parties, ayant le même effet que si la provision/les provisions invalidée/invalidées avait/avaient été limitée(s) ou effacée(s), tel qu’applicable.
Certaines obligations ci-incluses représentent des ententes indépendantes qui pourront vous lier et qui pourront continuer à vous lier sans égard à toute brèche de ces Conditions et de l’Énoncé de confidentialité et survivront à la cessation de ces Conditions ou de votre utilisation des Services.
OnSolve peut céder ces Conditions à sa seule discrétion. Vous n’avez pas le droit de céder ces Conditions sans l’accord préalable écrit d’OnSolve. La décision d’OnSolve de ne pas appliquer ou faire respecter tout droit ou provision en vertu de ces Conditions ne constituera pas un abandon de ce droit ou de cette condition. Les titres de sections dans ces Conditions sont fournis uniquement à la convenance du lecteur et ne les modifient pas.
Vous comprenez et acceptez qu’OnSolve pourra vous transmettre des communications, des annonces, des bulletins, des messages d’intérêt public et d’autres messages administratifs. Ces messages sont distincts de tout message envoyé par les clients d’OnSolve.
Tout avis ou demande ou autre communication du présent document se feront par écrit, et seront considérées comme ayant été livrées à la partie appropriée si : (a) livraison en personne, si livré pendant les heures normales de bureau; (b) le jour de livraison si envoyé par le service postal américain, dans une enveloppe pré-affranchie; (c) la date du reçu signé si envoyé par courrier certifié, dans une enveloppe pré-affranchie, ou un autre transporteur reconnu nationalement, accusé de réception ou signature fournie ou adressée à OnSolve tel que suit :
ONSOLVE, LLC, 780 W. Granada Boulevard, Ormond Beach, FL 32174
OnSolve se réserve le droit de modifier toute portion de ces Conditions ou de l’Énoncé de confidentialité à tout moment en mettant les Conditions révisées en ligne
ici
. Votre utilisation continue de n’importe quel Service après une telle mise en ligne signifie que vous acceptez les Conditions et l’Énoncé de confidentialité révisés. Tous les droits qui ne sont pas expressément accordés dans le présent document sont réservés à OnSolve.
Responsabilités de l’Initiateur (applicable uniquement aux Initiateurs)
Seuls les Initiateurs autorisés ont la permission de publier des notifications par le biais des Services, en vertu du contrat de licence d’utilisateur final d’OnSolve. L’accès des Initiateurs aux Services est protégé par un mot de passe, et les Initiateurs sont responsables de protéger la sécurité de leur mot de passe en tout temps. Tous les Initiateurs acceptent de communiquer avec OnSolve immédiatement s’ils découvrent que le compte ou le mot de passe d’un Initiateur a possiblement été compromis. OnSolve présumera que l’utilisation de tous les Services en vertu du compte d’un Initiateur se fait avec le consentement et au su de l’Initiateur, et chaque Initiateur sera responsable de tout accès non autorisé avec son mot de passe, si cela survient sans faute de la part d’OnSolve.
Tous les Initiateurs acceptent de fournir des informations véridiques, précises et complètes concernant tout Récipiendaire (tel que défini dans le présent document) qui utilise les Services, et de maintenir la précision de ces informations, et que le dévoilement de ces informations ne porte pas atteinte à la vie privée d’un Récipiendaire.
Tous les Initiateurs reconnaissent et acceptent que, en entrant toute coordonnée dans n’importe quel Service, le Récipiendaire propriétaire de ces coordonnées a expressément autorisé l’Initiateur à entrer ces coordonnées dans les Services pour recevoir des messages pré-enregistrés de la part d’OnSolve et du client avec lequel l’Initiateur est associé, par le biais d’une composition automatique.
Les Initiateurs acceptent de plus que les Services ne seront utilisés qu’à titre d’outil de notification et non en tant qu’appareil permettant de sauver la vie ou la propriété.
Les Initiateurs ne sont pas des agents d’OnSolve et ne sont pas autorisés à lier OnSolve à toute obligation. Tous les Initiateurs acceptent qu’ils ne prétendront pas qu’OnSolve a endossé le contenu de toute notifications envoyée par n’importe lequel des Services.
Responsabilités du Récipiendaire (applicable uniquement aux Récipiendaires)
Un Récipiendaire est toute personne individuelle en mesure de recevoir des notifications. Les Récipiendaires comprennent tout numéro de téléphone, adresse de texto, courriel ou adresse qui a été entrée dans n’importe quel Service. Tous les Récipiendaires qui reçoivent des notifications textuelles sont assujettis aux conditions requises par le fournisseur de textos d’OnSolve, disponibles
ici;
ces conditions fournissent plus d’information concernant les options de textos.
Les Récipiendaires comprennent et acceptent qu’ils seront reliés à au moins un des clients d’OnSolve. Si un Récipiendaire est ajouté au Service par le biais d’une option d’adhésion ou de bases des données disponibles commercialement, et qu’il est enregistré pour des notifications géolocalisées, le Récipiendaire sera associé à tout client d’OnSolve qui a accès au secteur géolocalisé du Récipiendaire. Chaque Récipiendaire comprend également et accepte que les Initiateurs et OnSolve ont la capacité de modifier et/ou de retirer les informations du Récipiendaire des Services. Un tel retrait survient à la seule discrétion de l’Initiateur et d’OnSolve.
Les Récipiendaires reconnaissent et acceptent que, en s’inscrivant à n’importe lequel des Services, ils acceptent d’être contactés, par composition automatique et message pré-enregistré, par OnSolve et les clients d’OnSolve.
Les Récipiendaires pourront demander à ne plus recevoir de messages par le biais des Services en retirant leur numéro de téléphone par le biais de la page d’inscription utilisée pour s’inscrire au Service, en composant le numéro de téléphone mentionné dans le message, en communiquant avec leur client local, en choisissant l’option de retraite sur ce site internet ou en communiquant avec OnSolve au 866-939-0911. Chaque Récipiendaire comprend et accepte que le retrait du Récipiendaire par le biais de la page d’inscription ne retirera pas nécessairement le Récipiendaire de toutes les bases de données d’OnSolve si les coordonnées du Récipiendaire sont disponibles dans une base de données disponible commercialement, ou qu’elles sont plus tard ajoutées au Service par le biais d’une base de données de clients.
Dans certains cas, les Récipiendaires pourront recevoir des messages par le biais des Services dans la langue choisie par le Récipiendaire. Les messages seront traduits seulement s’ils ont été choisis pour traduction par le client d’OnSolve. Chaque récipiendaire comprend et accepte que tous les messages seront créés en anglais par une tierce partie, et que les traductions sont fournies « TELLES QUELLES » ET « AVEC TOUTES LES FAUTES ». La traduction pourra être interrompue à tout moment.
Chaque Récipiendaire comprend et accepte que les Services sont des services offerts par abonnement qui sont disponibles uniquement s’ils ont été achetés par un client ou par le biais d’une des applications d’OnSolve. Conséquemment, votre accès aux notifications peut être interrompu à tout moment, pour n’importe quelle raison.
CHAQUE RÉCIPIENDAIRE RECONNAÎT QUE LES CLIENTS D’ONSOLVE FOURNISSENT LES SERVICES EN TANT QUE SERVICE PUBLIC ET/OU D’EMPLOI, SANS COMPENSATION DU RÉCIPIENDAIRE.
LE RÉCIPIENDAIRE RECONNAÎT QUE LE CLIENT PEUT, À SA SEULE DISCRÉTION, INTERROMPRE LES SERVICES À TOUT MOMENT. LE RÉCIPIENDAIRE RECONNAÎT ÉGALEMENT QUE DES PROBLÈMES TECHNIQUES OU UNE ERREUR HUMAINE PEUVENT ENTRAÎNER UNE DÉFAILLANCE DES SERVICES À TOUT MOMENT
. COMPTE TENU DE CES FACTEURS, LE RÉCIPIENDAIRE PAR LA PRÉSENTE DÉGAGE, TIENT INDEMNE ET À COUVERT LE CLIENT, ONSOLVE ET LEURS PARENTS ET FILIALES RESPECTIFS, DE TOUTE REVENDICATION DÉCOULANT D’UNE DÉFAILLANCE, POUR TOUTE RAISON, À FOURNIR LES SERVICES, ET LE RÉCIPIENDAIRE ACCEPTE ÉGALEMENT DE DÉGAGER ET DE TENIR INDEMNE ET À COUVERT POUR DES DOMMAGES DIRECTS, IMMATÉRIELS OU ACCESSOIRES DÉCOULANT DE TOUT GESTE OU OMISSION D’ONSOLVE, LES CLIENTS D’ONSOLVE OU LEURS PARENTS ET FILIALES RESPECTIFS, LEURS EMPLOYÉS, LEURS FOURNISSEURS DE SERVICES, LEURS BÉNÉVOLES ET LEURS INITIATEURS, EN LIEN AVEC LA PARTICIPATION DU CLIENT AUX SERVICES.
Chaque Récipiendaire comprend et accepte qu’OnSolve ne contrôle pas le service téléphonique, le service cellulaire et les fournisseurs d’accès internet qui pourront être nécessaires à l’envoi de textos par le biais des Services, et que de ce fait, tous les appels, textos et autres notifications ne seront pas nécessairement acheminés quand un Initiateur enverra un message par le biais des Services, et qu’un tel échec ne sera pas considéré comme étant la responsabilité d’OnSolve, de tout client d’OnSolve et de l’Initiateur à l’origine du message. Chaque Récipiendaire comprend et accepte de plus que la réception des messages par le biais des Services pourra engendrer pour le Récipiendaire des frais de téléphone, de textos ou de données, et qu’OnSolve n’est aucunement responsable de ces frais.
En général, les communications par téléphone, par texto, par courriel ou par cellulaire sont assujetties à plusieurs variables, et à ce titre la dissémination de grandes quantités de notifications automatisées à haute vitesse peut typiquement ne pas rejoindre 100 pour cent des récipiendaires désirés. En acceptant ces Conditions, le Récipiendaire reconnaît que la transmission d’informations par téléphone, texto, courriel ou application mobile dépend de conditions au-delà du contrôle d’OnSolve et des clients d’OnSolve; OnSolve et les clients d’OnSolve ne garantissent pas que la publication d’une notification engendrera une connexion réussie ou la réception d’un message d’avertissement par le Récipiendaire. Les Récipiendaires acceptent de plus que les Services ne seront utilisés qu’à titre d’outil de notification et non en tant qu’appareil permettant de sauver la vie ou la propriété.
Pour les Récipiendaires, ces Conditions, y compris mais sans s’y limiter à toute condition additionnelle des Services spécifiques et de l’Énoncé de confidentialité, représentent la totalité de l’entente entre vous et OnSolve concernant les Services, qu’elles annulent et remplacent toute entente contemporaine ou précédente, écrite ou orale, à ce sujet. Toute renonciation de toute provision de ces Conditions ne sera en vigueur que si par écrit et signée par OnSolve.
Les données du Récipiendaire qu’OnSolve collige de vous sont sous la responsabilité d’OnSolve sauf : 1) si OnSolve vous a informé sur une page d’inscription publique que vos informations seront transférées à un client d’OnSolve; 2) vous avez choisi de rendre vos informations publiques au moment de vous abonner aux Services; 3) vous fournissez vos informations sur une page d’inscription privée directement à un client d’OnSolve; ou 4) nous avons reçu vos coordonnées d’une tierce partie ou d’un client d’OnSolve. Dans l’éventualité où votre information sera transférée à un client d’OnSolve ou que vous avez choisi de rendre votre informatique publique, OnSolve n’aura aucun contrôle sur la divulgation de votre information. Dans de telles circonstances, votre information pourra faire l’objet de demandes d’information publiques et transférée à toute fin à l’insu d’OnSolve. ONSOLVE N’AURA AUCUNE RESPONSABILITÉ ENVERS VOUS APRÈS LE TRANSFERT DE VOTRE INFORMATION PAR UN CLIENT.
Toute information qui n’est pas transférée à un client tel que décrit ci-dessus, et qui est détenue par OnSolve, sera gardée confidentielle et OnSolve adoptera des mesures raisonnables et appropriées pour protéger l’information que vous partagez avec nous de tout accès ou divulgation non autorisé.
OnSolve ne vend pas et ne loue pas d’informations à des tierces parties sauf si elles sont publiques ou transférées à un client, tel que décrit ci-dessus.
Conditions supplémentaires pour CodeRED Weather Warning®, Weather Warning et FirstCall® Weather
En tant que Récipiendaire d’avertissements CodeRED Weather Warning®, Weather Warning or FirstCall® Weather (collectivement, les « Services météorologiques »), vous acceptez de ne pas transmettre, diffuser, redistribuer, faire suivre ou offrir, directement ou indirectement, les Services météorologiques ou toute portion des données, informations, images ou autres produits qui constituent les Services météorologiques à toute autre personne ou entité, dans quelque format que ce soit, de quelque manière que ce soit.
Les veilles, avertissements, conseils et bulletins officiels transmis aux Récipiendaires sont l’œuvre du National Weather Service (« NWS ») ou d’agences gouvernementales associées. L’agence auteure est la seule responsable du contenu et de l’exactitude des informations contenues dans les Services météorologiques. ONSOLVE OU SES CLIENTS NE SERONT TENUS RESPONSABLES D’AUCUNE MANIÈRE POUR DES INFORMATIONS INCOMPLÈTES OU IMPRÉCISES CONTENUES DANS L’INFORMATION RETRANSMISE. LES SERVICES MÉTÉOROLOGIQUES ET LES SERVICES AFFILIÉS SONT UNIQUEMENT À DES FINS INFORMATIVES – VOUS LES UTILISEZ À VOS PROPRES RISQUES! LES RÉCIPIENDAIRES ET LES TIERCES PARTIES SONT LES SEULS RESPONSABLES DES ACTIONS OU OMISSIONS ENGENDRANT UNE PERTE DE VIE OU DE PROPRIÉTÉ.
Conditions additionnelles de CityWatch® et TelAlert®
Les notifications de CityWatch® et TelAlert® sont transmises par du matériel entretenu par un client ou une autre tierce partie. OnSolve et les clients d’OnSolve n’ont aucune responsabilité quant à l’échec d’un Récipiendaire de recevoir une notification d’un client de CityWatch® ou TelAlert® en raison d’une défaillance du matériel, y compris mais sans s’y limiter la défaillance d’une tierce partie ou une catastrophe naturelle qui affecte le matériel d’un client.
Conditions additionnelles de MyDailyCall®
Les Récipiendaires de MyDailyCall® doivent posséder un téléphone à boutons ayant le service à clavier, sans blocage des appels. Au moment de l’appel automatisé, le Récipiendaire doit être en mesure d’appuyer sur les chiffres mentionnés afin de confirmer réception du MyDailyCall®. Dans l’éventualité où un Récipiendaire n’appuiera pas sur les chiffres mentionnés, le numéro de téléphone alternatif (le cas échéant) du Récipiendaire sera appelé. En l’absence d’un numéro alternatif, ou si on n’appuie pas sur les chiffres mentionnés, le client sera avisé. Un Initiateur associé à ce client déterminera alors s’il est nécessaire de communiquer avec le contact d’urgence du Récipiendaire ou si on doit demander des secours d’urgence pour le Récipiendaire. Le Récipiendaire doit fournir un avis de vingt-quatre (24) heures au client qu’il ne sera pas disponible pour recevoir les appels prévus.
LE RÉCIPIENDAIRE COMPREND ET RECONNAÎT PLEINEMENT QUE LES EMPLOYÉS ET AGENTS DU
CLIENT
POURRONT DEVOIR PROCÉDER À UNE ENTRÉE FORCÉE, OU DEVOIR DEMANDER AUX AUTORITÉS DE PROCÉDER À UNE ENTRÉE FORCÉE, DANS LA RÉSIDENCE DU RÉCIPIENDAIRE SI LE RÉCIPIENDAIRE NE RÉPOND PAS À L’APPEL MYDAILYCALL®. LE RÉCIPIENDAIRE ACCEPTE DE TENIR INDEMNE ET À COUVERT LE CLIENT, TOUTES LES AUTORITÉS, ET LEURS EMPLOYÉS, AGENTS ET INITIATEURS RESPECTIFS SI
UNE ENTRÉE FORCÉE EST REQUISE
SI LES AUTRES MOYENS RAISONNABLES DE VÉRIFIER L’ÉTAT DU RÉCIPIENDAIRE ONT ÉTÉ ÉPUISÉS OU NE SONT PAS DISPONIBLES.
Les Récipiendaires de MyDailyCall® reconnaissent qu’OnSolve pourra transférer leurs coordonnées du Récipiendaire au client auprès de qui ils sont inscrits de manière à procéder à un contrôle de sécurité du Récipiendaire, et que le service MyDailyCall® a été conçu pour faire partie d’une stratégie complète, qui inclut des visites périodiques en personne du Récipiendaire, ainsi que le recours au bon sens.
Conditions d’utilisation des applications mobiles
Chacune des applications mobiles d’OnSolve (chacune une « Application » et collectivement les « Applications ») ne peuvent être utilisées que par des individus âgés de 13 ans et plus. Si vous avez plus de 13 ans, mais que vous n’êtes pas légalement un adulte, vous devez demander à votre parent ou tuteur de réviser ces Conditions d’utilisation des applications mobiles pour assurer que vous comprenez vos obligations en vertu des Conditions.
Toutes les Applications et tous les graphiques, services, logos, sons, images, logiciels et propriété intellectuelle ci-inclus (le « Matériel des applications ») sont la propriété et fournis par OnSolve ou ses filiales, auteurs, développeurs et vendeurs, et ne peuvent être copiés, reproduits, distribués, republiés, transmis, téléchargés, photocopiés, enregistrés ou autrement transférés ou copiés sans la permission explicite d’OnSolve. L’utilisation de toute Application ne vous donne pas le droit d’utiliser le Matériel des applications, les noms commerciaux, les marques de commerce, les marques de service, les logos ou autres caractères propres, sauf en association avec votre utilisation personnelle de l’Application, en respect avec les Conditions.
Toutes les applications sont conçues uniquement à des fins informatives et non commerciales; les Applications ne sont pas un dispositif de sauvetage, et on ne doit pas s’y fier en cas d’urgence. Vous comprenez et acceptez de plus que les alertes envoyées par le biais des Applications sont envoyées par des tierces parties qui ne sont d’aucune façon associées à OnSolve, qu’OnSolve ne vérifie pas l’exactitude des informations contenues dans les alertes, et qu’OnSolve n’est aucunement responsable du contenu de ces alertes.
Conditions d’utilisation des réseaux sociaux
Une présence sur les réseaux sociaux fait d’OnSolve une meilleure compagnie en nous permettant de dialoguer avec nos clients, Initiateurs, Récipiendaires et autres membres de la communauté, en plus de leur offrir des informations et ressources précieuses. OnSolve se réserve le droit de modérer les commentaires conformément aux politiques d’OnSolve. Tous les commentaires et messages de réseaux sociaux échangés avec OnSolve sont de nature publique. OnSolve est en activité 24 heures par jour, sept jours par semaine, 365 jours par année. La période désignée pendant laquelle nous répondons aux commentaires sur les réseaux sociaux est du lundi au vendredi, entre 9 h et 17 h, heure de l’Est, exception faite des jours fériés.
OnSolve n’est pas responsable du contenu mis en ligne par les visiteurs, y compris les messages des employés ou individus qui ne sont pas des administrateurs autorisés de nos sites. Le contenu mis en ligne par les visiteurs ne reflète pas nécessairement les positions d’OnSolve.
OnSolve s’attend à ce que les conversations sur nos sites de réseaux sociaux respectent les règles de la conversation polie. Nous demandons à tous les commentateurs de respecter les pensées, idées et croyances des autres et des membres de notre équipe. Il est important que tous les participants se traitent avec respect. Les commentaires seront surveillés et pourront être retirés pour toute raison, à la seule discrétion d’OnSolve. OnSolve pourra retirer des commentaires pour les raisons suivantes : promotion d’activités illégales; menace de violence physique; langage obscène ou abusif; langage discriminatoire sur la base de la race, du sexe, de l’ethnie, de la nationalité, de l’orientation sexuelle, d’un handicap, de l’âge, de la religion, de l’expression ou de l’identité du genre; ou la promotion de produits ou services. Les commentaires qui constituent clairement des pourriels ou qui dévient du sujet désigné pourront aussi être retirés. OnSolve pourra retirer les commentaires qui contiennent des demandes de Services, pour que nous puissions répondre individuellement et non en public.
OnSolve respecte la propriété intellectuelle des autres, et nous demandons aux visiteurs de nos réseaux sociaux de faire de même. Concernant tout contenu que vous mettez en ligne sur les réseaux sociaux d’OnSolve, vous confirmez qu’il s’agit de votre œuvre originale ou que vous détenez les droits pour tout contenu tiers inclus dans ces messages. Les visiteurs de nos réseaux sociaux octroient une licence non exclusive, irrévocable, libre de droits au reste de la planète pour leurs soumissions à OnSolve, que ce soit sur un site de réseau social ou ailleurs, et que ces soumissions peuvent être utilisées, réutilisées, réimprimées ou transmis sous tout format et sur tout média, par OnSolve. Si vous considérez que votre œuvre a été copiée d’une manière qui porte atteinte à votre propriété intellectuelle, veuillez communiquer avec nous.
Mitigate Risk and Strengthen Organizational Resilience Today
Request a Demo
icon-angle
icon-bars
icon-times
Sub-policy 1
https://www.onsolve.com/aviso-de-privacidad-de-onsolve-llc/:
Skip to content
ONSOLVE, LLC (“OnSolve”) se compromete firmemente con su privacidad. Este Aviso de privacidad estipula nuestras prácticas de privacidad en su visita a nuestro sitio web o al utilizar cualquiera de nuestros productos, aplicaciones o servicios (de forma conjunta, los “Servicios”). Nuestra misión al implementar este aviso de privacidad es proteger su información y utilizarla únicamente para proporcionarle los servicios de la mejor calidad que se encuentren disponibles. La privacidad y la seguridad de su información es de suma importancia para nosotros. No vendemos, otorgamos, rentamos ni permutamos sin su consentimiento NINGUNA información personal perteneciente a usted a ningún tercero ni de forma alguna distinta a lo que indica este aviso de privacidad. Valoramos la confianza que otorga a OnSolve. Estamos comprometidos a proporcionar un sitio web con un entorno seguro y un servicio al cliente incomparable.
Este aviso de privacidad describe la información que recopilamos y el uso que le damos a dicha información. Los términos adicionales en relación con su uso de nuestros Servicios se encuentran en el acuerdo correspondiente entre OnSolve (o su afiliado) y usted. Como agente que procesa la información personal en nombre de nuestros clientes, OnSolve no posee ni controla la información personal que procesa a nombre de sus clientes y no tiene una relación directa con ninguna de las personas cuya información personal podría ser procesada de forma conexa con la prestación de nuestros Servicios. En estas circunstancias, los clientes de OnSolve son responsables de proporcionar un aviso adecuado a las personas pertinentes y de obtener el consentimiento necesario.
¿Cómo recopilamos la información?
En general, recopilamos la información para apoyar nuestros esfuerzos de mercadotecnia y publicidad, para analizar el comportamiento del usuario y para personalizar y mejorar nuestros Servicios. Esta información se utiliza para prestar asistencia a OnSolve al servirle a usted cuando visita cualquiera de nuestros sitios web o utiliza cualquiera de nuestros Servicios. Nuestro objetivo es proporcionarle un servicio personalizado, lo cual incluye buscar formas de mejorar nuestros Servicios y mejorar su experiencia en nuestros sitios web.
¿Qué información recopilamos?
El tipo de información que recopilamos podría diferir de acuerdo a si usted se inscribe para recibir notificaciones, utiliza nuestros Servicios, se comunica con nuestro equipo de atención al cliente o simplemente visita nuestros sitios web. Durante cualquiera de estos procesos, recopilamos la información de contacto, la cual incluye su dirección de correo electrónico, dirección física, números telefónicos o información de su dispositivo inalámbrico. Esta información se utilizará para proporcionarle los Servicios a usted.
Al visitar únicamente nuestro sitio web (sin llenar ningún formulario), no recopilaremos información que lo(a) identifique personalmente, sino que recopilaremos información acerca de sus actividades (por ejemplo: las páginas que vio, la fecha y hora de su visita, y la información de la ubicación de su dirección IP o ubicación GPS). Podríamos utilizar esta información para mejorar nuestros Servicios, obtener información de investigación de mercado o para comprender mejor la forma en la que se utilizan generalmente nuestros Servicios.
No recopilamos de forma intencionada la información personal de ninguna persona de la cual estemos informados que es menor de edad (menor de 18 años). Si nos proporciona su información, usted declara y garantiza que: (i) tiene 18 años o más; o, (ii) si proporciona la información de un(a) menor de 18 años con el fin de recibir notificaciones, usted es el padre o la madre o tutor(a) de dicho(a) niño(a); tiene más de 18 años; y está autorizado(a) legalmente a proporcionar información de dicho(a) menor para que se le contacte por medio de los Servicios.
¿Con quién compartimos la información?
La información podrá compartirse con nuestros afiliados y proveedores de servicios según sea necesario para nuestros fines empresariales, los cuales incluyen la prestación de nuestros Servicios, administración de cuenta, servicio al cliente, procesamiento de transacciones, procesamiento y prestación de estados de cuenta, e investigación y análisis. Los clientes con los que tenemos una relación contractual podrían tener acceso a su información personal estándar mediante el uso de nuestros Servicios. Por medio de estas relaciones contractuales, solicitamos a nuestros clientes y proveedores de servicios que mantengan un nivel de protección de la privacidad comparable a nuestras propias prácticas.
Podríamos compartir estadísticas conjuntas del comportamiento del usuario (por ejemplo: clientes, patrones de tráfico, etc.) con nuestros socios. La información conjunta no identificará a ningún individuo de forma personal ni contendrá ninguna información que lo(a) identifique personalmente.
Es nuestra política notificar a las personas que utilizan nuestros Servicios sobre las solicitudes para ver su información personal antes de divulgarla, a menos la ley lo prohíba o en circunstancias excepcionales, como en emergencias.
Precauciones de seguridad
Contamos con medidas de seguridad rigurosas para la protección por pérdida, uso indebido y alteración de la información bajo nuestro control. Utilizamos tecnología segura, controles para la protección de la privacidad y restricciones al acceso de los empleados con el fin de salvaguardar su información; sin embargo, la naturaleza misma del Internet hace imposible garantizar la seguridad de la información transmitida.
¿Cómo usamos las cookies?
Como muchos otros sitios de Internet, nuestro sitio web utiliza cookies y tecnologías similares, como balizas web, etiquetas y JavaScript por sí solos o en conjunto con cookies para recopilar información acerca del uso de nuestros sitios web y de la interacción con correos electrónicos de nosotros. Si no desea que este sitio coloque una cookie en su navegador y monitoree su actividad, puede abandonar el sitio o puede navegar en él usando la
modalidad de privacidad en su navegador web
. Para conocer cómo utilizar la modalidad de privacidad, visite los enlaces siguientes, según el navegador que utilice.
Modalidad InPrivate en Microsoft Internet Explorer
Modalidad Incognito en Google Chrome
Modalidad de navegación privada en Mozilla FireFox
Modalidad de navegación privada en Apple Safari
Legislación “No rastrear” en California
OnSolve no monitorea a sus clientes a lo largo del tiempo ni en sitios web de terceros para proporcionar publicidad dirigida y, por lo tanto, no responde a las señales No rastrear (DNT, por sus siglas en inglés).
RESPONSABILIDAD POR LA TRANSFERENCIA ULTERIOR
Con excepción de lo que permite o exige la ley vigente, si OnSolve transfiere información personal proporcionada por sus Clientes a un tercero fuera del Área Económica Europea (EEA, por sus siglas en inglés), y en países que no están sujetos a una decisión adecuada por la Comisión Europea y que no pudieran proporcionar el mismo nivel de protección de datos como la EEA, nos aseguraremos de que el receptor de su información personal ofrezca un nivel adecuado de protección al celebrar cláusulas contractuales estandarizadas para la transferencia de datos según lo aprueba la Comisión Europea (Art. 46 GDPR) o le pediremos su consentimiento con anticipación a dicha transferencia internacional de datos. OnSolve se reserva el derecho a transferir información personal en el caso de vender o transferir su empresa o activos de forma parcial o total (incluido el caso de una reorganización, disolución o liquidación).
ELECCIÓN
El Servicio no tiene el propósito de transmitir datos sensibles o información médica personal, ni información financiera relacionada (incluida la información privada recopilada por instituciones financieras sujetas a regulaciones específicas de la conducta de los servicios financieros) u otro tipo de información personal de naturaleza sensible.
Ofrecemos a las personas la oportunidad mediante un sitio web que alojamos a elegir si OnSolve puede divulgar su información personal a terceros (además de compartirla con su proveedor local para el uso de los Servicios). A menos de que elija permitirnos compartir su información, OnSolve no utilizará la información personal para propósitos fuera del ámbito para el cual se recopiló la información originalmente o haya sido subsecuentemente autorizado por la persona, y no conservaremos información personal durante mayor tiempo del necesario o, de lo contrario, según se exponga en el convenio con el cliente correspondiente. Las personas podrán ponerse en contacto con OnSolve según se indica a continuación en relación con el uso o la divulgación de su información personal.
Si procesamos su información personal con el propósito de enviarle notificaciones publicitarias, usted podrá gestionar la recepción de notificaciones publicitarias y no transaccionales de nuestra parte al hacer clic en el enlace “cancelar suscripción” ubicado en la parte inferior de nuestros correos electrónicos publicitarios, al responder o enviar “STOP”, si recibe notificaciones por mensaje de texto o al desactivar las notificaciones automáticas en nuestras aplicaciones en su dispositivo. De forma adicional, podrá cancelar la suscripción al contactar a OnSolve mediante la información en la sección “Contáctenos” en la parte inferior. Tenga en cuenta que al darse de baja de nuestras notificaciones publicitarias no cancela las notificaciones importantes empresariales relacionadas con su relación actual con nosotros, como las notificaciones acerca de sus suscripciones o registros a eventos, anuncios de servicios o información de seguridad.
INTEGRIDAD DE LA INFORMACIÓN
OnSolve depende de los clientes y usuarios vigentes de nuestros Servicios para actualizar y corregir la información personal, en la medida necesaria, con los fines para los que se recopiló la información o fue autorizada posteriormente por las personas correspondientes.
En relación con la información personal que OnSolve podría obtener directamente de las personas mediante su sitio web, OnSolve toma las medidas necesarias para asegurarse de que la información personal que procesamos es (i) relevante para los propósitos para los cuales se recopiló, (ii) confiable para su uso específico y (iii) precisa, completa y actual. Las personas pueden contactar a OnSolve según se indica más adelante para solicitar que OnSolve actualice o corrija la información, así como para solicitar la eliminación de su información personal. Las personas que deseen acceso o que deseen corregir, modificar o eliminar la información personal que OnSolve almacena en nombre de un Cliente en relación con la prestación de sus Servicios, deberá solicitarlo directamente al cliente correspondiente. Si una persona no tiene la posibilidad de contactar al cliente correspondiente o no obtiene respuesta de un cliente, OnSolve proporcionará asistencia razonable al reenviar la solicitud de la persona al cliente.
OnSolve podría limitar o negar el acceso a la información personal en el caso de que proporcionar dicho acceso sea injustificadamente oneroso o costoso según las circunstancias, o por cualquier otra razón según lo permita la ley vigente. Las personas podrán solicitar el acceso a su información personal al contactar a OnSolve según se indica más adelante.
Sus derechos
Usted cuenta con ciertos derechos en relación con su información personal, sujetos a las leyes locales de protección de datos. Según las leyes vigentes y, en particular, si usted se encuentra en la EEA, estos derechos podrían incluir el derecho:
A acceder a su información personal en nuestro poder (derecho al acceso);
A rectificar la información personal imprecisa y, tomando en cuenta el propósito del procesamiento de la información personal, asegurarse de que esté completa (derecho a la rectificación);
A borrar/eliminar su información personal, en la medida que lo permitan las leyes de protección de datos (derecho a asegurar; derecho a ser olvidado(a));
A restringir nuestro procesamiento de su información personal, en la medida que lo permita la ley (derecho a la restricción del procesamiento);
A transferir su información personal a otro controlador, en la medida de lo posible (derecho a la portabilidad de datos);
A oponerse a cualquier procesamiento de su información personal realizada según nuestros intereses legítimos (derecho a la oposición); En los casos en los cuales procesemos su información personal con fines de mercadotecnia directa o la compartamos con terceros para sus propios fines de mercadotecnia directa, usted podrá ejercer su derecho a la oposición en cualquier momento a dicho procesamiento sin que sea necesario que proporcione ninguna razón específica para dicha oposición;
A no ser sujeto(a) a una decisión basada únicamente en el procesamiento automático, incluida la evaluación del perfil, la cual produzca efectos legales (“Toma de decisiones automatizada”). La toma de decisiones automatizada no se lleva a cabo en nuestros sitios web; y
En la medida en la que basamos la recopilación, el procesamiento y el intercambio de su información personal bajo su consentimiento, para retirar su consentimiento en cualquier momento, sin afectar la legalidad del procesamiento basado en dicho consentimiento antes de su anulación.
Si usted es residente de California, menor de 18 años y se registró para obtener una cuenta con nosotros, puede solicitarnos la eliminación del contenido o la información que publicó en nuestros sitios web. Tome en cuenta que su solicitud no asegura la eliminación completa o íntegra del contenido o la información, ya que, por ejemplo, una parte de su contenido podría haber sido publicada nuevamente por otro visitante de nuestros sitios web.
Para ejercer sus derechos, contáctenos por medio de una solicitud a
privacysupport@onsolve.com
. Respondemos a todas las solicitudes legítimas dentro de un mes y nos pondremos en contacto con usted en caso de necesitar información adicional con el fin de atender su solicitud.
Si su información fue enviada a nosotros por un cliente de OnSolve con el fin de prestar nuestros servicios a dicho Cliente y usted desea ejercer cualquier derecho que pueda tener bajo las leyes vigentes de protección de datos, contacte a dicho cliente directamente. Si nos envía una solicitud directamente, proporcione el nombre del cliente que nos envió su información con el fin de poder remitir su solicitud a dicho cliente.
Cambios en el aviso de privacidad
OnSolve revisará y actualizará periódicamente este Aviso de privacidad.
OnSolve acepta con gusto sus comentarios acerca de este Aviso de privacidad o de los Servicios que prestamos. Si tiene alguna pregunta, contacte a OnSolve por vía telefónica, correo electrónico o correo postal.
Información de contacto
OnSolve, LLC
OnSolve Legal Team
legalrequests@onsolve.com
1-866-939-0911
780 W. Granada Boulevard, Ormond Beach, Florida 32174
ONSOLVE, LLC
A la atención de: Asesor jurídico
780 W. Granada Boulevard, Ormond Beach, Florida 32174 1-866-939-0911
legalrequests@onsolve.com
Nos reservamos el derecho de cambiar o actualizar esta Política de privacidad.
Términos de uso de OnSolve, LLC
Para todos los servicios
ONSOLVE, LLC, (“OnSolve”), le da la bienvenida a su sitio web. Lea los siguientes Términos de uso (“Términos”) así como la Política de privacidad de OnSolve (“Política de privacidad”) en relación con los usos de nuestro sitio web y de todos los productos y servicios de OnSolve (de forma conjunta, los “Servicios”). Al acceder, utilizar o descargar cualquier material del sitio web o nuestros Servicios, usted acepta seguir y quedar obligado(a) por estos Términos y la Política de privacidad. Si no está de acuerdo con estos Términos, le pedimos que no utilice este sitio web ni nuestros Servicios. Tome en cuenta que si usted es cliente de OnSolve, estos Términos están sujetos a los términos de cualquier contrato de licencia del usuario final vigente entre el Cliente y OnSolve. Al utilizar cualquiera de nuestros Servicios, usted estará sujeto(a) a estos Términos, la Política de privacidad, así como a cualquier término o norma adicionales aplicables a los Servicios específicos que utiliza, los cuales deberán publicarse periódicamente debajo o en dichos Servicios. Cualquier término o norma adicional aplicable a los Servicios específicos, en conjunto con la Política de privacidad, deberán incorporarse a estos Términos.
Enlaces y publicaciones de terceros.
Este sitio web podría contener enlaces a sitios web controlados por terceros ajenos a OnSolve. OnSolve no se responsabiliza y no respalda ni acepta cualquier responsabilidad por los contenidos o el uso de los sitios web de dichos terceros. OnSolve le proporciona estos enlaces a usted solo como referencia útil y la inclusión de ningún enlace implica la aprobación de OnSolve del sitio web presentado. Es su responsabilidad tomar precauciones para asegurarse de que cualquiera de ellos que seleccione para su uso no contenga virus ni otros elementos de naturaleza destructiva. OnSolve no es coautor y no ratifica, aprueba, ni adopta la información contenida en ninguna publicación a la que se haga referencia en este sitio web o de ninguna estadística publicada por terceros al publicarlas en este sitio web.
Restricciones de uso del software
Cualquier software que pueda estar disponible para su descarga desde este sitio web o mediante los Servicios (“Software”) es material protegido por los derechos de autor de OnSolve o proveedores terceros. El uso del Software está regido por los términos y el acuerdo de licencia del usuario final que acompaña o está incluido en el Software (“Acuerdo de licencia”). El usuario final acepta los términos del Acuerdo de licencia al instalar, copiar o utilizar el Software. El Software está disponible para su descarga únicamente para el uso de usuarios finales según el Acuerdo de licencia. Sin prejuicio de lo anterior, la copia o reproducción del Software a cualquier otro servidor o ubicación para su reproducción o redistribución adicional queda expresamente prohibido. Cualquier reproducción o redistribución del Software que no vaya de acuerdo con el Acuerdo de licencia está expresamente prohibido por la ley y puede dar lugar a graves penalidades civiles y criminales. Los infractores serán sancionados en la máxima medida posible. EL SOFTWARE ESTÁ GARANTIZADO, EN CASO DE SER ASÍ, ÚNICAMENTE SEGÚN LOS TÉRMINOS DEL ACUERDO DE LICENCIA; CUALQUIER OTRA GARANTÍA QUEDA EXCLUIDA COMO CONSTA EN EL PRESENTE.
Derechos de propiedad intelectual
Todos los materiales proporcionados en este sitio web o en nuestros Servicios, incluidos, entre otros, la información, documentos, productos, logotipos, gráficos, sonidos, imágenes, software o servicios (“Materiales”), son proporcionados por OnSolve o por los terceros correspondientes a cargo de su fabricación, autoría, desarrollo y suministro (“Proveedores terceros”) y son material protegido por los derechos de autor de OnSolve o sus Proveedores terceros. Salvo mención expresa, ninguno de los Materiales puede ser copiado, reproducido, distribuido, republicado, descargado, expuesto, publicado o transmitido de ninguna forma o por ningún medio, incluidos, entre otros, los medios electrónicos, mecánicos, fotocopias, grabaciones o ningún otro, sin el permiso previo y por escrito de OnSolve o el Proveedor tercero. Además, no podrá “imitar” cualquier Material sin el permiso previo y por escrito de OnSolve. Con excepción de cuando OnSolve indique lo contrario, nada en este sitio podrá ser interpretado para otorgar cualquier licencia bajo los derechos de propiedad intelectual de OnSolve o cualquier Proveedor tercero, ya sea mediante impedimentos, implicación o de otra manera. Usted reconoce la responsabilidad exclusiva para obtener dichas licencias. Vea la “Información de contacto legal” en la parte inferior en caso de tener alguna pregunta acerca de la obtención de dichas licencias. Los Materiales proporcionados por los Proveedores terceros no fueron revisados, probados, certificados o autenticados de forma independiente por completo o parcialmente por OnSolve. OnSolve no proporciona, vende, otorga licencias ni renta cualquiera de los Materiales ajenos a aquellos identificados específicamente como proporcionados por OnSolve. Por medio del presente, OnSolve le concede el permiso para exponer, distribuir y descargar los Materiales de OnSolve de este sitio web a condición de que: (1) tanto el aviso de derechos de autor identificado en la parte inferior y este aviso de permiso aparezcan en los Materiales; (2) el uso de dichos Materiales sea únicamente personal, no comercial y para uso informativo y no se copie ni publique en ninguna computadora en red, transmita en ningún medio ni se utilice para obtener ganancias comerciales; y (3) los Materiales no se modifiquen de forma alguna. Este permiso termina automáticamente sin aviso si usted infringe cualquiera de estos términos o condiciones. Al vencimiento, usted destruirá inmediatamente cualquier Material descargado o impreso. Cualquier uso no autorizado de los Materiales contenidos en este sitio web podría violar las leyes de derechos de autor, el derecho de marcas, las leyes de privacidad y publicidad, y las regulaciones y estatutos de las comunicaciones.
Los elementos en este sitio web y nuestros Servicios están protegidos por las leyes de imagen de marca y otras, y no podrán copiarse ni imitarse de forma total ni parcial. Ningún logotipo, gráfico, sonido o imagen del sitio web o de nuestros Servicios podrá copiarse o retransmitirse, a menos de que OnSolve lo permita de forma expresa. OnSolve®, MIR3®, MIR3 IN®, MIR3 Intelligent Notification®, CodeRED®, CodeRED Weather Warning®, SmartNotice®, TelAlert®, Universal ANI®, Validata®, MyDailyCall®, CityWatch®, Code-ED®, One Call Now®, Send Word Now®, SWN Direct®, Alert Tracer®, WeatherBlast®, Message Builder®, Every Message Counts® y sus logotipos relacionados u otros Servicios de OnSolve referenciados en el presente son marcas registradas de OnSolve y pueden estar registradas en ciertas jurisdicciones. Todos los nombres de productos, nombres de empresas, marcas, logotipos y símbolos podrían ser marcas registradas de sus dueños respectivos.
Leyenda de derechos limitados
Cualquier Software que se descargue de este sitio web o mediante los Servicios para los Estados Unidos de América o en su nombre, sus agencias o dependencias (“Gobierno de EE.UU.”), cuenta con Derechos limitados. El uso, la duplicación y divulgación de parte del Gobierno de EE.UU. están sujetos a ciertas restricciones según lo estipulado en el subpárrafo (c)(1)(ii) de la cláusula de los Derechos sobre los datos técnicos y software computacional en el Suplemento de la Regulación de adquisición federal para defensa (DFARS, por sus siglas en inglés) 252.227-7013 o en los subpárrafos (c)(1) y (2) de los Derechos limitados del Software computacional comercial en el Código de Regulaciones Federales (CFR, por sus siglas en inglés) 48 52.227-19, según corresponda.
Declaraciones
Con excepción de donde OnSolve estipule lo contrario de forma expresa, todos los comentarios, retroalimentación, información o materiales enviados a OnSolve mediante o en relación con este sitio web y nuestros Servicios (“Declaraciones”) se considerarán no confidenciales y propiedad de OnSolve. Al proporcionar dichas Declaraciones a OnSolve, usted acepta asignar a OnSolve, sin ningún costo, de forma internacional, los derechos, autoría e interés en los derechos de autor y otros derechos de propiedad intelectual a las Declaraciones. OnSolve podrá utilizar o divulgar libremente dichas Declaraciones sin restricciones para cualquier propósito. Usted reconoce ser responsable de las Declaraciones que proporcione y, que usted, no OnSolve, tiene la responsabilidad total de las Declaraciones, incluidos su legalidad, fiabilidad, adecuación, originalidad y derechos de autor.
Uso
Usted representa y garantiza que utilizará este sitio web y los Servicios únicamente para evaluar la tecnología o de acuerdo con cualquier acuerdo de licencia del usuario final y únicamente para propósitos legales de acuerdo con los términos especificados en el presente. Por medio del presente usted certifica estar autorizado(a) o que cuenta con el permiso de todas las partes interesadas que recibirán notificaciones en los Servicios. Además, usted determinó que los números telefónicos para recibir las notificaciones excluyen números de emergencia y otros números que no pueden llamarse por medio de un sistema automatizado bajo la ley vigente y que solo se llamará a los números de teléfono celular cuando el dueño de dicho teléfono celular haya otorgado el permiso para ello. A modo de ejemplo, y no como limitación, usted acepta: cumplir con todas las leyes federales, estatales y locales, incluidas, entre otras, la Ley sobre Prácticas Justas para el Cobro de Deudas, la Comisión Federal de Comercio (“FTC”, por sus siglas en inglés), la Comisión Federal de Comunicaciones (“FCC”, por sus siglas en inglés), la Ley estadounidense de protección al usuario de servicios telefónicos, o cualquier autoridad regulatoria federal o estatal, y que no realizará ni permitirá que ningún tercero: (i) realice ninguna práctica ilegal, poco ética, engañosa o falsa vinculada al uso de los Servicios, incluidos, entre otros, la creación de una identidad falsa o una dirección de correo electrónico, teléfono o encabezado de mensaje falsificado o que de otra forma engañe a otras personas al identificar al emisor o el origen del mensaje; (ii) utilizar los Servicios vinculados con cualquier correo electrónico basura, mensajes telefónicos basura, spam o cualquier mensaje no solicitado (comercial u otro); (iii) infringir cualquier ley de privacidad, nuestra Política de privacidad, su política de privacidad o la política de privacidad de cualquier tercero; (iv) realizar cualquier actividad que justifique una reclamación al FTC o FCC; (v) proporcionar o permitir deliberadamente que terceros proporcionen contenido u otro material que se transmita en conexión con o mediante los Servicios, los cuales: (a) sean difamatorios, calumniosos, obscenos o pornográficos; (b) transmitan cualquier material que contenga virus, gusanos informáticos, robots de cancelación o cualquier otro código o programa computacional dañino; o (c) que infrinja de otra forma cualquier ley, estatuto, decreto o regulación (incluidas, entre otros, las leyes y regulaciones que rigen el control de las exportaciones). Los Servicios no pueden ser usados para telemercadeo ni convocatorias de ningún tipo. Usted defenderá, indemnizará y eximirá de toda responsabilidad a OnSolve y los Comunicados frente a cualquier demanda derivada o causada por cualquier acto, omisión o infracción por parte de usted o de cualquier tercero al que usted otorgue el uso de los Servicios. En caso de que OnSolve le proporcione una demostración de los Servicios, OnSolve deberá contar con el derecho en cualquier momento y por cualquier razón, con o sin causa, a terminar su acceso a la demostración.
Limitaciones
CON EXCEPCIÓN DE CUANDO ONSOLVE DISPONGA EXPRESAMENTE ALGO DISTINTO:
USTED ENTIENDE Y ESTÁ DE ACUERDO EN QUE ONSOLVE, EN CONJUNTO CON SUS FUNCIONARIOS, MIEMBROS, EMPLEADOS, AGENTES, AFILIADOS, MATRICES, SUCESORES Y BENEFICIARIOS (LAS “PARTES LIBERADAS”) ANULAN CUALQUIER RESPONSABILIDAD POR CUALQUIER CONCEPTO, YA SEA ORIGINADA POR UN TERCERO O CUALQUIER OTRO, POR CUALQUIER RAZÓN, INCLUIDOS, ENTRE OTROS, EL DAÑO, MUERTE O PÉRDIDA PERSONAL, INFRACCIÓN, INVASIÓN DE LA PRIVACIDAD, DAÑO A LA PROPIEDAD E INTERRUPCIÓN COMERCIAL, LOS CUALES PODRÍAN SER CAUSA DEL USO O CUALQUIER ERROR U OMISIÓN DE LOS SERVICIOS, O POR LA FALTA DE CUMPLIMIENTO DE PROPORCIONAR CUALQUIER INFORMACIÓN POR MEDIO DE LOS SERVICIOS.
USTED ACEPTA, EN LA MÁXIMA MEDIDA PERMITIDA POR LA LEY VIGENTE, EXIMIR, RECHAZAR, OMITIR EL CARGO, PACTAR NO DEMANDAR, Y EXIMIR DE TODA RESPONSABILIDAD A TODAS LAS PARTES LIBERADAS DE CUALQUIER ADEUDO, PÉRDIDA, DAÑO O COSTO DE CUALQUIER TIPO O NATURALEZA, YA SEA CONOCIDA O DESCONOCIDA, Y DE CUALQUIER RECLAMACIÓN, DEMANDA, MOTIVO DE DEMANDA Y DEMANDAS ACTUALES O FUTURAS, EN DERECHO O EQUIDAD, POR USTED O CUALQUIER OTRA PERSONA QUE RECLAME EN SU NOMBRE, POR CUALQUIER PÉRDIDA, INFRACCIÓN O INVASIÓN DEL DERECHO DE PRIVACIDAD CAUSADO O SUPUESTAMENTE CAUSADO, DE FORMA DIRECTA O INDIRECTA, POR SU USO DE ESTE SITIO WEB O POR LA DIVULGACIÓN DE SU INFORMACIÓN. USTED CONVIENE A INDEMNIZAR A CADA PARTE LIBERADA FRENTE A CUALQUIER PÉRDIDA, DAÑO, OBLIGACIÓN, COSTO O GASTO (INCLUIDOS, ENTRE OTROS, EL COSTO RAZONABLE DE UN ABOGADO U OTROS GASTOS LEGALES) DE CUALQUIER TIPO CAUSADOS O ATRIBUIBLES (A) CUALQUIER INCUMPLIMIENTO DE LOS TÉRMINOS POR PARTE DE USTED O (B) CUALQUIER RECLAMACIÓN DE UN TERCERO EN CONTRA DE UNA PARTE LIBERADA EN RELACIÓN CON EL USO DE USTED DE ESTE SITIO WEB O DE LOS SERVICIOS.
ONSOLVE NO SERÁ RESPONSABLE DE NINGÚN DAÑO PADECIDO A CAUSA DE UTILIZAR, MODIFICAR, CONTRIBUIR, COPIAR, DISTRIBUIR O DESCARGAR LOS MATERIALES. HASTA EL ALCANCE MÁXIMO PERMITIDO POR LA LEY VIGENTE, BAJO NINGÚN CONCEPTO NINGUNA PARTE LIBERADA SERÁ RESPONSABLE DE NINGÚN DAÑO DIRECTO, INDIRECTO, INCIDENTAL, ESPECIAL, PUNITIVO O EMERGENTE (INCLUIDOS, ENTRE OTROS, PÉRDIDA DE GANANCIAS, PÉRDIDA DE PRIVACIDAD, PÉRDIDA DE INFORMACIÓN CONFIDENCIAL O INTERRUPCIÓN COMERCIAL) DEBIDO AL USO, MAL USO O INCAPACIDAD DE UTILIZAR LOS SERVICIOS, CUALQUIERA QUE SEA LA CAUSA, YA SEA EN UNA ACCIÓN CONTRACTUAL, NEGLIGENCIA U OTRA ACCIÓN AGRAVANTE, INCLUSO SI LAS PARTES LIBERADAS FUERON INFORMADAS DE LA POSIBILIDAD DE DICHOS DAÑOS. USTED ACEPTA DE FORMA EXPRESA QUE EL USO DE LOS SERVICIOS ES A SU PROPIO RIESGO Y QUE LOS SERVICIOS SE PROPORCIONAN “EN EL ESTADO EN EL QUE SE ENCUENTRAN”, “SEGÚN SU DISPONIBILIDAD” Y “CON TODOS SUS DEFECTOS”. ONSOLVE Y LOS CLIENTES DE ONSOLVE NO TENDRÁN NINGUNA RESPONSABILIDAD HACIA USTED POR NINGÚN DAÑO, YA SEA CONTRACTUAL, POR AGRAVIO O CUALQUIER OTRA TEORÍA LEGAL MÁS ALLÁ DE LA DEVOLUCIÓN DE LAS TARIFAS DEL SUSCRIPTOR (EN CASO DE HABERLAS). USTED TIENE LA ÚNICA RESPONSABILIDAD DE PROTEGER Y RESPALDAR DE FORMA ADECUADA LA INFORMACIÓN O EL EQUIPO UTILIZADO EN CONEXIÓN CON EL SITIO WEB Y LOS SERVICIOS Y USTED NO REALIZARÁ NINGÚN RECLAMO EN CONTRA DE ONSOLVE POR LA PÉRDIDA DE INFORMACIÓN, TIEMPO DE EJECUCIÓN, RESULTADOS INCORRECTOS, RETRASOS LABORALES O LA PÉRDIDA DE GANANCIAS A CAUSA DEL USO DE LOS MATERIALES.
Exención de responsabilidad:
CON EXCEPCIÓN DE CUANDO ONSOLVE DISPONGA EXPRESAMENTE ALGO DISTINTO:
EN LA MEDIDA PERMITIDA POR LA LEY, ONSOLVE EXCLUYE DE MANERA EXPRESA CUALQUIER GARANTÍA, OBLIGACIÓN O CONDICIÓN DE NINGÚN TIPO, YA SEA EXPRESA, IMPLICADA O ESTABLECIDA POR LA LEY, INCLUIDA, ENTRE OTRAS, CUALQUIER GARANTÍA, OBLIGACIÓN O CONDICIÓN DE BUENA FE, CUIDADO RAZONABLE, COMERCIABILIDAD, ADECUACIÓN PARA UN PROPÓSITO PARTICULAR, DISPONIBILIDAD, PRECISIÓN, TÍTULO Y NO-VIOLACIÓN. ONSOLVE NO REPRESENTA, GARANTIZA O CONDICIONA LA CALIDAD, ADECUACIÓN, VERACIDAD, PRECISIÓN O COMPLETITUD DE CUALQUIERA DE LOS MATERIALES CONTENIDOS EN ESTE SITIO WEB.
Leyes locales: control de las exportaciones
OnSolve controla y opera este sitio web y sus Servicios desde sus oficinas centrales en varias ubicaciones de los Estados Unidos de América y no representa que los Materiales sean adecuados o estén disponibles para su uso en otras ubicaciones. Si usted utiliza este sitio web o los Servicios desde otra ubicación, usted es responsable del cumplimiento de las leyes locales vigentes, como, entre otras, las regulaciones de exportación e importación de otros países. A menos de que se declare explícitamente algo distinto, todo material de mercadotecnia o publicitario que se encuentre en este sitio web está dirigido únicamente a las personas, empresas u otras entidades ubicadas en los Estados Unidos de América. Usted reconoce y acepta que los Materiales están sujetos a las leyes y regulaciones de la administración de exportaciones de los Estados Unidos. El desvío de dichos Materiales en contra de la ley de EE. UU. está prohibido. Usted acepta que ninguno de los Materiales, ni ningún producto directo de ellos, se obtiene o se obtendrá con el fin de enviarlo, transferirlo, reexportarlo, de forma directa o indirecta, a países prohibidos o restringidos o a sus ciudadanos, no se utilizarán para actividades nucleares, armas biológicas químicas o proyectos de misiles, a menos de que esté autorizado por el gobierno de EE. UU. Los países prohibidos se exponen en las regulaciones sobre la exportación de la administración de los Estados Unidos. Los países sometidos a la restricción de los Estados Unidos son: Cuba, Irán, Irak, Libia, Corea del Norte, Siria y Sudán. Esta lista está sujeta a cambios sin aviso de OnSolve, y usted está obligado(a) a cumplir con la lista, como exista de hecho. Usted certifica que no se encuentra en la lista de personas prohibidas del Departamento de Comercio de EE. UU. o en listas afiliadas, o en la lista de nacionales especialmente designados del Departamento del Tesoro de los Estados Unidos. Usted acepta cumplir estrictamente con todas las leyes de exportación de EE. UU. y asume la responsabilidad única de obtener licencias para exportar o reexportar según sea necesario.
General
Usted acepta que cualquier desacuerdo a causa de estos Términos o la Política de privacidad deberá enviarse a arbitraje obligatorio según las reglas y regulaciones de, y administradas por, la Asociación Americana de Arbitraje, y que cualquier adjudicación otorgada de conformidad con dicho arbitraje podrá ser dictada en un fallo definitivo. Si algún desacuerdo surge conforme a este instrumento, la parte prevaleciente tendrá el derecho a todos los costos y tarifas de abogados por parte de la parte perdedora para el cumplimiento de cualquier derecho incluido en estos Términos o Política de privacidad, ya sea en arbitraje, una corte de primera jurisdicción y todas las Cámaras de Apelación. Estos Términos y la Política de privacidad deberán ser gobernadas bajo las leyes de Florida, sin relación con sus principios del conflicto de derecho, y la jurisdicción para cualquiera de los desacuerdos en el presente deberá ser Ormond Beach, Volusia County, Florida o las cortes federales que acompañan dicha jurisdicción. En caso de que cualquier disposición de estos Términos o la Política de privacidad sea determinada nula por un árbitro o corte de una jurisdicción competente, las disposiciones restantes permanecerán obligatorias para las partes al presente, con el mismo efecto que si la disposición nula fuera limitada o eliminada, según corresponda.
Ciertas obligaciones que se exponen en el presente documento representan acuerdos independientes los cuales pueden ser obligatorios para usted y seguirán siendo obligatorios sin considerar cualquier infracción de estos Términos y la Política de privacidad, y prevalecerán después de la terminación de estos Términos o su uso de los Servicios.
OnSolve podrá asignar estos Términos a su exclusiva discreción. Usted no tiene permiso para asignar estos Términos sin el consentimiento previo y por escrito de OnSolve. El incumplimiento de OnSolve a ejercer o imponer cualquier derecho o disposición de estos Términos no designará la renuncia a dicho derecho o disposición. Los títulos de sección de estos Términos se proporcionan únicamente para la comodidad del lector y no con el fin de modificarlos.
Usted entiende y acepta que OnSolve puede enviarle comunicaciones, anuncios, boletines de noticias, anuncios de servicios y otros mensajes administrativos. Estos mensajes son independientes de cualquier mensaje enviado por los clientes de OnSolve.
Todas las notificaciones o solicitudes, demandas y otras comunicaciones en el presente deberán ser por escrito y deberán ser consideradas para su entrega a la parte adecuada según: (a) entrega personal, si se entrega en persona durante el horario ordinario de oficina; (b) el día de la entrega, si se envía por el servicio postal de EE. UU.; (c) el día en que se firma de recibido, si se envía por correo certificado, correo prepagado u otro transportista nacional reconocido, con acuse de recibo o firma proporcionada y dirigida a OnSolve como se indica a continuación:
ONSOLVE, LLC, 780 W. Granada Boulevard, Ormond Beach, FL 32174
OnSolve se reserva el derecho a modificar cualquier parte de estos Términos o la Política de privacidad en cualquier momento al publicar
aquí
los Términos modificados. Su uso continuo de cualquiera de los Servicios con posterioridad de alguna de dichas publicaciones constituye su aceptación de los Términos y la Política de privacidad revisados. OnSolve se reserva cualquier derecho no concedido en este documento de forma expresa.
Responsabilidades del iniciador (correspondiente solo a los iniciadores)
Solo los iniciadores autorizados tienen permiso de emitir notificaciones mediante los Servicios, en cumplimiento del acuerdo de licencia del usuario final de OnSolve. El acceso del iniciador a los Servicios está protegido con contraseña y los iniciadores son responsables de mantener la seguridad de su contraseña en todo momento. Todos los iniciadores aceptan contactar a OnSolve inmediatamente al recibir cualquier información o al tener conocimiento del que una cuenta o contraseña fue puesta en riesgo. OnSolve asumirá que todo uso de los Servicios mediante una cuenta de iniciador se realizará con el consentimiento y conocimiento de un iniciador, y cada iniciador será responsable de cualquier acceso no autorizado realizado con su contraseña causado por responsabilidad alguna de OnSolve.
Todos los iniciadores aceptan proporcionar información veraz, certera y completa de cualquier Destinatario (como se define adelante) que se ingrese en los Servicios y mantener la precisión de dicha información, y que la disposición de dicha información no invade la privacidad de ningún Destinatario.
Todos los iniciadores reconocen y aceptan que, al ingresar cualquier información de contacto en cualquiera de los Servicios, el Destinatario dueño de dicha información de contacto autorizó de forma expresa al iniciador introducir dicha información en los Servicios para recibir mensajes grabados con antelación de OnSolve y del cliente con el cual dicho iniciador está vinculado mediante un marcador automático.
Los iniciadores aceptan asimismo que los Servicios deberán utilizarse únicamente como una herramienta de notificación y no como un dispositivo para socorrer vidas o propiedades.
Los iniciadores no son agentes de OnSolve ni están autorizados para vincular a OnSolve con ninguna obligación. Todos los iniciadores aceptan que no indicarán que OnSolve respalda el contenido de ninguna notificación enviada mediante cualquiera de los Servicios.
Responsabilidades de los Destinatarios (corresponde solo a los Destinatarios)
Un Destinatario es cualquier persona capaz de recibir notificaciones. Los Destinatarios incluyen cualquier número telefónico, dirección de texto, dirección de correo electrónico o dirección que se haya registrado en cualquiera de los Servicios. Todos los Destinatarios que reciben notificaciones de texto están sujetos a los términos requeridos por el proveedor de mensajes de texto de OnSolve, que se encuentran disponibles
aquí;
dichos términos proporcionan más información sobre las opciones de los mensajes de texto.
Los Destinatarios entienden y aceptan que estarán conectados a uno o más clientes de OnSolve. Si el Destinatario se añade al Servicio mediante la inclusión voluntaria o fuentes de datos disponibles comercialmente y se registra para las notificaciones de geolocalización, el Destinatario estará vinculado con cualquier cliente de OnSolve que tenga acceso al área de geolocalización del Destinatario. Cada Destinatario comprende y acepta asimismo que los iniciadores y OnSolve tienen la capacidad de modificar o eliminar la información del Destinatario de los Servicios. Dicha eliminación es a la exclusiva discreción del iniciador y OnSolve.
Los Destinatarios reconocen y aceptan que, al registrarse con alguno de los Servicios, dan su consentimiento a que OnSolve y los clientes de OnSolve los contacten mediante un marcador automatizado y un mensaje grabado con anticipación.
Los Destinatarios podrán solicitar dejar de recibir mensajes mediante los Servicios al eliminar su número a través de la página de registro utilizada para inscribirse al Servicio, al contactar al número telefónico presentado en dicho mensaje, al contactar a su cliente local, al cancelar los mensajes en este sitio web o al contactar a OnSolve al número 866-939-0911. Cada Destinatario entiende y acepta que eliminar al Destinatario mediante la página de registro no elimina al Destinatario de todas las bases de datos de OnSolve si la información de dicho Destinatario está disponible mediante una base de datos disponible de forma comercial o se reingresa en el Servicio mediante una base de datos de un cliente.
En ciertas instancias, los Destinatarios podrán recibir mensajes mediante los Servicios en los idiomas que seleccione el Destinatario. Los mensajes solo se traducirán si el cliente de OnSolve los designa para su traducción. Cada Destinatario entiende y acepta que todos los mensajes se introducirán en inglés y los traducirá un tercero, y que las traducciones se proporcionan “en el estado en el que se encuentran” y “con todos sus defectos”. La traducción podrá interrumpirse en cualquier momento.
Cada Destinatario entiende y acepta que los Servicios se basan en la suscripción y están disponibles únicamente en caso de compra por el cliente o mediante una de las aplicaciones de OnSolve. De forma correspondiente, su acceso a las notificaciones enviadas mediante los Servicios podrá darse por terminado en cualquier momento, por cualquier causa.
CADA DESTINATARIO RECONOCE QUE LOS CLIENTES DE ONSOLVE PROPORCIONAN LOS SERVICIOS COMO SERVICIO PÚBLICO O SERVICIO RELACIONADO CON LOS EMPLEADOS Y SIN COMPENSACIÓN ALGUNA DEL DESTINATARIO.
EL DESTINATARIO RECONOCE QUE EL CLIENTE PODRÍA, A SU EXCLUSIVA DISCRECIÓN, DAR POR TERMINADO LOS SERVICIOS EN CUALQUIER MOMENTO. EL DESTINATARIO TAMBIÉN RECONOCE QUE LOS PROBLEMAS TÉCNICOS O ERRORES HUMANOS PODRÍAN OCASIONAR UNA FALLA DE LOS SERVICIOS EN CUALQUIER MOMENTO.
EN VIRTUD DE ESTOS FACTORES, POR ESTE DOCUMENTO EL DESTINATARIO DISPENSA, CONDONA Y EXIME DE RESPONSABILIDAD AL CLIENTE, ONSOLVE, Y A SUS EMPRESAS MATRICES Y SUBSIDIARIAS DE CUALQUIER RECLAMACIÓN CAUSADA POR EL INCUMPLIMIENTO, POR CUALQUIER CAUSA, A PROPORCIONAR LOS SERVICIOS, Y EL DESTINATARIO ACEPTA ASIMISMO DISPENSAR, CONDONAR Y EXIMIR DE RESPONSABILIDAD EN CONTRA DE CUALQUIER RECLAMACIÓN POR DAÑOS DIRECTOS, INCIDENTALES O EMERGENTES A CAUSA DE CUALQUIER ACTO DE OMISIÓN DE ONSOLVE, LOS CLIENTES DE ONSOLVE O SUS EMPRESAS MATRICES Y SUBSIDIARIAS, EMPLEADOS, PROVEEDORES DE SERVICIOS, VOLUNTARIOS O INICIADORES CORRESPONDIENTES, EN CONEXIÓN CON LA PARTICIPACIÓN DEL CLIENTE EN LOS SERVICIOS.
Cada Destinatario entiende y acepta que OnSolve no tiene control sobre los proveedores del servicio telefónico, servicio celular e Internet, los cuales podrían ser necesarios para enviar mensajes mediante los Servicios, y de forma correspondiente, podría darse el caso de que no todas las llamadas, mensajes de textos ni otras notificaciones lleguen a su destinatario cuando el iniciador envíe un mensaje mediante los Servicios, y que dicha falla no podrá considerarse responsabilidad de OnSolve, cualquier cliente de OnSolve o el iniciador que envía dicho mensaje. Cada Destinatario entiende y acepta asimismo que recibir los mensajes mediante el Servicio podría causar cargos por llamadas, mensajes y datos al Destinatario, y que OnSolve no es de ningún modo responsable de dichos cargos.
En general, las comunicaciones por llamada, mensaje de texto, correo electrónico o teléfono celular están sujetas a múltiples variables y, por lo tanto, la difusión en grandes cantidades de notificaciones automatizadas de alta velocidad habitualmente no llegará al 100 % de los destinatarios esperados. Al aceptar estos Términos, el Destinatario reconoce que la transmisión de información mediante teléfono, mensaje de texto, correo electrónico o aplicación para teléfono celular depende de condiciones ajenas a OnSolve y a los clientes de OnSolve; OnSolve y los clientes de OnSolve no desean garantizar que el envío de una notificación dará lugar a una conexión exitosa o a la entrega de un mensaje de alerta al Destinatario. Los Destinatarios aceptan asimismo que los Servicios deberán utilizarse únicamente como una herramienta de notificación y no como un dispositivo para socorrer vidas o propiedades.
Para los Destinatarios, estos Términos, que incluyen, entre otros, cualquier término adicional para los Servicios y la Política de privacidad específicos, constituye el acuerdo indivisible entre usted y OnSolve con respecto a los Servicios, y anula y reemplaza cualquier compromiso o acuerdo previo o presente, por escrito o de forma oral, en relación con el contenido. Cualquier exención de cualquier disposición de estos Términos o Política de privacidad será efectiva únicamente si se encuentra por escrito y firmada por OnSolve.
La información del Destinatario que recopila OnSolve a través de usted se mantiene bajo la custodia de OnSolve, salvo que: 1) OnSolve le haya notificado en una página de registro público que su información se transferirá a un cliente de OnSolve; 2) usted haya seleccionado hacer pública su información al registrarse para los Servicios; 3) usted proporcione su información en una página de registro privada directamente a un cliente de OnSolve; o 4) un tercero o un cliente de OnSolve le proporcionó la información de usted. En caso de que su información sea transferida a un cliente de OnSolve o haya elegido hacer pública su información, OnSolve no tendrá control sobre la divulgación de su información. En este caso, su información podrá estar sujeta a peticiones de registros públicos y ser transferida por cualquier causa sin el conocimiento de OnSolve. ONSOLVE NO TENDRÁ NINGUNA RESPONSABILIDAD HACIA USTED POR CAUSA DE QUE UN CLIENTE TRANSFIERA SU INFORMACIÓN.
Cualquier información que no se transfiera a un cliente como se indica previamente y que se mantenga bajo la custodia de OnSolve se mantendrá de forma confidencial y OnSolve tomará las medidas razonables y adecuadas para proteger la información que comparta con nosotros de un acceso o divulgación no autorizados.
OnSolve no vende, renta o arrienda información a terceros salvo que esté señalada como pública o se transfiera a un cliente, según se describe previamente.
Términos adicionales de CodeRED Weather Warning®, Weather Warning y FirstCall® Weather
Como Destinatario de CodeRED Weather Warning®, Weather Warning o FirstCall® Weather (de forma conjunta, los “Servicios meteorológicos”), acepta que no transmitirá, difundirá, redistribuirá, reenviará o entregará de forma directa o indirecta los Servicios meteorológicos o ninguna parte de los datos, información, imágenes u otro productos que constituyan los Servicios meteorológicos a ninguna otra persona o entidad, en ningún formato o por ninguna causa.
Las alertas, advertencias e informes oficiales comunicados a los Destinatarios son redactados por el Servicio Meteorológico Nacional (“NWS, por sus siglas en inglés”) o las agencias gubernamentales relacionadas. La agencia a cargo de la redacción es responsable únicamente por el contenido y la precisión de la información contenida en los Servicios meteorológicos. DE NINGUNA FORMA SE HARÁ RESPONSABLE A ONSOLVE O CUALQUIERA DE LOS CLIENTES DE ONSOLVE POR LA INFORMACIÓN INCOMPLETA O IMPRECISA CONTENIDA EN LA INFORMACIÓN RETRANSMITIDA. LOS SERVICIOS METEOROLÓGICOS Y SUS SERVICIOS AFILIADOS SON ÚNICAMENTE CON PROPÓSITOS INFORMATIVOS; ÚSELOS BAJO SU PROPIO RIESGO. LOS DESTINATARIOS Y TERCERAS PARTES SON LOS ÚNICOS RESPONSABLES POR ACTOS U OMISIONES QUE OCASIONEN PÉRDIDAS DE VIDAS O PROPIEDADES.
Términos adicionales de CityWatch® y TelAlert®
Las notificaciones de CityWatch® y TelAlert® se envían mediante hardware al que da mantenimiento un cliente o tercero. OnSolve y los clientes de OnSolve no serán responsables en el caso de que un Destinatario no reciba las notificaciones de un cliente de CityWatch® o TelAlert® a causa de la falla del hardware, incluidos, entre otros, las fallas de terceros o casos fortuitos que afecten el hardware del cliente.
Términos adicionales de MyDailyCall®
Los Destinatarios de MyDailyCall® deberán tener un teléfono referente con servicio referente y sin servicios de bloqueo. Al momento de la llamada automatizada, el Destinatario deberá ser capaz de pulsar los dígitos especificados para aceptar la llamada MyDailyCall®. En caso de que el Destinatario no pulse los dígitos especificados, se llamará al número telefónico alternativo del Destinatario, en caso de haberlo. En el caso de que no haya un número telefónico alternativo o no se pulsen los dígitos en el número telefónico alternativo, se le notificará al cliente. El iniciador relacionado con dicho cliente determinará entonces llamar al contacto de emergencia del Destinatario o solicitar inmediatamente los servicios de emergencia para el Destinatario. El Destinatario deberá notificar al cliente con veinticuatro (24) horas de antelación si no podrá recibir las llamadas programadas.
EL DESTINATARIO ENTIENDE Y ACEPTA POR COMPLETO QUE LOS EMPLEADOS Y AGENTES DEL
CLIENTE
PODRÍAN REQUERIR LA ENTRADA FORZADA O SOLICITAR A LAS AUTORIDADES LA ENTRADA FORZADA A LA VIVIENDA DEL DESTINATARIO SI EL DESTINATARIO NO RESPONDE LA LLAMADA DE MYDAILYCALL®. EL DESTINATARIO ACEPTA EXIMIR DE RESPONSABILIDAD AL CLIENTE, A LAS AUTORIDADES Y A SUS EMPLEADOS, AGENTES E INICIADORES RESPECTIVOS
EN CASO DE QUE LA ENTRADA FORZADA SEA NECESARIA
SI SE AGOTARON O NO HAY DISPONIBLES OTRAS MEDIDAS RAZONABLES PARA DETERMINAR EL ESTADO DEL DESTINATARIO.
Los Destinatarios de MyDailyCall® reconocen que OnSolve podría transferir la información del Destinatario al cliente al que se suscribió con el fin de realizar revisiones de seguridad del Destinatario, y que el servicio MyDailyCall® está diseñado para su uso como parte de una estrategia integral, que incluya visitas periódicas en persona a los Destinatarios, así como el uso del sentido común.
Términos de uso de las aplicaciones para teléfono celular
Únicamente las personas de 13 años o más podrán utilizar todas las aplicaciones para teléfono celular de OnSolve (singular “App” y en conjunto “Apps”). En caso de que usted sea mayor a 13 años, pero no se le considere un adulto de forma legal, se le solicitará que su padre/madre o tutor revise estos Términos de uso de las aplicaciones para teléfono celular con usted para asegurarse de que entiende su acuerdo bajo estos Términos.
Todas las Apps y todos los gráficos, servicios, logotipos, sonidos, imágenes, software y propiedad intelectual en las mismas (los “Materiales de las Apps”) son propiedad y las proporciona OnSolve o sus afiliados, autores, desarrolladores y vendedores, y queda prohibida su copia, reproducción, distribución, republicación, transmisión, descarga, fotocopia, grabación o su transferencia o duplicación sin el consentimiento expreso de OnSolve. Utilizar cualquier App no le otorga el derecho de utilizar ninguno de los Materiales de las Apps, nombres comerciales, marcas comerciales, marcas de servicio, logotipos u otras características de marca, excepto en relación con su uso personal de la App de acuerdo con los Términos.
Todas las Apps están designadas para propósitos informativos y no comerciales; las Apps no son dispositivos para salvar vidas y no podrá fiarse de ellas en caso de una emergencia. Usted entiende y acepta asimismo que terceros envían las alertas mediante las Apps, y que dichos terceros no están relacionados de forma alguna con OnSolve, y OnSolve no verifica la precisión de la información contenida en las alertas y OnSolve no se hace responsable de ninguna forma por el contenido de dichas alertas.
Términos de uso de las redes sociales
La participación en las redes sociales hace a OnSolve una mejor empresa al permitirnos conversar con los clientes, iniciadores, Destinatarios y otros miembros de la comunidad, así como ofrecerles información y recursos valiosos. OnSolve se reserva el derecho a moderar los comentarios según las políticas de OnSolve. Los comentarios y mensajes intercambiados con OnSolve mediante las redes sociales son registro público. OnSolve opera 24 horas al día, 7 días a la semana y 365 días al año. Nuestros tiempos de respuesta designados en cualquier sitio de las redes sociales son de lunes a viernes, de 9 a. m. a 5 p. m. en el horario del este de los Estados Unidos, excluidos los días festivos.
OnSolve no se hace responsable de ningún contenido publicado por los visitantes, incluidas las publicaciones realizadas por los empleados o las personas que no son administradores autorizados de nuestros sitios. El contenido publicado por los visitantes no representa necesariamente la opinión o postura de OnSolve.
OnSolve espera que todas las conversaciones en nuestros sitios de las redes sociales sigan las regla del discurso cortés. Pedimos a todas las personas que introduzcan un comentario el respeto a los pensamientos, ideas y creencias del otro y de los miembros de nuestro equipo. Es importante que todos los participantes se traten con respeto entre sí. Los comentarios se monitorearán y podrán estar sujetos a la eliminación por cualquier razón al exclusivo arbitrio de OnSolve. OnSolve también podrá eliminar los comentarios que cumplan con alguna de las siguientes características: defensa de actividades ilegales; amenaza con daños físicos; uso de lenguaje obsceno o injurioso; uso de lenguaje discriminatorio a causa del origen étnico, sexo, etnicidad, nacionalidad, orientación sexual, incapacidad, edad, religión, identidad o expresión sexual; o promoción de productos o servicios. Los comentarios que claramente sean spam o inconexos con el tema designado también estarán sujetos a la eliminación. OnSolve también podrá eliminar comentarios que contengan solicitudes de Servicios, para ser respondidos uno a uno, en lugar de ofrecer una respuesta pública.
OnSolve respeta la propiedad intelectual de otros y pedimos a los visitantes de nuestros sitios de las redes sociales que lo hagan de igual forma. En el caso de cualquier contenido que publique en los sitios de las redes sociales de OnSolve, usted autoriza que es su propio trabajo original o que cuenta con los derechos de cualquier contenido de terceros que se encuentre en dicha publicación. Los visitantes a nuestros sitios de las redes sociales otorgan licencia no exclusiva, irrevocable y gratuita al resto del mundo para su comunicación a OnSolve, ya sea en un sitio de las redes sociales o de otra forma, y OnSolve podrá utilizar, reutilizar, reimprimir o transmitir tales comunicaciones en cualquier formato y en cualquier medio. Si considera que su trabajo se copió de forma que constituya una infracción de la propiedad intelectual, póngase en contacto con nosotros.
Mitigate Risk and Strengthen Organizational Resilience Today
Request a Demo
icon-angle
icon-bars
icon-times
Privacy & Cookie Information
By clicking “Accept All Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts.
Accept All Cookies
Cookies Settings
Your Privacy
Strictly Necessary Cookies
Performance Cookies
Functional Cookies
Targeting Cookies
Social Media Cookies
Your Privacy
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Social Media Cookies
These cookies are set by a range of social media services that we have added to the site to enable you to share our content with your friends and networks. They are capable of tracking your browser across other sites and building up a profile of your interests. This may impact the content and messages you see on other websites you visit. If you do not allow these cookies you may not be able to use or see these sharing tools.
Back Button
Cookie List
Filter Button
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Sub-policy 2
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Privacy_mode:
Jump to content
Photograph your local culture, help Wikipedia and win!
(Top)
1
History
2
Uses
3
Support in popular browsers
4
Security
Toggle Security subsection
4.1
Associated lawsuit
5
See also
6
References
7
External links
Article
Talk
English
Read
Edit
View history
Tools
Actions
Read
Edit
View history
General
What links here
Related changes
Upload file
Permanent link
Page information
Cite this page
Get shortened URL
Download QR code
Expand all
Edit interlanguage links
Print/export
Download as PDF
Printable version
In other projects
Wikidata item
Text
Small
Standard
Large
This page always uses small font size
Width
Standard
Wide
The content is as wide as possible for your browser window.
Color
(beta)
Automatic
Light
Dark
This page is always in light mode.
From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
(Redirected from
Privacy mode
)
Privacy feature in some web browsers
The start page for private browsing mode in
Firefox
.
Private browsing
(also known as
incognito mode
or
private mode
) is a feature in some
web browsers
that enhances user privacy. In this mode, the browser initiates a temporary
session
separate from
its main session and user data. The
browsing history
is not recorded, and local data related to the session, like
Cookies
and
Web cache
, are deleted once the session ends. The primary purpose of these modes is to ensure that data and history from a specific browsing session do not remain on the device or get accessed by another user of the same device. In
web development
, it can be used to quickly test displaying pages as they appear to first-time visitors.
Private browsing modes do not necessarily protect users from being
tracked
by other websites or their
Internet service provider
(ISP). Furthermore, there is a possibility that identifiable traces of activity could be leaked from private browsing sessions by means of the operating system, security flaws in the browser, or via malicious
browser extensions
, and it has been found that certain
HTML5
APIs
can be used to detect the presence of private browsing modes due to differences in behavior. This is usually why some people mistake private browsing for a
virtual private network
.
History
[
edit
]
Apple
's
Safari
browser was one of the first major web browsers to include this feature, first introduced in April 2005.
[
1
]
The feature was subsequently adopted by other browsers, leading to the popularization of the term in 2008 by mainstream news outlets and computing websites during discussions about the
beta
versions of
Internet Explorer 8
.
[
2
]
[
3
]
[
4
]
Adobe Flash Player
10.1 started respecting browser settings and private browsing modes in relation to storing
local shared objects
.
[
5
]
[
6
]
Uses
[
edit
]
Private browsing modes are commonly used for various purposes, such as concealing visits to sensitive websites (like adult-oriented content) from the browsing history, conducting unbiased web searches
unaffected
by
previous browsing habits or recorded interests
, offering a "clean" temporary session for guest users (for instance, on
public computers
),
[
7
]
and managing multiple accounts on websites simultaneously. Private browsing can also be used to circumvent
metered paywalls
on some websites.
[
8
]
In a survey conducted by
DuckDuckGo
, 48% of participants chose not to respond, prompting lead researcher
Elie Bursztein
to observe, "Surveys are clearly not the best approach to understand why people use private browsing mode due to the embarrassment factor." Additionally, 18% of respondents indicated that their main use of private browsing modes was for
online shopping
.
[
9
]
[
10
]
[
11
]
A study by the
Mozilla Foundation
found that most sessions lasted only about 10 minutes. However, there were periods of increased activation, usually from 11 a.m. to 2 p.m., at 5 p.m., between 9 p.m. and 10 p.m., and a minor peak occurred about an hour or two after midnight.
[
12
]
Support in popular browsers
[
edit
]
Private browsing is known by different names in different browsers.
[
13
]
29 April 2005
(
2005-04-29
)
Safari
2.0
Private Browsing (Command⌘+Shift+n)
11 December 2008
(
2008-12-11
)
Google Chrome
Incognito
(Ctrl+Shift+n or ⌘+Shift+n for Mac)
[
14
]
19 March 2009
(
2009-03-19
)
[
15
]
Internet Explorer
InPrivate Browsing
(Ctrl+Shift+p or ⌘+Shift+p for Mac)
30 June 2009
(
2009-06-30
)
Mozilla Firefox 3.5
[
16
]
Private Browsing (Ctrl+Shift+p or ⌘+Shift+p for Mac)
2 March 2010
(
2010-03-02
)
Opera 10.50
[
17
]
Private Tab / Private Window (Ctrl+Shift+n or ⌘+Shift+n for Mac)
18 November 2014
(
2014-11-18
)
Amazon Silk
[
18
]
Private Browsing (Swipe from the left edge of the screen, and then tap Settings and select Enter Private Browsing)
29 July 2015
(
2015-07-29
)
Microsoft Edge
InPrivate Browsing (Ctrl+Shift+n or ⌘+Shift+p for Mac)
13 November 2019
(
2019-11-13
)
Brave
Private Browsing (Ctrl+Shift+n or ⌘+Shift+n for Mac)
Security
[
edit
]
It is a
common misconception
that private browsing modes can protect users from being
tracked
by other websites or their
Internet service provider
(ISP).
[
19
]
Such entities can still use information such as
IP addresses
and
user accounts
to uniquely identify users.
[
19
]
[
20
]
Private browsers on
iOS
, not created by
Apple
, must adhere to specific standards and regulations to be available on its platform for
iPhone
and
iPad
. Specifically, these browsers are required to employ the
WebKit
framework for rendering web pages. Consequently, third-party browsers cannot use their own rendering engines and must depend on Apple's framework instead. This constraint impacts the range of privacy features that these browsers can provide.
[
21
]
This is one of the reasons why some browsers have partly addressed this shortcoming by offering additional privacy features that can be automatically enabled when using private browsing mode, such as Firefox's "Tracking Protection" feature to control use of web trackers (which has since been rolled into a larger "content blocking" function extended outside of private browsing mode), and
Opera
offering an in-house
VPN
service embedded within the browser.
[
22
]
[
9
]
Brazilian
researchers published the results of a project where they applied
forensic
techniques (namely the Foremost data carving tool and Strings program) to extract information about the users browsing activities on Internet Explorer and Firefox browsers with their private mode enabled. They were able to collect enough data to identify pages visited and even partially reconstruct them.
[
23
]
This research was later extended to include the Chrome and Safari browsers. The gathered data proved that the browsers' private mode implementations are not able to fully hide users' browsing activities and that browsers in private mode leave traces of activities in caching structures and files related to the
paging
process of the
operating system
.
[
24
]
Another independent security analysis, performed by a group of researchers at
Newcastle University
, reported a range of potential security vulnerabilities in the implementation of the private modes across Chrome, Firefox, Internet Explorer, and Safari, including that;
[
25
]
Browser extensions
could still record history if they were active in private mode. Although Chrome and Firefox have since required extensions to be enabled on an opt-in basis for their private browsing modes,
[
26
]
an installed extension in the normal mode could learn the user's activities in the private mode by measuring the usage of shared computing resources.
Data erasure by the browser alone is found to be insufficient. For example, the records of visited websites during the private session can be retained in memory for a long time even after the private session is closed. In addition, the visited website records are usually kept by the operating system in the local
DNS
cache.
[
27
]
Furthermore, the modified timestamps of certain profile files saved on the disk may reveal if the private mode was previously turned on and when it was turned on.
Software bugs
present in some browsers were found to seriously degrade the security of the private mode. For example, in some earlier versions of Safari, the browser retained private browsing history records if the browser program was not closed normally (e.g., as a result of a crash), or if the user acted to add a
bookmark
within the private mode.
Depending on whether the session is in the private or the normal mode, web browsers typically exhibit different
user interfaces
and traffic characteristics. This allows a remote website to tell if the user is currently in the private mode, for example, by checking the color of the hyperlinks or measuring the time of writing cookies.
Bugs and security vulnerabilities in extensions themselves may also leak personally identifiable data from private mode.
[
28
]
Implementations of the
HTML5
FileSystem API can be used to detect users in private mode. In Google Chrome, the FileSystem API was not available in Incognito mode prior to version 76. To
prevent circumvention
of
paywall
policies and evasion of
web tracking
scripts used to monetize traffic, a number of websites — including
The New York Times
— have used such behavior to block access to users in private browsing mode, and requiring them to subscribe or log in. Chrome 76 allows the FileSystem API to be used in Incognito mode; explaining the change, Google argued that the ability to detect the use of Incognito mode infringes on users' privacy. However, it was later discovered that the disk space quotas for the API differed between normal and Incognito modes, providing another means by which to detect Incognito users.
[
29
]
[
8
]
[
30
]
Despite statements otherwise by Google, this has not yet been patched. Scripts have also been developed to detect private browsing mode on other browsers, such as Firefox.
[
31
]
Associated lawsuit
[
edit
]
In December 2023, Google settled a $5 billion consumer privacy lawsuit that alleged its practises allowed it to track users in private browsing mode in various browsers.
[
32
]
See also
[
edit
]
Dark web
Internet privacy
Web browser
References
[
edit
]
^
Trapani, Gina
(4 May 2005).
"Safari's private (porn) browsing mode"
.
Lifehacker
. Retrieved
11 April
2010
.
^
Foley, Mary Jo.
"Microsoft to roll out more granular 'porn mode' with IE 8"
.
ZDNet
. Archived from
the original
on 9 October 2008
. Retrieved
4 October
2008
.
^
Sadighi, Lalee.
"Microsoft's Internet Explorer 8 Goes 'Porn Mode'
"
.
Red Herring
. Archived from
the original
on 12 September 2008
. Retrieved
4 October
2008
.
^
Kidman, Angus.
"Microsoft releases IE8 beta 2: MS porn mode included"
.
APC
. Retrieved
4 October
2008
.
^
"Adobe Flash 10.1 supports "private browsing"
"
.
The H
. Retrieved
14 August
2019
.
^
"Adobe Flash Player Private Browsing May Force Change in Fraud Fight"
.
eWeek
. 12 April 2010
. Retrieved
14 August
2019
.
^
Paul, Ian (11 March 2014).
"Three practical reasons to use your browser's private mode"
.
PCWorld
. Retrieved
14 August
2019
.
^
Jump up to:
a
b
Brownlee, Chip (31 July 2019).
"Google's Chrome Update Just Unlocked Lots of Newspapers' Metered Paywalls"
.
Slate Magazine
. Retrieved
14 August
2019
.
^
Jump up to:
a
b
Bursztein, Elie
.
"Understanding how people use private browsing"
. Retrieved
14 August
2019
.
^
Espiner, Tom.
"Private browsing tools still leave data trail"
.
ZDNet
. Retrieved
14 August
2019
.
^
"Private browsing: 16 good reasons to use incognito mode"
.
ZDNet
. Archived from
the original
on 22 June 2018
. Retrieved
14 August
2019
.
^
Ulmer, Hamilton (23 August 2010).
"Understanding Private Browsing"
.
Blog of Metrics
.
Mozilla Foundation
. Retrieved
24 August
2010
.
^
Parchisanu, Daniel (9 November 2018).
"How to go incognito in all web browsers: Chrome, Firefox, Opera, Edge, and Internet Explorer"
.
Digital Citizen
. Retrieved
9 January
2019
.
^
Porciello, Loris (23 May 2024).
"Non farti spiare quando navighi, la funzione Google che ti permette di salvare la tua privacy"
.
OsservatorioIraq
(in Italian)
. Retrieved
31 August
2024
.
^
"Microsoft Announces Availability of Internet Explorer 8"
(Press release).
Microsoft
. 19 March 2009. Archived from
the original
on 22 March 2009
. Retrieved
16 December
2011
.
^
"Mozilla Cross-Reference mozilla1.9.1"
.
Mozilla Foundation
. Retrieved
26 May
2009
.
^
Mateu, Roberto.
"Opera 10.5 pre-alpha for Labs"
.
Opera Software
. Archived from
the original
on 24 August 2011
. Retrieved
22 December
2009
.
^
"Private Browsing for Amazon Silk"
.
Amazon Inc.
Archived from
the original
on 22 December 2014
. Retrieved
18 November
2014
.
^
Jump up to:
a
b
Grothaus, Michael (12 April 2019).
"Incognito mode won't keep your browsing private. Do this instead"
.
Fast Company
. Retrieved
14 August
2019
.
^
"Incognito mode while browsing - Myths Busted - Privacyflake"
.
www.privacyflake.com
. Archived from
the original
on 5 September 2019.
^
"8 Best Private Browsers for iOS. Our picks for iPhone & iPad users [2024] | Incogni"
.
blog.incogni.com
. 2 March 2023
. Retrieved
14 March
2024
.
^
Cimpanu, Catalin.
"Firefox 63 released with 'always-on' tracking protection"
.
ZDNet
. Retrieved
14 August
2019
.
^
R. Ruiz, F. P. Amatte, K. J. B. Park,
Tornando Pública a Navegação "In Private"
. Proceedings of the Seventh International Conference on Forensic Computer Science – ICoFCS 2012, Available online Sep 2012.
^
R. Ruiz, F. P. Amatte, K. J. B. Park,
Opening the "Private Browsing" Data – Acquiring Evidence of Browsing Activities
. Proceedings of the International Conference on Information Security and Cyber Forensics (InfoSec2014), Available online Oct 2014.
^
Satvat, Kiavash; Forshaw, Matthew; Hao, Feng; Toreini, Ehsan (2014).
"On the privacy of private browsing – A forensic approach"
.
Journal of Information Security and Applications
.
19
:
88–
100.
doi
:
10.1016/j.jisa.2014.02.002
.
^
Keizer, Gregg (8 March 2019).
"How to go incognito in Chrome, Firefox, Safari and Edge"
.
Computerworld
. Retrieved
14 August
2019
.
^
Verger, Rob (26 February 2018).
"Your private browsing isn't as incognito as you want it to be"
. Retrieved
24 September
2020
.
^
B. Zhao, P. Liu,
Private Browsing Mode Not Really That Private: Dealing with Privacy Breaches Caused by Browser Extensions
. In Proceedings of the 45th Annual IEEE/IFIP International Conference on Dependable Systems and Networks (DSN 2015), Rio de Janeiro, Brazil, Available online June 2015.
^
Tung, Liam.
"Chrome's 'more private' Incognito mode: Websites can still detect you're using it"
.
ZDNet
. Retrieved
14 August
2019
.
^
Duckett, Chris.
"Google to clamp down on Incognito Mode detection"
.
ZDNet
. Retrieved
14 August
2019
.
^
Cimpanu, Catalin.
"Incognito mode detection still works in Chrome despite promise to fix"
.
ZDNet
. Retrieved
25 June
2020
.
^
"Google settles $5 billion consumer privacy lawsuit"
.
External links
[
edit
]
"How to Turn On Private or Incognito Browsing"
.
wikiHow
. Retrieved
31 July
2018
.
show
v
t
e
Web browsers
hide
Features
standards
protocols
Features
Bookmarks
Extensions
Privacy mode
Web standards
HTML
v5
CSS
DOM
JavaScript
WebAssembly
Web storage
IndexedDB
WebGL
WebGPU
Protocols
HTTP
Encryption
Cookies
third-party
OCSP
WebRTC
WebSocket
show
Active
Blink
-based
Proprietary
Google Chrome
Arc
Avast
Coc Coc
Comodo
Epic
Huawei
Maxthon
Microsoft Edge
Opera
(
Mobile
)
Puffin
QQ
Samsung
Silk
Sleipnir
SRWare
UC
Vivaldi
Whale
Yandex
FOSS
Chromium
Brave
Dooble
Falkon
Otter
Supermium
ungoogled
Gecko
-based
Firefox
Floorp
GNU IceCat
LibreWolf
Midori
SlimBrowser
Tor
Zen
Gecko
forks
Basilisk
K-Meleon
Pale Moon
SeaMonkey
Waterfox
WebKit
-based
Safari
GNOME Web
iCab
Orion
Multi-
engine
360
DuckDuckGo
Konqueror
Lunascape
NetFront
qutebrowser
Other
Dillo
eww
Flow
Ladybird
Links
Lynx
NetSurf
Opera Mini
w3m
show
Discontinued
Blink
-based
Beaker
Citrio
Flock
Redcore
Rockmelt
SalamWeb
Sputnik
Torch
Gecko
-based
Beonex
Camino
Classilla
Conkeror
Firefox Lite
Galeon
Ghostzilla
IceDragon
Kazehakase
Kylo
Lotus
MicroB
Minimo
Mozilla suite
PirateBrowser
Pogo
Strata
Swiftfox
Swiftweasel
TenFourFox
Timberwolf
xB
MSHTML
-based
Internet Explorer
AOL
Deepnet
GreenBrowser
MediaBrowser
NeoPlanet
NetCaptor
SpaceTime
ZAC
WebKit
-based
Arora
BOLT
Dolphin
Fluid
Google TV
Iris
Mercury
Nokia Symbian
OmniWeb
Opera Coast
Origyn
QtWeb
Shiira
Steel
surf
Uzbl
WebPositive
xombrero
Other
abaco
Amaya
Arachne
Arena
Blazer
Cake
Charon
CM
Deepfish
Edge Legacy
ELinks
Gazelle
HotJava
IBM Home Page Reader
IBM WebExplorer
IBrowse
Internet Explorer for Mac
KidZui
Line Mode
Mosaic
MSN TV
NetPositive
Netscape
Skweezer
Skyfire
ThunderHawk
Vision
WinWAP
WorldWideWeb
Category
Comparisons
List
Categories
:
Web browsers
Internet privacy
2005 introductions
Hidden categories:
CS1 Italian-language sources (it)
Articles with short description
Short description matches Wikidata
Use dmy dates from December 2021
Sub-policy 3
https://www.onsolve.com/privacy-statement/#PrivacyPolicy:
Skip to content
ONSOLVE, LLC PRIVACY NOTICE
Read French Canadian privacy policy and terms of use
Read Mexican Spanish privacy policy and terms of use
Why do we collect information?
Who do we share information with?
How do we use cookies?
California Do-Not-Track
Your Rights
What information do we collect?
Security precautions
OnSolve, LLC Privacy Notice For California Residents
Changes to Privacy Policy
OnSolve, LLC Terms of Use
For All Services
Recipient Responsibilities (applicable only to Recipients)
CityWatch® and TelAlert® Additional Terms
Mobile Applications Terms of Use
Initiator Responsibilities (applicable only to Initiators)
CodeRED Weather Warning®, Weather Warning and FirstCall® Weather Additional Terms
MyDailyCall® Additional Terms
Social Media Terms of Use
­­­­­ONSOLVE, LLC PRIVACY NOTICE
ONSOLVE, LLC (“OnSolve”) is firmly committed to your privacy. This Privacy Notice states our privacy practices when you visit our website or use any of our products, apps or services (collectively, the “Services”). Our mission in implementing this Privacy Notice is to protect your information and use it only to provide you with the highest quality Services available. The privacy and security of your information is of paramount importance to us. We do not sell, lease, rent, or barter ANY of your personal information to any third parties without your consent other than as provided in this Notice. We value the trust you place in OnSolve. We are committed to providing a website with a secure environment and unparalleled customer service. This Privacy Notice describes the information we collect and how we use such information. Additional terms regarding your use of our Services are contained in the applicable agreement between OnSolve (or its affiliate) and you. As an agent processing personal information on behalf of our customers, OnSolve does not own or control the personal information that it processes on behalf of its customers and does not have a direct relationship with all individuals whose personal information may be processed in connection with the provision of our Services. In these circumstances, OnSolve’s customers are responsible for providing appropriate notice to the relevant individuals and obtaining any requisite consent.
Why do we collect information?
In general, we collect information to help us in our marketing and promotional efforts, to analyze user behavior, and to customize and improve our Services. This information is used to assist OnSolve in serving you when visiting any of our websites or using any of our Services. Our goal is to provide you with a personalized service which includes continually looking for ways to improve our Services and enhance your experience on our websites.
What information do we collect?
The type of information we collect may be different depending on whether you are signing up to receive notifications, using our Services, communicating to our customer support team, or simply visiting our website. During any one of these processes, we collect contact information, which includes your email address, physical address, phone numbers and/or wireless device information. This information will be used to provide the Services to you. By simply visiting our website (without filling out any forms), we will not collect data that does personally identifies you, but data about your activities (e.g., the pages you viewed, the date and time of your visit, and location information from your IP address or GPS location) is collected. We may use this information to improve our Services, obtain market research information, or better understand how our Services are used generally. We do not intentionally collect personal information from anyone we know to be under eighteen (18) years of age. If you provide us with your information, you represent and warrant that: (i) you are eighteen (18) years of age or older; or, (ii) if you are providing information for a child under eighteen (18) years of age for the purpose of receiving notifications, you are the parent or legal guardian of such child; you are over eighteen (18) years of age; and that you are legally authorized to provide information for such child to be contacted through the Services.
Who do we share information with?
Information may be shared with our affiliates and service providers as needed for business purposes which include delivery of our Services, account administration, customer service, transaction processing, processing and delivery of account statements, and research and analysis. Customers we have a contractual relationship with may view your standard personal information through use of our Services. Through these contractual relationships, we require customers and service providers to maintain a level of privacy protection comparable to our own practices. We may share aggregated statistics of user behavior (e.g., customers, traffic patterns, etc.) with our partners. The aggregated information will not identify any individual personally or contain any personally identifiable information. Our policy is to notify individuals who use our Services of requests for their personal information prior to disclosure unless we are prohibited by law from doing so or in exceptional circumstances, such as emergencies.
Security precautions
We have stringent security measures in place to protect against the loss, misuse, and alteration of information under our control. We use secure technology, privacy protection controls, and restrictions on employee access in order to safeguard your information; however, the very nature of the Internet makes it impossible to guarantee the security of transmitted data.
How do we use cookies?
Like many other sites on the Internet, our website uses cookies and similar technologies such as web beacons, tags and JavaScript alone or in conjunction with cookies to compile information about the usage of our websites and interaction with emails from us. If you do not want this site to place a cookie on your browser and track your activity, you may leave the site or you may browse the site using
privacy mode in your web browser
. To learn how to use privacy mode, refer to the links below depending on the browser you use.
InPrivate mode in Microsoft Internet Explorer
Incognito mode in Google Chrome
Private browsing mode in Mozilla FireFox
Private browsing mode in Apple Safari
ONSOLVE, LLC PRIVACY NOTICE FOR CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS
Effective Date: December 31, 2019 This Privacy Notice for California Residents supplements the information contained in the general
Privacy Notice
of OnSolve, LLC ("OnSolve, " "we" or "our") and applies solely to all visitors to our website and users of any of our products, apps or services (collectively, the "Services") who reside in the State of California ("consumers" or "you"). We adopt this Privacy Notice to comply with the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 ("CCPA") and any terms defined in the CCPA have the same meaning when used in this Privacy Notice.
Information We Collect
Our Services collect information that identifies, relates to, describes, references, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or device ("personal information"). In particular, our Services have collected the following categories of personal information from OnSolve visitors and users within the last twelve (12) months:
Category
Examples
Collected
A. Identifiers.
A real name, alias, postal address, unique personal identifier, employee identifier, online identifier, Internet Protocol address, email address, account name, or other similar identifiers.
YES
B. Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)).
A name, signature, address, personal telephone number, business telephone number. Some personal information included in this category may overlap with other categories.
YES
C. Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law.
Age (40 years or older), race, color, ancestry, national origin, citizenship, religion or creed, marital status, medical condition, physical or mental disability, sex (including gender, gender identity, gender expression, pregnancy or childbirth and related medical conditions), sexual orientation, veteran or military status, genetic information (including familial genetic information).
NO
D. Commercial information.
Records of personal property, products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
NO
E. Biometric information.
Genetic, physiological, behavioral, and biological characteristics, or activity patterns used to extract a template or other identifier or identifying information, such as, fingerprints, faceprints, and voiceprints, iris or retina scans, keystroke, gait, or other physical patterns, and sleep, health, or exercise data.
NO
F. Internet or other similar network activity.
Browsing history, search history, information on a consumer's interaction with a website, application, or advertisement.
YES
G. Geolocation data.
Physical location or movements.
YES
H. Sensory data.
Audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or similar information.
NO
I. Professional or employment-related information.
Current or past job history or performance evaluations.
NO
J. Non-public education information (per the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g, 34 C.F.R. Part 99)).
Education records directly related to a student maintained by an educational institution or party acting on its behalf, such as class lists, student schedules, student identification codes or assignments.
YES
K. Inferences drawn from other personal information.
Profile reflecting a person's preferences, characteristics, psychological trends, predispositions, behavior, attitudes, intelligence, abilities, and aptitudes.
NO
Personal information does not include:
Publicly available information from government records.
Deidentified or aggregated consumer information.
Information excluded from the CCPA's scope, such as:
Health or medical information covered by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) and the California Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (CMIA) or clinical trial data;
Personal information covered by certain sector-specific privacy laws, including the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FRCA), the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (GLBA) or California Financial Information Privacy Act (FIPA), and the Driver's Privacy Protection Act of 1994.
OnSolve obtains the categories of personal information listed above from the following categories of sources:
Directly from you.
For example, when you complete our forms and when you register for and use our Services.
Indirectly from you.
For example, from observing your actions on our website
Directly from our customers.
For example, our customers provide personal information about consumers in order to receive the benefit of our services.
Use of Personal Information
We may use or disclose the personal information we collect for one or more of the following purposes:
To fulfill or meet the reason you provided the information. For example, if you share your name and contact information to request a price quote or ask a question about our Services, we will use that personal information to respond to your inquiry. If you provide your personal information to subscribe to our Services, we will use that information to process your payment and facilitate delivery of the Services. We may also save your information to facilitate new product orders or process refunds.
To provide, support, personalize, and develop our Services.
To create, maintain, customize, and secure your account with us.
To process your requests, purchases, transactions, and payments and prevent transactional fraud.
To provide you with support and to respond to your inquiries, including to investigate and address your concerns and monitor and improve our responses.
To personalize your experience of our Services and to deliver content and product and service offerings relevant to your interests, including targeted offers and ads through our website, third-party sites, and via email or text message (with your consent, where required by law).
To help maintain the safety, security, and integrity of our Services, databases and other technology assets, and business.
For testing, research, analysis, and product development, including to develop and improve our Services.
To respond to law enforcement requests and as required by applicable law, court order, or governmental regulations.
As described to you when collecting your personal information or as otherwise set forth in the CCPA.
To evaluate or conduct a merger, divestiture, restructuring, reorganization, dissolution, or other sale or transfer of some or all of OnSolve's assets, whether as a going concern or as part of bankruptcy, liquidation, or similar proceeding, in which personal information held by OnSolve about users of our Services is among the assets transferred.
OnSolve will not collect additional categories of personal information or use the personal information we collected for materially different, unrelated, or incompatible purposes without providing you notice.
Sharing Personal Information
OnSolve may disclose your personal information to a third party for a business purpose. When we disclose personal information for a business purpose, we enter into a contract that describes the purpose and requires the recipient to both keep that personal information confidential and not use it for any purpose except performing the contract.
Disclosures of Personal Information for a Business Purpose
In the preceding twelve (12) months, OnSolve has disclosed personal information to its service providers for the following business purposes: delivery of our Services, account administration, customer service, transaction processing, processing and delivery of account statements, and research and analysis.
Sales of Personal Information
In the preceding twelve (12) months, OnSolve has not sold personal information.
Your Rights and Choices
The CCPA provides consumers (California residents) with specific rights regarding their personal information. This section describes your CCPA rights and explains how to exercise those rights.
Access to Specific Information and Data Portability Rights
You have the right to request that OnSolve disclose certain information to you about our collection and use of your personal information over the past 12 months. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request (see Exercising Access, Data Portability, and Deletion Rights), we will disclose to you:
The categories of personal information we collected about you.
The categories of sources for the personal information we collected about you.
Our business or commercial purpose for collecting or selling that personal information.
The categories of third parties with whom we share that personal information.
The specific pieces of personal information we collected about you (also called a data portability request).
If we sold or disclosed your personal information for a business purpose, two separate lists disclosing:
sales, identifying the personal information categories that each category of recipient purchased; and
disclosures for a business purpose, identifying the personal information categories that each category of recipient obtained.
Deletion Request Rights
You have the right to request that OnSolve delete any of your personal information that we collected from you and retained, subject to certain exceptions. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request (see Exercising Access, Data Portability, and Deletion Rights), we will delete (and direct our service providers to delete) your personal information from our records, unless an exception applies. We may deny your deletion request if retaining the information is necessary for us or our service provider(s) to:
1. Complete the transaction for which we collected the personal information, provide a good or service that you requested, take actions reasonably anticipated within the context of our ongoing business relationship with you, or otherwise perform our contract with you.
2. Detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, or prosecute those responsible for such activities.
3. Debug products to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality.
4. Exercise free speech, ensure the right of another consumer to exercise their free speech rights, or exercise another right provided for by law.
5. Comply with the California Electronic Communications Privacy Act (Cal. Penal Code § 1546
seq.
).
6. Engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, historical, or statistical research in the public interest that adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws, when the information's deletion may likely render impossible or seriously impair the research's achievement, if you previously provided informed consent.
7. Enable solely internal uses that are reasonably aligned with consumer expectations based on your relationship with us.
8. Comply with a legal obligation.
9. Make other internal and lawful uses of that information that are compatible with the context in which you provided it.
Exercising Access, Data Portability, and Deletion Rights
To exercise the access, data portability, and deletion rights described above, please submit a verifiable consumer request to us by either:
Calling us at 1-866-939-0911
Visiting our website at
onsolve.com
.
Emailing us at privacysupport@onsolve.com.
Only you, or someone legally authorized to act on your behalf, may make a verifiable consumer request related to your personal information. You may also make a verifiable consumer request on behalf of your minor child. You may only make a verifiable consumer request for access or data portability twice within a 12-month period. The verifiable consumer request must:
Provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected personal information or an authorized representative.
Describe your request with sufficient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate, and respond to it.
We cannot respond to your request or provide you with personal information if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm the personal information relates to you. Making a verifiable consumer request does not require you to create an account with us. However, we do consider requests made through your password protected account sufficiently verified when the request relates to personal information associated with that specific account. We will only use personal information provided in a verifiable consumer request to verify the requestor's identity or authority to make the request.
Response Timing and Format
We endeavor to respond to a verifiable consumer request within forty-five (45) days of its receipt. If we require more time, we will inform you of the reason and extension period in writing. If you have an account with us, we will deliver our written response to that account. If you do not have an account with us, we will deliver our written response by mail or electronically, at your option. Any disclosures we provide will only cover the 12-month period preceding the verifiable consumer request's receipt. The response we provide will also explain the reasons we cannot comply with a request, if applicable. For data portability requests, we will select a format to provide your personal information that is readily useable and should allow you to transmit the information from one entity to another entity without hindrance. We do not charge a fee to process or respond to your verifiable consumer request unless it is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded. If we determine that the request warrants a fee, we will tell you why we made that decision and provide you with a cost estimate before completing your request.
Non-Discrimination
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your CCPA rights. Unless permitted by the CCPA, we will not:
Deny you goods or services.
Charge you different prices or rates for goods or services, including through granting discounts or other benefits, or imposing penalties.
Provide you a different level or quality of goods or services.
Suggest that you may receive a different price or rate for goods or services or a different level or quality of goods or services.
However, we may offer you certain financial incentives permitted by the CCPA that can result in different prices, rates, or quality levels. Any CCPA-permitted financial incentive we offer will reasonably relate to your personal information's value and contain written terms that describe the program's material aspects. Participation in a financial incentive program requires your prior opt in consent, which you may revoke at any time.
Changes to Our Privacy Notice
OnSolve reserves the right to amend this Privacy Notice at our discretion and at any time. When we make changes to this Privacy Notice, we will post the updated Privacy Notice on our website and update the Privacy Notice's effective date. Your continued use of our Services following the posting of changes constitutes your acceptance of such changes.
Contact Information
If you have any questions or comments about this Privacy Notice, the ways in which OnSolve collects and uses your information as described herein and in OnSolve’s general
PrivacyPolicy
, your choices and rights regarding such use, or wish to exercise your rights under California law, please do not hesitate to contact us at:
Phone
: 1-866-939-0911
Website
:
www.onsolve.com
Email
:
legalrequests@onsolve.com
Postal Address
: OnSolve, LLC Attn. OnSolve Legal Team 780 W. Granada Blvd. Ormond Beach FL 32174
California Do-Not-Track
OnSolve does not track its customers over time and across third-party websites to provide targeted advertising and therefore does not respond to Do-Not-Track (DNT) signals.
ACCOUNTABILITY FOR ONWARD TRANSFER
Except as permitted or required by applicable law, if OnSolve transfers personal information provided by its Customers to a third party outside the European Economic Area (EEA), and in countries which are not subject to an adequacy decision by the European Commission and which may not provide for the same level of data protection as the EEA, we will ensure that the recipient of your Personal Data offers an adequate level of protection by entering into standard contractual clauses for the transfer of data as approved by the European Commission (Art. 46 GDPR) or we will ask you for your prior consent to such international data transfers. OnSolve reserves the right to transfer personal information in the event it sells or transfers all or a portion of its business or assets (including in the event of a reorganization, dissolution or liquidation).
CHOICE
The Service is not intended to transmit sensitive data, or personal health information, or financial-related information (including nonpublic information collected by financial institutions subject to regulations specific to the conduct of financial services) or other personal information sensitive in nature. We offer individuals the opportunity through a website we host to choose whether OnSolve may disclose their personal information to third parties (in addition to your local provider for use of the Services). Unless you elect to allow us to share your information, OnSolve will not use personal information for purposes beyond the scope for which the information was originally collected or subsequently authorized by the individual and we will not retain personal information for longer than necessary or as otherwise set forth in the applicable customer agreement. Individuals may contact OnSolve as indicated below regarding the use or disclosure of their personal information. If we process your Personal Data for the purpose of sending you marketing communications, you may manage your receipt of marketing and non-transactional communications from us by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link located on the bottom of our marketing emails, by replying or texting ‘STOP’ if you receive SMS communications or by turning off push notifications on our apps on your device. Additionally, you may unsubscribe by contacting OnSolve using the information in the “Contacting us” section, below. Please note that opting out of marketing communications does not opt you out of receiving important business communications related to your current relationship with us, such as communications about your subscriptions or event registrations, service announcements or security information.
DATA INTEGRITY
OnSolve depends on applicable customers and users of our Services to update and correct personal information, to the extent necessary, for the purposes for which the information was collected or subsequently authorized by the relevant individuals. With respect to personal information OnSolve may obtain directly from individuals through its Website, OnSolve takes reasonable steps to ensure that the personal information we process is (i) relevant for the purposes for which it was collected, (ii) reliable for its intended use, and (iii) accurate, complete and current. Individuals may contact OnSolve as indicated below to request that OnSolve update, correct or request deletion of their personal information. Individuals who seek access or who seek to correct, amend, or delete personal information that OnSolve maintains on behalf of a Customer in connection with the provision of its Services should make such requests directly to the appropriate customer. If an individual is unable to contact the appropriate customer, or does not obtain a response from the customer, OnSolve will provide reasonable assistance in forwarding the individual’s request to the customer. OnSolve may limit or deny access to personal information where providing such access is unreasonably burdensome or expensive under the circumstances, or as otherwise permitted by applicable law. Individuals may request access to their personal information by contacting OnSolve as indicated below.
Your Rights
You have certain rights relating to your Personal Data, subject to local data protection laws. Depending on the applicable laws and, in particular, if you are located in the EEA, these rights may include the right:
To access your Personal Data held by us (right to access);
To rectify inaccurate Personal Data and, taking into account the purpose of processing the Personal Data, ensure it is complete (right to rectification);
To erase/delete your Personal Data, to the extent permitted by applicable data protection laws (right to erasure; right to be forgotten);
To restrict our processing of your Personal Data, to the extent permitted by law (right to restriction of processing);
To transfer your Personal Data to another controller, to the extent possible (right to data portability);
To object to any processing of your Personal Data carried out on the basis of our legitimate interests (right to object). Where we process your Personal Data for direct marketing purposes or share it with third parties for their own direct marketing purposes, you can exercise your right to object at any time to such processing without having to provide any specific reason for such objection;
Not to be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling, which produces legal effects (“Automated Decision-Making”). Automated Decision-Making currently does not take place on our websites; and
To the extent we base the collection, processing and sharing of your Personal Data on your consent, to withdraw your consent at any time, without affecting the lawfulness of the processing based on such consent before its withdrawal.
If you are a resident of California, under the age of 18 and have registered for an account with us, you may ask us to remove content or information that you have posted to our websites. Please note that your request does not ensure complete or comprehensive removal of the content or information, because, for example, some of your content may have been reposted by another visitor to our websites. To exercise your rights, please contact us by submitting a request to
privacysupport@onsolve.com
. We respond to all legitimate requests within one month and we will contact you if we need additional information in order to honor your request. If your data has been submitted to us by an OnSolve customer for purposes of providing our services to that Customer and you wish to exercise any rights you may have under applicable data protection laws, please contact that customer directly. If you submit a request directly to us, please provide to us the name of the customer who submitted your data to us so that we are able to refer your request to that customer.
Changes to Privacy Notice
OnSolve will periodically review and update this Privacy Notice from time to time. OnSolve welcomes your comments regarding this Privacy Notice or the Services we provide. If you have any questions, please contact OnSolve by telephone, e-mail, or postal mail.
OnSolve Privacy Notice Contact Information:
OnSolve, LLC
Attn. OnSolve Legal Team
legalrequests@onsolve.com
1-866-939-0911 780 W. Granada Blvd. Ormond Beach FL 32174 We reserve the right to change or update this Privacy Policy.
OnSolve, LLC Terms of Use
For All Services
ONSOLVE, LLC, ("OnSolve"), welcomes you to its Website. Please review the following Terms of Use ("Terms") as well as OnSolve’s Privacy Policy (“Privacy Policy”) concerning your use of our website and all OnSolve products and services (collectively, the “Services”). By accessing, using or downloading any materials from the website or our Services, you agree to follow and be bound by these Terms and the Privacy Policy. If you do not agree with these Terms, please do not use this website or our Services. Please note that if you are a customer of OnSolve, these Terms are subject to the terms of any executed end user license agreement between the Customer and OnSolve. When using any of our Services, you will be governed by these Terms, the Privacy Policy, as well as any additional terms or guidelines applicable to the specific Services you use, which shall be posted from time to time below or in such Services. All additional terms or guidelines applicable to the specific Services, along with the Privacy Policy, shall be incorporated into these Terms.
Links and Third Party Publications.
This website may contain links to websites controlled by parties other than OnSolve. OnSolve is not responsible for and does not endorse or accept any responsibility for the contents or use of these third party websites. OnSolve is providing these links to you only as a convenience, and the inclusion of any link does not imply endorsement by OnSolve of the linked website. It is your responsibility to take precautions to ensure that whatever you select for your use is free of viruses or other items of a destructive nature. OnSolve has not co-authored, ratified, endorsed or adopted the information contained in any publications referenced on this website or any statistics published by third parties by publishing them on this website.
Software Use Restrictions
Any software that may be made available to download from this website or through the Services (“Software”) is the copyrighted work of OnSolve and/or Third-Party Providers. Use of the Software is governed by the terms of the end user license agreement that accompanies or is included with the Software (“License Agreement”). An end user agrees to the License Agreement terms by installing, copying or using the Software. The Software is made available for downloading solely for use by end users according to the License Agreement. Without limiting the foregoing, the copying or reproduction of the Software to any other server or location for further reproduction or redistribution is expressly prohibited. Any reproduction or redistribution of the Software not in accordance with the License Agreement is expressly prohibited by law, and may result in severe civil and criminal penalties. Violators will be prosecuted to the maximum extent possible. THE SOFTWARE IS WARRANTED, IF AT ALL, ONLY ACCORDING TO THE TERMS OF THE LICENSE AGREEMENT; ALL OTHER WARRANTIES ARE DISCLAIMED AS SET FORTH HEREIN.
Intellectual Property Rights
All materials provided on this website or in our Services, including but not limited to information, documents, products, logos, graphics, sounds, images, software and services (“Materials”), are provided either by OnSolve or by their respective third party manufacturers, authors, developers and vendors (“Third-Party Providers”) and are the copyrighted work of OnSolve and/or its Third-Party Providers. Except as stated herein, none of the Materials may be copied, reproduced, distributed, republished, downloaded, displayed, posted or transmitted in any form or by any means, including but not limited to electronic, mechanical, photocopying, recording or other means, without the prior express written permission of OnSolve or the Third-Party Provider. Also, you may not “mirror” any Materials without prior express written permission from OnSolve. Except where expressly provided otherwise by OnSolve, nothing on this website shall be construed to confer any license under any of OnSolve or any Third-Party Provider’s intellectual property rights, whether by estoppels, implication, or otherwise. You acknowledge sole responsibility for obtaining any such licenses. See the “Legal Contact Information” below if you have any questions about obtaining such licenses. Materials provided by Third-Party Providers have not been independently reviewed, tested, certified, or authenticated in whole or in part by OnSolve. OnSolve does not provide, sell, license or lease any of the Materials other than those specifically identified as being provided by OnSolve. OnSolve hereby grants you permission to display, distribute and download OnSolve Materials on this website provided that: (1) both the copyright notice identified below and this permission notice appear in the Materials; (2) the use of such Materials is solely for personal, non-commercial and informational use and will not be copied or posted on any networked computer, broadcast in any media or used for commercial gain; and (3) the Materials are not modified in any way. This permission terminates automatically without notice if you breach any of these terms or conditions. Upon termination, you will immediately destroy any downloaded or printed Materials. Any unauthorized use of any Materials contained on this website may violate copyright laws, trademark laws, the laws of privacy and publicity, and communications regulations and statutes. Elements of this website and our Services are protected by trade dress and other laws and may not be copied or imitated in whole or in part. No logo, graphic, sound or image from the website or our Services may be copied or retransmitted unless expressly permitted by OnSolve. OnSolve®, MIR3®, MIR3 IN®, MIR3 Intelligent Notification®, CodeRED®, CodeRED Weather Warning®, SmartNotice®, TelAlert®, Universal ANI®, Validata®, MyDailyCall®, CityWatch®, Code-ED®, One Call Now®, Send Word Now®, SWN Direct®, Alert Tracer®, WeatherBlast®, Message Builder®, Every Message Counts® and their associated logos and/or other OnSolve Services referenced herein are trademarks of OnSolve and may be registered in certain jurisdictions. All other product names, company names, marks, logos and symbols may be the trademarks of their respective owners.
Restricted Rights Legend
Any Software that is downloaded from this website or through the Services for or on behalf of the United States of America, its agencies and/or instrumentalities (“U.S. Government”), is provided with Restricted Rights. Use, duplication or disclosure by the U.S. Government is subject to restrictions as set forth in subparagraph (c)(1)(ii) of the Rights in Technical Data and Computer Software clause at DFARS 252.227-7013 or subparagraphs (c)(1) and (2) of the Commercial Computer Software – Restricted Rights at 48 CFR 52.227-19, as applicable.
Submissions
Except where expressly provided otherwise by OnSolve, all comments, feedback, information or materials submitted to OnSolve through or in association with this website and our Services (“Submissions”) shall be considered non-confidential and OnSolve property. By providing such Submissions to OnSolve, you agree to assign to OnSolve, at no charge, all worldwide rights, title and interest in copyrights and other intellectual property rights to the Submissions. OnSolve shall be free to use and/or disseminate such Submissions on an unrestricted basis for any purpose. You acknowledge that you are responsible for the Submissions that you provide, and that you, not OnSolve, have full responsibility for the Submissions, including their legality, reliability, appropriateness, originality and copyright.
Use
You represent and warrant that you will use this website and the Services only to evaluate the technology or in accordance with any end-user license agreements and solely for lawful purposes in accordance with the terms specified herein. You hereby certify you are authorized or otherwise have consent from all of the parties who will receive notifications in the Services. Further, you have determined the phone numbers to be notified exclude emergency numbers and other numbers that may not be called using an automated system under applicable law, and that cell phone numbers will only be called when the owner of the cell phone has granted permission to do so. By way of example, and not as limitation, you agree to: comply with all federal, state and local laws, including but not limited to, the Fair Debt Collection Practices Act, Federal Trade Commission (“FTC”), the Federal Communications Commission (“FCC”), the Telephone Consumer Protection Act, or any other federal or state regulatory authority, and that you will not, or allow any third party to: (i) engage in any illegal, unethical, deceptive or misleading practices in connection with the use of the Services, including but not limited to, creating a false identity or forged email, phone or message header or otherwise attempt to mislead others as to the identity of the sender or the origin of the message; (ii) use the Services in connection with any junk email, junk phone messages, spamming or any unsolicited messages (commercial or otherwise); (iii) violate any privacy laws, our Privacy Policy, your privacy policy or the privacy policies of any other third party; (iv) do anything that would justify a complaint to the FTC or FCC; (v) provide, or knowingly allow any third parties to provide, content or other material to be transmitted in connection with or through the Services which: (a) is defamatory, libelous, obscene, or pornographic; (b) transmit any material that contains viruses, worms, cancel bots or any other harmful code or computer programs; or (c) that otherwise violates any law, statute, ordinance or regulation, (including without limitation the laws and regulations governing export control). The Services may not be used for telemarketing or solicitation or any kind. You will defend, indemnify and hold harmless OnSolve and the Releasees from and against any and all claims arising out of or incurred as a result of any acts, omissions, and/or breaches of you or any third party you allow to use the Services. In the event OnSolve provides you with a demo of the Services, OnSolve shall have the right at any time and for any reason, with or without cause, to terminate your access to the demo.
Limitations
EXCEPT WHERE OTHERWISE EXPRESSLY PROVIDED BY ONSOLVE: YOU UNDERSTAND AND AGREE THAT ONSOLVE, ALONG WITH ITS OFFICERS, MEMBERS, EMPLOYEES, AGENTS, AFFILIATES, PARENTS, SUCCESSORS AND ASSIGNS (THE “RELEASEES”) DISCLAIM ANY AND ALL LIABILITY, WHATSOEVER, WHETHER RAISED BY A THIRD PARTY OR OTHERWISE, FOR ANY AND ALL REASONS, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO PERSONAL INJURY, DEATH OR LOSS, INFRINGEMENT, INVASION OF PRIVACY, PROPERTY DAMAGE, AND INTERRUPTION TO BUSINESS WHICH MAY RESULT FROM THE USE OR ANY ERRORS OR OMISSIONS OF THE SERVICES, OR FROM THE FAILURE TO UPDATE OR PROVIDE ANY INFORMATION THROUGH THE SERVICES. YOU AGREE, TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, TO RELEASE, WAIVE, DISCHARGE, COVENENANT NOT TO SUE, AND HOLD HARMLESS ANY AND ALL RELEASEES FROM ANY AND ALL LIABILITY, LOSS, DAMAGE OR COST OF EVERY KIND OR NATURE WHATSOEVER, WHETHER KNOWN OR UNKNOWN, AND FROM ANY AND ALL PRESENT AND FUTURE CLAIMS, DEMANDS, CAUSES OF ACTION, AND LAWSUITS, IN LAW OR EQUITY, BY YOU OR BY ANY OTHER PERSON OR PERSONS CLAIMING THROUGH YOU, FOR ANY LOSS, INFRINGEMENT OR INVASION OF THE RIGHT OF PRIVACY CAUSED OR CLAIMED TO HAVE BEEN CAUSED, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, BY YOUR USE OF THIS WEBSITE OR BY THE DISCLOSURE OF YOUR INFORMATION. YOU FURTHER AGREE TO INDEMNIFY EACH RELEASEE FROM AND AGAINST ANY LOSSES, DAMAGES, LIABILITIES, COSTS OR EXPENSES (INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION REASONABLE ATTORNEYS’ FEES AND OTHER LEGAL EXPENSES) OF ANY KIND ARISING FROM OR ATTRIBUTABLE TO (A) ANY BREACH OF THE TERMS BY YOU OR (B) ANY THIRD-PARTY CLAIM AGAINST A RELEASEE RELATING TO YOUR USE OF THIS WEBSITE OR THE SERVICES. ONSOLVE SHALL NOT BE LIABLE FOR ANY DAMAGES SUFFERED AS A RESULT OF USING, MODIFYING, CONTRIBUTING, COPYING, DISTRIBUTING OR DOWNLOADING THE MATERIALS. TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, IN NO EVENT SHALL ANY RELEASEE BE LIABLE FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES WHATSOEVER (INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO LOST PROFITS, LOSS OF PRIVACY, LOSS OF CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION, OR BUSINESS INTERRUPTION) FROM OR DUE TO THE USE, MISUSE OR INABILITY TO USE THE SERVICES, HOWEVER IT ARISES, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, NEGLIGENCE OR OTHER TORTIOUS ACTION, EVEN IF THE RELEASEES HAVE BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. YOU EXPRESSLY AGREE THAT THE USE OF THE SERVICES IS AT YOUR SOLE RISK AND THAT THE SERVICES ARE PROVIDED SOLELY ON AN “AS IS,” “AS AVAILABLE,” AND “WITH ALL FAULTS” BASIS. ONSOLVE AND ONSOLVE’S CUSTOMERS SHALL NOT BE LIABLE TO YOU FOR ANY DAMAGES WHETHER BASED IN CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER LEGAL THEORY BEYOND A REFUND OF SUBSCRIBER FEES (IF ANY). YOU HAVE SOLE RESPONSIBILITY FOR THE ADEQUATE PROTECTION AND BACKUP OF DATA AND/OR EQUIPMENT USED IN CONNECTION WITH THE WEBSITE AND SERVICES AND YOU WILL NOT MAKE A CLAIM AGAINST ONSOLVE FOR LOST DATA, RE-RUN TIME, INACCURATE OUTPUT, WORK DELAYS OR LOST PROFITS RESULTING FROM THE USE OF THE MATERIALS.
Disclaimer:
EXCEPT WHERE OTHERWISE EXPRESSLY PROVIDED BY ONSOLVE: TO THE EXTENT ALLOWABLE BY LAW, ONSOLVE EXPRESSLY DISCLAIMS ANY AND ALL WARRANTIES, DUTIES AND CONDITIONS OF ANY KIND, WHETHER EXPRESS, IMPLIED OR STATUTORY, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION ANY WARRANTIES, DUTIES OR CONDITIONS OF GOOD FAITH, REASONABLE CARE, MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, AVAILABILITY, ACCURACY, TITLE AND NON-INFRINGEMENT. ONSOLVE MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS, WARRANTIES, GUARANTIES OR CONDITIONS AS TO THE QUALITY, SUITABILITY, TRUTH, ACCURACY OR COMPLETENESS OF ANY OF THE MATERIALS CONTAINED ON THE WEBSITE.
Local Laws: Export Control
OnSolve controls and operates this website and its Services from its headquarters in various locations in the United States of America and makes no representation that the Materials are appropriate or available for use in other locations. If you use this website or the Services from other locations, you are responsible for compliance with applicable local laws including but not limited to the export and import regulations of other countries. Unless otherwise explicitly stated, all marketing or promotional materials found on this website are solely directed to individuals, companies or other entities located in the United States of America. You acknowledge and agree that Materials are subject to the U.S. Export Administration Laws and Regulations. Diversion of such Materials contrary to U.S. law is prohibited. You agree that none of the Materials, nor any direct product there from, is being or will be acquired for, shipped, transferred, or re-exported, directly or indirectly, to proscribed or embargoed countries or their nationals, nor be used for nuclear activities, chemical biological weapons or missile projects unless authorized by the U.S. Government. Proscribed countries are set forth in the U.S. Export Administration Regulations. Countries subject to U.S. embargo are: Cuba, Iran, Iraq, Libya, North Korea, Syria and the Sudan. This list is subject to change without further notice from OnSolve, and you must comply with the list, as it exists in fact. You certify that you are not on the U.S. Department of Commerce’s Denied Persons List or affiliated lists or on the U.S. Department of Treasury’s Specially Designated Nationals List. You agree to comply strictly with all U.S. export laws and assume sole responsibility for obtaining licenses to export or re-export as may be required.
General
You agree that any dispute arising under these Terms or the Privacy Policy shall be submitted to binding arbitration according to the rules and regulations of, and administered by, the American Arbitration Association, and that any award granted pursuant to such arbitration may be rendered to final judgment. If any dispute arises hereunder, the prevailing party shall be entitled to all costs and attorney’s fees from the losing party for enforcement of any right included in these Terms or Privacy Policy, whether in Arbitration, a Court of first jurisdiction and all Courts of Appeal. These Terms and the Privacy Policy shall be governed under the laws of Florida, without regards to conflict of law principles, and the venue for any disputes hereunder shall be in Ormond Beach, Volusia County, Florida, or the federal courts encompassing such venue. In the event any provision of these Terms or the Privacy Policy is determined by an arbitrator or court of competent jurisdiction to be void, the remaining provisions shall remain binding on the parties hereto with the same effect as though the void provision(s) had been limited or deleted, as applicable. Certain obligations set forth herein represent independent covenants by which you may be bound and shall remain bound regardless of any breach of these Terms and the Privacy Policy and shall survive termination of these Terms or your use of the Services. OnSolve may assign these Terms in its sole discretion. You are not permitted to assign these Terms without the prior, written consent of OnSolve. The failure by OnSolve to exercise or enforce any right or provision of these Terms shall not constitute a waiver of such right or provision. The section headings in these Terms are provided solely for the convenience of the reader and do not modify these. You understand and agree that OnSolve may send you communications, announcements, newsletters, service announcements and other administrative messages. These messages are separate from any messages sent by OnSolve’s customers. All notices or requests, demands and other communications hereunder shall be in writing, and shall be deemed delivered to the appropriate party upon: (a) personal delivery, if delivered by hand during ordinary business hours; (b) the day of delivery if sent by U.S. Mail, postage pre-paid; (c) the day of signed receipt if sent by certified mail, postage pre-paid, or other nationally recognized carrier, return receipt or signature provided and addressed to the OnSolve as follows: ONSOLVE, LLC, 780 W. Granada Boulevard, Ormond Beach, FL 32174 OnSolve reserves the right to modify any portion of these Terms or the Privacy Policy at any time by posting the revised Terms
here
. Your continued use of any of the Services following any such posting constitutes your acceptance of the revised Terms and Privacy Policy. Any rights not expressly granted herein are reserved by OnSolve.
Initiator Responsibilities (applicable only to Initiators)
Only authorized Initiators are permitted of issuing notifications through the Services, pursuant to OnSolve’s end-user licensing agreement. Initiator access to the Services is password protected, and Initiators are responsible for maintaining the security of their password at all times. All Initiators agree to contact OnSolve immediately upon receipt of any information or knowledge that an Initiator’s account or password has been compromised. OnSolve will assume that all use of the Services under an Initiator’s account is done with the Initiator’s consent and knowledge and each Initiator shall be responsible for any unauthorized access using its password caused through no fault of OnSolve. All Initiators agree to provide true, accurate and complete information for any Recipient (as hereinafter defined) information which is entered into the Services, and to maintain the accuracy of such information, and that the provision of such information does not invade on the privacy of any Recipient.
All Initiators acknowledge and agree that, by entering any contact information into any of the Services, the Recipient who owns such contact information has expressly authorized the Initiator to enter such information into the Services to receive pre-recorded messages from OnSolve and the customer with which such Initiator is associated via an automated dialer.
Initiators further agree that the Services are to be used solely as a notification tool and not as a life-saving or property-saving device. Initiators are not agents of OnSolve nor authorized to bind OnSolve to any obligations. All Initiators agree that they shall not indicate that OnSolve has endorsed the content of any notification sent through any of the Services.
Recipient Responsibilities (applicable only to Recipients)
A Recipient is any individual person capable of receiving notifications. Recipients include any telephone number, text address, email address, or address which has been registered into any of the Services. All Recipients who receive text notifications are subject to terms required by OnSolve’s texting provider, available
here;
such terms provide more information on texting options. Recipients understand and agree that they shall be connected to one or more of OnSolve’s customers. If a Recipient is added to the Service via opt-in or commercially available data sources, and is registered for geo-location notifications, the Recipient will be associated with any OnSolve customer that has access to the Recipient’s geo-located area. Each Recipient further understands and agrees that Initiators and OnSolve have the ability to modify and/or remove Recipient information from the Services. Such removal is at the sole discretion of the Initiator and OnSolve.
Recipients acknowledge and agree that, by registering with any of the Services, they consent to be contacted, using an automated dialer and a pre-recorded message, by OnSolve and OnSolve’s customers.
Recipients may request to stop receiving messages through the Services by removing their number through the registration page used to sign up for the Service, by contacting the phone number listed in such message, by contacting their local customer, by opting out on this website or by contacting OnSolve at 866-939-0911. Each Recipient understands and agrees that removing the Recipient through the registration page may not remove the Recipient from all of OnSolve’s databases if such Recipient’s information is available through a commercially available database, or later re-entered into the Service through a customer database. In certain instances, Recipients may be able to receive messages through the Services in languages which the Recipient selects. Messages will only be translated if designated for translation by OnSolve’s customer. Each Recipient understands and agrees that all messages will be input in English and translated by a third-party, and that the translations are provided “AS-IS” and “WITH ALL FAULTS.” Translation may be discontinued at any time. Each Recipient understands and agrees that the Services are subscription based-services which are only available if purchased by a customer or through one of OnSolve’s apps. Accordingly, your access to notifications sent through the Services may be terminated at any time, for any reason. EACH RECIPIENT ACKNOWLEDGES THAT ONSOLVE’S CUSTOMERS ARE PROVIDING THE SERVICES AS A PUBLIC AND/OR EMPLOYMENT RELATED SERVICE AND FOR NO COMPENSATION FROM RECIPIENT.
RECIPIENT ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE
CUSTOMER MAY, IN ITS SOLE DISCRETION, TERMINATE THE SERVICES AT ANY TIME. RECIPIENT ALSO ACKNOWLEDGES THAT TECHNICAL PROBLEMS OR HUMAN ERROR MAY RESULT IN A FAILURE OF THE SERVICES AT ANY TIME
. IN CONSIDERATION OF THESE FACTORS, RECIPIENT HEREBY WAIVES, RELEASES, AND HOLDS HARMLESS THE CUSTOMER, ONSOLVE, AND THEIR RESPECTIVE PARENTS AND SUBSIDIARIES, FROM ANY CLAIM ARISING FROM A FAILURE, FOR ANY REASON, TO PROVIDE THE SERVICES AND RECIPIENT FURTHER AGREES TO WAIVE, RELEASE, AND HOLD HARMLESS AGAINST ANY CLAIM FOR DIRECT, INCIDENTAL, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES ARISING FROM ANY ACT OR OMISSION OF ONSOLVE, ONSOLVE’S CUSTOMERS, OR THEIR RESPECTIVE PARENTS AND SUBSIDIARIES, EMPLOYEES, SERVICE PROVIDERS, VOLUNTEERS OR INITIATORS, IN CONNECTION WITH THE CUSTOMER’S PARTICIPATION IN THE SERVICES. Each Recipient understands and agrees that OnSolve does not have control over telephone service, cellular service and internet service providers which may be necessary for sending messages through the Services, and accordingly, not all calls, texts and other notifications may come through when an Initiator sends a message through the Services, and that such failure shall not be deemed to be the responsibility of OnSolve, any OnSolve customer or the Initiator sending such message. Each Recipient further understands and agrees that the receipt of messages through the Service may cause the Recipient to incur phone, text, and data charges, and that OnSolve is in no way responsible for such charges. In general, telephone, text, email or mobile communications are subject to numerous variables, and as such the dissemination of high volumes of high-speed automated notifications typically cannot reach 100% of all desired recipients. By agreeing to these Terms the Recipient acknowledges that transmission of information via telephone, text, email or mobile app is reliant upon conditions beyond OnSolve and OnSolve’s customers; OnSolve and OnSolve’s customers do not warrant that the issuance of a notification will result in a successful connection or in a delivered warning message to the Recipient. Recipients further agree that the Services are to be used solely as a notification tool and not as a life-saving or property-saving device. For Recipients, these Terms, including but not limited to any additional terms for the specific Services and the Privacy Policy, constitutes the entire agreement between you and OnSolve with respect to the Services and supersedes and replaces all prior or contemporaneous understandings or agreements, written or oral, regarding such subject matter. Any waiver of any provision of these Terms or Privacy Policy will be effective only if in writing and signed by OnSolve. Recipient data that OnSolve collects from you is kept in OnSolve custody unless: 1) OnSolve has notified you on a public registration page that your information shall be transferred an OnSolve customer; 2) you have elected to make your information public when signing up for the Services; 3) you are providing your information on a private registration page directly to an OnSolve customer; or 4) we have been provided with your information from a third party or one of OnSolve’s customers. In the event your information is being transferred to an OnSolve customer or you have elected to make your information public, OnSolve will have no control over the disclosure of your information. In these instances, your information may be subject to public records requests and transferred for any purpose without OnSolve’s knowledge. ONSOLVE SHALL HAVE NO LIABILITY TO YOU AS A RESULT OF A CUSTOMER’S TRANSFER OF YOUR INFORMATION. Any information which is not transferred to a customer as described above, and which is kept in OnSolve custody, is kept confidential and OnSolve will take reasonable and appropriate steps to protect the information that you share with us from unauthorized access or disclosure.
OnSolve does not sell, rent or lease information to third parties unless marked public or transferred to a customer, as described above.
CodeRED Weather Warning®, Weather Warning and FirstCall® Weather Additional Terms
As a CodeRED Weather Warning®, Weather Warning or FirstCall® Weather (collectively, the “Weather Services”) Recipient, you agree that you shall not directly or indirectly transmit, broadcast, redistribute, forward or deliver the Weather Services or any part of the data, information, images or other products which constitute the Weather Services to any other person or entity, in any format, or by any means. Official Watches, Warnings, Advisories and Bulletins communicated to Recipients are authored by the National Weather Service (“NWS”) or related government agencies. The authoring agency is solely responsible for the content and accuracy of the information contained in the Weather Services. IN NO WAY WILL ONSOLVE OR ANY OF ONSOLVE’S CUSTOMERS BE HELD LIABLE FOR INCOMPLETE OR INACCURATE INFORMATION CONTAINED IN ANY OF THE RETRANSMITTED INFORMATION. THE WEATHER SERVICES AND THEIR AFFILIATED SERVICES ARE FOR INFORMATIONAL PURPOSES ONLY - USE IS AT YOUR OWN RISK! RECIPIENTS AND THIRD PARTIES ARE SOLEY RESPONSIBLE FOR ACTIONS OR OMMISSIONS RESULTING IN THE LOSS OF LIFE OR PROPERTY.
CityWatch® and TelAlert® Additional Terms
CityWatch® and TelAlert® notifications are sent by hardware maintained by a customer or other third party. OnSolve and OnSolve’s customers shall have no liability for the failure of a Recipient to receive notifications from a CityWatch® or TelAlert® customer by reason of a hardware failure, including but not limited to third party failures or acts of God that affect customer hardware.
MyDailyCall® Additional Terms
MyDailyCall® Recipients must have a touchtone telephone with touchtone service and no call blocking services. At time of the automated call, the Recipient must be able to press the specified digits to acknowledge receipt of the MyDailyCall®. In the event the Recipient does not press the specified digits, Recipient’s alternate phone number (if any) will be dialed. In the event there is no alternate phone number, or the specified digits are not pressed on the alternate phone number, the customer will be notified. An Initiator associated with such customer will then determine whether to call Recipient’s emergency contact or request immediate emergency services for the Recipient. Recipient must notify the customer twenty four (24) hours in advance if they will not be available to receive the scheduled calls. RECIPIENT FULLY UNDERSTANDS AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT EMPLOYEES AND AGENTS OF THE
CUSTOMER
MAY BE REQUIRED TO MAKE FORCIBLE ENTRY, OR REQUEST THE AUTHORITIES TO MAKE FORCIBLE ENTRY, TO RECIPIENT’S RESIDENCE IF RECIPIENT FAILS TO RESPOND TO A MYDAILYCALL®. RECIPIENT AGREES TO HOLD HARMLESS THE CUSTOMER, ANY AUTHORITIES, AND THEIR RESPECTIVE EMPLOYEES, AGENTS AND INITIATORS
SHOULD FORCIBLE ENTRY BE REQUIRED
IF OTHER REASONABLE MEASURES TO DETERMINE RECIPIENT’S STATUS HAVE BEEN EXHAUSTED OR ARE UNAVAILABLE.
MyDailyCall® Recipients acknowledge that OnSolve may transfer their Recipient information to the customer to which they subscribed in order to conduct safety checks on the Recipient, and that the MyDailyCall® service is intended to be used as part of a comprehensive strategy, which includes periodic live visits to Recipients as well as the use of common sense.
Mobile Applications Terms of Use
All of OnSolve’s Mobile Applications (each an “App” and collectively, the “Apps”) may only be used by individuals aged 13 years or older. In the event you are older than 13, but are not legally considered an adult, you are requested to have your parent or legal guardian review these Mobile Applications Terms of Use with you to make sure you understand your agreements under the Terms. All Apps and all graphics, services, logos, sounds, images, software, and intellectual property therein (the “App Materials”) are owned and provided by OnSolve or its affiliates, authors, developers and vendors, and may not be copied, reproduced, distributed, republished, transmitted, downloaded, photocopied, recorded or otherwise transferred or duplicated without the express permission of OnSolve. Using any App does not give you the right to use any of the App Materials, trade names, trademarks, service marks, logos or other brand features except in association with your personal use of the App in accordance with the Terms. All Apps are designed for informational, non-commercial purposes only; the Apps are not life-saving devices, and cannot be relied upon in the event of an emergency. You further understand and agree that the alerts sent through the Apps are sent by third parties who are in no way related to OnSolve, that OnSolve does not verify the accuracy of the information contained in the alerts, and that OnSolve is in no way responsible for the content of such alerts.
Social Media Terms of Use
Social media engagement makes OnSolve a better company by allowing us to engage in conversation with customers, Initiators, Recipients and other members of the community, as well as offer them valuable information and resources. OnSolve reserves the right to moderate comments in accordance with OnSolve policies. All social media comments and messages exchanged with OnSolve are public record. OnSolve operates 24 hours a day, 7 days a week and 365 days a year. Our designated response times for comments on any social media site are between Monday through Friday, 9 a.m. and 5 p.m. United States Eastern Time Zone, excluding holidays. OnSolve is not responsible for any content posted by visitors, including posts made by employees or individuals who are not authorized administrators of our sites. Content posted by visitors does not necessarily represent the views or positions of OnSolve. OnSolve expects all conversation on our social media sites to follow the rules of polite discourse. We ask all commenters to respect the thoughts, ideas and beliefs of each other and our team members. It is important that all participants treat each other with respect. Comments will be monitored and may be subject to removal for any reason in OnSolve’s sole discretion. OnSolve may also remove comments if they meet any of the following qualities: advocating illegal activities; threats of physical harm; language that is obscene or abusive; discriminatory language on the basis of race, gender, ethnicity, nationality, sexual orientation, disability, age, religion, gender identity or expression; or promoting products or services. Comments that are clearly spam or stray from the designated topic may also be subject to removal. OnSolve may also remove comments that contain Services requests, so that these may be responded to on a one-on-one basis in lieu of a public response. OnSolve respects the intellectual property of others, and we ask visitors of our social media sites to do the same. For any content you post on OnSolve social media sites, you authorize that it is your own original work or that you have all the rights to any third party content contained in such post. Visitors to our social media sites grant non-exclusive, irrevocable, royalty-free license to the rest of the world for their submissions to OnSolve, whether on a social media site or otherwise, and any such submissions may be used, re-used, re-printed, or transmitted in any format and on any media, by OnSolve. If you believe your work has been copied in a way that constitutes IP infringement, please contact us.
Severe Weather, Public Alerting and Residential Safety
9 Tips to Keep Communities Safe During Severe Weather
Business Continuity, Risk Management, Risk Management
Assess Your Threats: How to Analyze Risk and Vulnerability Data at Scale
Severe Weather, Severe Weather
10 Severe Weather Emergency Notification Best Practices
Resilience, Risk Management, Government
6 Ways Federal Agencies Can Use Historical Threat Data and Analysis
See All Resources
See All Blog Articles
Mitigate Risk and Strengthen Organizational Resilience Today
Request a Demo
icon-angle
icon-bars
icon-times
Privacy & Cookie Information
By clicking “Accept All Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts.
Accept All Cookies
Cookies Settings
Your Privacy
Strictly Necessary Cookies
Performance Cookies
Functional Cookies
Targeting Cookies
Social Media Cookies
Your Privacy
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Social Media Cookies
These cookies are set by a range of social media services that we have added to the site to enable you to share our content with your friends and networks. They are capable of tracking your browser across other sites and building up a profile of your interests. This may impact the content and messages you see on other websites you visit. If you do not allow these cookies you may not be able to use or see these sharing tools.
Back Button
Cookie List
Filter Button
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel